Ohio, session 136, SB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 303.213, 519.213, 713.081, 26
3313.372, 3313.373, 4905.03, 4906.01, 4906.03, 4906.06, 4906.07, 27
4906.10, 4909.04, 4909.05, 4909.052, 4909.06, 4909.07, 4909.08, 28
4909.15, 4909.156, 4909.173, 4909.174, 4909.18, 4909.19, 29
4909.191, 4909.42, 4928.01, 4928.05, 4928.08, 4928.14, 4928.141, 30
4928.142, 4928.144, 4928.17, 4928.20, 4928.23, 4928.231, 31
4928.232, 4928.34, 4928.542, 4928.64, 4928.645, 4929.20, 32
4933.81, 5711.01, 5727.01, 5727.031, 5727.06, 5727.11, 5727.111, 33
and 5727.75 be amended and sections 122.161, 3313.377, 3313.378, 34
4903.27, 4905.23, 4905.311, 4905.321, 4905.331, 4909.041, 35
4909.042, 4909.181, 4909.192, 4909.193, 4928.041, 4928.101, 36
4928.102, 4928.103, 4928.105, 4928.107, 4928.149, 4928.1410, 37
4928.73, 4929.221, 4929.222, and 5727.76 of the Revised Code be 38
enacted to read as follows: 39
Sec. 122.161. (A) As used in this section : 40
(1) "Subdivision" means a municipal corporation, township, 41
or county. 42
(2) "Legislative authority" means the legislative 43
authority of a municipal corporation, a board of the township 44
trustees, or a board of county commissioners. 45
(3) "Subdivision's territory" means, in the case of a 46
municipal corporation, the territory of the municipal 47
corporation; in the case of a township, the unincorporated 48

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 3
As Passed by the Senate
territory of the township; or, in the case of a county, the 49
unincorporated territory of the county. 50
(4) "Brownfield" has the same meaning as in section 51
122.6511 of the Revised Code. 52
(5) "Former coal mine" means a location that was, but is 53
no longer, used in connection with the extraction of coal from 54
its natural deposit in the earth. 55
(6) "Qualifying property" has the same meaning as in 56
section 5727.76 of the Revised Code. 57
(B) A legislative authority may adopt and certify to the 58
director of development an ordinance or resolution requesting 59
that the director designate the site of a brownfield or former 60
coal mine within the subdivision's territory as a priority 61
investment area. The ordinance or resolution shall describe the 62
boundaries of the proposed area and shall specify that 63
qualifying property in the priority investment area shall be 64
exempt from taxation for five years pursuant to section 5727.76 65
of the Revised Code. 66
The director, upon receipt of that certification, shall 67
designate the proposed area as a priority investment area if the 68
director determines that the area meets the designation 69
standards set forth in rules adopted by the director. Those 70
standards shall specify that the director must prioritize the 71
designation of areas negatively impacted by the decline of the 72
coal industry. 73
The director shall notify the legislative authority of the 74
director's decision within ninety days after receiving the 75
certified ordinance or resolution. If the director does not 76
issue a decision within those ninety days, the request for 77

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 4
As Passed by the Senate
designation shall be considered approved by operation of law. 78
(C) The director of development shall immediately notify 79
the public utilities commission, the power siting board, and the 80
tax commissioner if the director approves the designation of a 81
priority investment area under division (B) of this section or 82
if the designation is approved by operation of law. 83
Sec. 303.213. (A) As used in this section: 84
(1) "Small wind farm" means wind turbines and associated 85
facilities that are not subject to the jurisdiction of the power 86
siting board under sections 4906.20 and 4906.201 of the Revised 87
Code. 88
(2) "Small solar facility" means solar panels and 89
associated facilities with a single interconnection to the 90
electrical grid and designed for, or capable of, operation at an 91
aggregate capacity of less than fifty megawatts. 92
(3) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility used to treat 93
organic materials, such as food waste, manure, and sewage 94
sludge, to produce biogas and digestate. 95
(4) "Other small electric generating facility" means an 96
electric generating plant and associated facilities designed 97
for, or capable of, operation at a capacity of less than fifty 98
megawatts that is not a small wind farm, small solar facility, 99
or anaerobic digester. 100
(B) Notwithstanding division (A) of section 303.211 of the 101
Revised Code, sections 303.01 to 303.25 of the Revised Code 102
confer power on a board of county commissioners or board of 103
zoning appeals to adopt zoning regulations governing the 104
location, erection, construction, reconstruction, change, 105
alteration, maintenance, removal, use, or enlargement of any 106

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 5
As Passed by the Senate
small wind farm or , small solar facility, anaerobic digester, 107
or other small electric generating facility, whether publicly or 108
privately owned, or the use of land for that purpose. With 109
regard to a small wind farm, the regulations may be more strict 110
than the regulations prescribed in rules adopted under division 111
(B)(2) of section 4906.20 of the Revised Code. 112
(C) The designation under this section of a small wind 113
farm or a , small solar facility, anaerobic digester, or other 114
small electric generating facility as a public utility for 115
purposes of sections 303.01 to 303.25 of the Revised Code shall 116
not affect the classification of a small wind farm or a , small 117
solar facility, anaerobic digester, or other small electric 118
generating facility for purposes of state or local taxation. 119
(D) Nothing in division (C) of this section shall be 120
construed as affecting the classification of a 121
telecommunications tower as defined in division (B) or (E) of 122
section 303.211 of the Revised Code or any other public utility 123
for purposes of state and local taxation. 124
Sec. 519.213. (A) As used in this section: 125
(1) "Small wind farm" means wind turbines and associated 126
facilities that are not subject to the jurisdiction of the power 127
siting board under sections 4906.20 and 4906.201 of the Revised 128
Code. 129
(2) "Small solar facility" means solar panels and 130
associated facilities with a single interconnection to the 131
electrical grid and designed for, or capable of, operation at an 132
aggregate capacity of less than fifty megawatts. 133
(3) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility used to treat 134
organic materials, such as food waste, manure, and sewage 135

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 6
As Passed by the Senate
sludge, to produce biogas and digestate. 136
(4) "Other small electric generating facility" means an 137
electric generating plant and associated facilities designed 138
for, or capable of, operation at a capacity of less than fifty 139
megawatts that is not a small wind farm, small solar facility, 140
or anaerobic digester. 141
(B) Notwithstanding division (A) of section 519.211 of the 142
Revised Code, sections 519.02 to 519.25 of the Revised Code 143
confer power on a board of township trustees or board of zoning 144
appeals with respect to the location, erection, construction, 145
reconstruction, change, alteration, maintenance, removal, use, 146
or enlargement of any small wind farm or , small solar facility, 147
anaerobic digester, or other small electric generating facility, 148
whether publicly or privately owned, or the use of land for that 149
purpose. With regard to a small wind farm, the regulations may 150
be more strict than the regulations prescribed in rules adopted 151
under division (B)(2) of section 4906.20 of the Revised Code. 152
(C) The designation under this section of a small wind 153
farm or a , small solar facility, anaerobic digester, or other 154
small electric generating facility as a public utility for 155
purposes of sections 519.02 to 519.25 of the Revised Code shall 156
not affect the classification of a small wind farm, a small 157
solar facility, an anaerobic digester, other small electric 158
generating facility, or any other public utility for purposes of 159
state or local taxation. 160
(D) Nothing in division (C) of this section shall be 161
construed as affecting the classification of a 162
telecommunications tower as defined in division (B) or (E) of 163
section 519.211 of the Revised Code or any other public utility 164
for purposes of state and local taxation. 165

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 7
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 713.081. (A) As used in this section: 166
(1) "Small wind farm" means wind turbines and associated 167
facilities that are not subject to the jurisdiction of the power 168
siting board under sections 4906.20 and 4906.201 of the Revised 169
Code. 170
(2) "Small solar facility" means solar panels and 171
associated facilities with a single interconnection to the 172
electrical grid and designed for, or capable of, operation at an 173
aggregate capacity of less than fifty megawatts. 174
(3) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility used to treat 175
organic materials, such as food waste, manure, and sewage 176
sludge, to produce biogas and digestate. 177
(4) "Other small electric generating facility" means an 178
electric generating plant and associated facilities designed 179
for, or capable of, operation at a capacity of less than fifty 180
megawatts that is not a small wind farm, small solar facility, 181
or anaerobic digester. 182
(B) Sections 713.06 to 713.15 of the Revised Code confer 183
power on the legislative authority of a municipal corporation 184
with respect to the location, erection, construction, 185
reconstruction, change, alteration, maintenance, removal, use, 186
or enlargement of any small wind farm or , small solar facility, 187
anaerobic digester, or other small electric generating facility 188
as a public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, or the 189
use of land for that purpose. With regard to a small wind farm, 190
the regulations may be more strict than the regulations 191
prescribed in rules adopted under division (B)(2) of section 192
4906.20 of the Revised Code. 193
(C) The designation under this section of a small wind 194

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 8
As Passed by the Senate
farm or a , small solar facility, anaerobic digester, or other 195
small electric generating facility as a public utility for 196
purposes of sections 713.06 to 713.15 of the Revised Code shall 197
not affect the classification of a small wind farm, a small 198
solar facility, an anaerobic digester, other small electric 199
generating facility, or any other public utility for purposes of 200
state or local taxation. 201
Sec. 3313.372. (A) As used in this section, "energy 202
conservation measure" means an installation or modification of 203
an installation in, or remodeling of, a building, to reduce 204
energy consumption. It includes: 205
(1) Insulation of the building structure and systems 206
within the building; 207
(2) Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and 208
doors, heat absorbing or heat reflective glazed and coated 209
window and door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass 210
area, and other window and door system modifications that reduce 211
energy consumption; 212
(3) Automatic energy control systems; 213
(4) Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning system 214
modifications or replacements; 215
(5) Caulking and weatherstripping; 216
(6) Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to 217
increase the energy efficiency of the system without increasing 218
the overall illumination of a facility, unless such increase in 219
illumination is necessary to conform to the applicable state or 220
local building code for the proposed lighting system; 221
(7) Energy recovery systems; 222

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 9
As Passed by the Senate
(8) Cogeneration systems that produce steam or forms of 223
energy such as heat, as well as electricity, for use primarily 224
within a building or complex of buildings; 225
(9) Solar panels; 226
(10) Any other modification, installation, or remodeling 227
approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission as an 228
energy conservation measure. 229
(B) A board of education of a city, exempted village, 230
local, or joint vocational school district may enter into an 231
installment payment contract for the purchase and installation 232
of energy conservation measures. The provisions of such 233
installment payment contracts dealing with interest charges and 234
financing terms shall not be subject to the competitive bidding 235
requirements of section 3313.46 of the Revised Code, and shall 236
be on the following terms: 237
(1) Not less than one-fifteenth of the costs thereof shall 238
be paid within two years from the date of purchase. 239
(2) The remaining balance of the costs thereof shall be 240
paid within fifteen years from the date of purchase. 241
The provisions of any installment payment contract entered 242
into pursuant to this section shall provide that all payments, 243
except payments for repairs and obligations on termination of 244
the contract prior to its expiration, shall not exceed the 245
calculated energy, water, or waste water cost savings, avoided 246
operating costs, and avoided capital costs attributable to the 247
one or more measures over a defined period of time. Those 248
payments shall be made only to the extent that the savings 249
described in this division actually occur. The energy services 250
company shall warrant and guarantee that the energy conservation 251

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 10
As Passed by the Senate
measures shall realize guaranteed savings and shall be 252
responsible to pay an amount equal to any savings shortfall. 253
An installment payment contract entered into by a board of 254
education under this section shall require the board to contract 255
in accordance with division (A) of section 3313.46 of the 256
Revised Code for the installation, modification, or remodeling 257
of energy conservation measures unless division (A) of section 258
3313.46 of the Revised Code does not apply pursuant to division 259
(B)(3) of that section, in which case the contract shall be 260
awarded through a competitive selection process pursuant to 261
rules adopted by the facilities construction commission. 262
An installment payment contract entered into by a board of 263
education under this section may include services for 264
measurement and verification of energy savings associated with 265
the guarantee. The annual cost of measurement and verification 266
services shall not exceed ten per cent of the guaranteed savings 267
in any year of the installment payment contract. 268
(C) If a board of education determines that a surety bond 269
is necessary to secure energy, water, or waste water cost 270
savings guaranteed in a contract entered into by the board of 271
education under this section, the energy services company shall 272
provide a surety bond that satisfies all of the following 273
requirements: 274
(1) The penal sum of the surety bond for the first 275
guarantee year shall equal the amount of savings included in the 276
annual guaranteed savings amount that is measured and calculated 277
in accordance with the measurement and verification plan 278
included in the contract, but may not include guaranteed savings 279
that are not measured or that are stipulated in the contract. 280
The annual guaranteed savings amount shall include only the 281

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 11
As Passed by the Senate
savings guaranteed in the contract for the one-year term that 282
begins on the first day of the first savings guarantee year and 283
may not include amounts from subsequent years. 284
(2) The surety bond shall have a term of not more than one 285
year unless renewed. At the option of the board of education, 286
the surety bond may be renewed for one or two additional terms, 287
each term not to exceed one year. The surety bond may not be 288
renewed or extended so that it is in effect for more than three 289
consecutive years. 290
In the event of a renewal, the penal sum of the surety 291
bond for each renewed year shall be revised so that the penal 292
sum equals the annual guaranteed savings amount for such renewal 293
year that is measured and calculated in accordance with the 294
measurement and verification plan included in the contract, but 295
may not include guaranteed savings that are not measured or that 296
are stipulated in the contract. Regardless of the number of 297
renewals of the bond, the aggregate liability under each renewed 298
bond may not exceed the penal sum stated in the renewal 299
certificate for the applicable renewal year. 300
(3) The surety bond for the first year shall be issued 301
within thirty days of the commencement of the first savings 302
guarantee year under the contract. 303
In the event of renewal, the surety shall deliver to the 304
board of education a renewal certificate reflecting the revised 305
penal sum within thirty days of the board of education's 306
request. The board of education shall deliver the request for 307
renewal not less than thirty days prior to the expiration date 308
of the surety bond then in existence. A surety bond furnished 309
pursuant to section 153.54 of the Revised Code shall not secure 310
obligations related to energy, water, or waste water cost 311

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 12
As Passed by the Senate
savings as referenced in division (C) of this section. 312
(D) The board may issue the notes of the school district 313
signed by the president and the treasurer of the board and 314
specifying the terms of the purchase and securing the deferred 315
payments provided in this section, payable at the times provided 316
and bearing interest at a rate not exceeding the rate determined 317
as provided in section 9.95 of the Revised Code. The notes may 318
contain an option for prepayment and shall not be subject to 319
Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. In the resolution authorizing 320
the notes, the board may provide, without the vote of the 321
electors of the district, for annually levying and collecting 322
taxes in amounts sufficient to pay the interest on and retire 323
the notes, except that the total net indebtedness of the 324
district without a vote of the electors incurred under this and 325
all other sections of the Revised Code, except section 3318.052 326
of the Revised Code, shall not exceed one per cent of the 327
district's tax valuation. Revenues derived from local taxes or 328
otherwise, for the purpose of conserving energy or for defraying 329
the current operating expenses of the district, may be applied 330
to the payment of interest and the retirement of such notes. The 331
notes may be sold at private sale or given to the energy 332
services company under the installment payment contract 333
authorized by division (B) of this section. 334
(E) Debt incurred under this section shall not be included 335
in the calculation of the net indebtedness of a school district 336
under section 133.06 of the Revised Code. 337
(F) No school district board shall enter into an 338
installment payment contract under division (B) of this section 339
unless it first obtains a report of the costs of the energy 340
conservation measures and the savings thereof as described under 341

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 13
As Passed by the Senate
division (G)(1) of section 133.06 of the Revised Code as a 342
requirement for issuing energy securities, makes a finding that 343
the amount spent on such measures is not likely to exceed the 344
amount of money it would save in energy costs and resultant 345
operational and maintenance costs as described in that division, 346
except that that finding shall cover the ensuing fifteen years, 347
and the facilities construction commission determines that the 348
district board's findings are reasonable and approves the 349
contract as described in that division. 350
The district board shall monitor the savings and maintain 351
a report of those savings, which shall be submitted to the 352
commission in the same manner as required by division (G) of 353
section 133.06 of the Revised Code in the case of energy 354
securities. 355
(G) A board of education may apply to the Ohio facilities 356
construction commission for a loan from the school energy 357
performance contracting loan fund, established by section 358
3313.378 of the Revised Code, for purposes of paying for all or 359
part of an installment contract under division (B) of this 360
section. 361
Sec. 3313.373. (A) As used in this section: 362
(1) "Energy saving measure" means both of the following: 363
(a) The acquisition and installation, by purchase, lease, 364
lease purchase, lease with an option to buy, or installment 365
purchase, of an energy conservation measure as defined in 366
section 3313.372 of the Revised Code and any attendant 367
architectural and engineering consulting services. 368
(b) Architectural and engineering consulting services 369
related to energy conservation. 370

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 14
As Passed by the Senate
(2) "Shared-savings contract" means a contract for one or 371
more energy savings measures, which contract provides that all 372
payments, except payments for maintenance and repairs and 373
obligations on termination of the contract prior to its 374
expiration, are to be a stated percentage of calculated savings 375
of energy costs attributable to the energy saving measure over a 376
defined period of time and are to be made only to the extent 377
that such savings occur. A contract that requires any additional 378
capital investment or contribution of funds, other than funds 379
available from state or federal energy grants, or that is for an 380
initial term of longer than ten years is not a shared-savings 381
contract. 382
(B) The board of education of a city, local, exempted 383
village, or joint vocational school district may enter into a 384
shared-savings contract with any person experienced in the 385
design and implementation of energy saving measures for 386
buildings owned or rented by the board. Such contract is not 387
subject to section 3313.46 of the Revised Code. If the contract 388
is for a term extending beyond the fiscal year, it shall be 389
considered to be a continuing contract within the meaning of 390
division (D) of section 5705.41 of the Revised Code. A board of 391
education entering into an installment contract under this 392
section shall also comply with section 3313.372 of the Revised 393
Code. 394
(C) In the case of a shared-savings contract running 395
beyond the fiscal year in which it is entered into, the board 396
shall include in its annual appropriations measure for each 397
subsequent year any amounts payable under shared-savings 398
contracts during such year and shall furnish the certification 399
required by section 5705.44 of the Revised Code, but the failure 400
of a board to make such an appropriation or furnish the 401

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 15
As Passed by the Senate
certificates referred to in division (D) of section 5705.41, or 402
5705.412 or 5705.44 of the Revised Code, shall not affect the 403
validity of the shared-savings contract or the board's 404
obligations under the contract. 405
(D) A board of education may apply to the Ohio facilities 406
construction commission for a loan from the school energy 407
performance contracting loan fund, established by section 408
3313.378 of the Revised Code, for purposes of paying for all or 409
part of a shared-savings contract under this section. 410
Sec. 3313.377. (A) As used in this section : 411
(1) "Energy conservation measure" has the same meaning as 412
in section 3313.372 of the Revised Code; 413
(2) "Energy saving measure" has the same meaning as in 414
section 3313.373 of the Revised Code. 415
(B) The Ohio facilities construction commission may issue 416
a loan from funds in the school energy performance contracting 417
loan fund created in section 3313.378 of the Revised Code to a 418
board of education of a city, exempted village, local, or joint 419
vocational school district that applies for a loan under section 420
3313.372 or 3313.373 of the Revised Code. 421
(C) Nothing in this section prohibits a board of education 422
that receives a loan under this section from utilizing any other 423
energy efficiency program. 424
(D) The terms of a loan issued under this section shall be 425
as follows: 426
(1) Two per cent annual interest on the loan; 427
(2) The full loan amount, plus interest, shall be repaid 428
in not more than ten years from the issuance of the loan; 429

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 16
As Passed by the Senate
(3) Repayment on the loan begins six months after the 430
installation of the energy conservation measures is complete or 431
the implementation of energy savings measures is completed; 432
(4) Any other provision considered appropriate by the 433
commission. 434
(E) All repayment amounts for any loans issued under this 435
section shall be made to the commission. The commission shall 436
deposit all repayment amounts received in the school energy 437
performance contracting loan fund created in section 3313.378 of 438
the Revised Code. 439
(F) If the commission enters into an agreement with a 440
board for a loan under this section, the commission shall 441
promptly direct the treasurer of state to remit money from the 442
school energy performance contracting loan fund to the board as 443
provided in the terms of the agreement. 444
(G) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this 445
section, including a loan application. 446
Sec. 3313.378. (A) The school energy performance 447
contracting loan fund is created in the custody of the state 448
treasurer, but is not part of the state treasury. The money in 449
the fund shall be used for purposes of funding loans issued 450
under section 3313.377 of the Revised Code. The fund shall 451
consist of the funds transferred from the solar generation fund, 452
repayments of loans from this fund, interest on amounts in the 453
school energy performance contracting loan fund, and any 454
appropriations, grants, or gifts made to the fund. 455
(B) The fund shall be administered by the Ohio facilities 456
construction commission, and the commission shall request the 457
treasurer of state to create the account for the fund. The 458

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 17
As Passed by the Senate
treasurer of state shall distribute the money in the fund in 459
accordance with directions provided by the commission. 460
Sec. 4903.27. For all cases involving an application 461
pursuant to section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the public 462
utilities commission shall not permit any new discovery 463
beginning not later than two hundred fifteen days after the 464
application is submitted. 465
Sec. 4905.03. As used in this chapter, any person, firm, 466
copartnership, voluntary association, joint-stock association, 467
company, or corporation, wherever organized or incorporated, is: 468
(A) A telephone company, when engaged in the business of 469
transmitting telephonic messages to, from, through, or in this 470
state; 471
(B) A for-hire motor carrier, when engaged in the business 472
of transporting persons or property by motor vehicle for 473
compensation, except when engaged in any of the operations in 474
intrastate commerce described in divisions (B)(1) to (9) of 475
section 4921.01 of the Revised Code, but including the carrier's 476
agents, officers, and representatives, as well as employees 477
responsible for hiring, supervising, training, assigning, or 478
dispatching drivers and employees concerned with the 479
installation, inspection, and maintenance of motor-vehicle 480
equipment and accessories; 481
(C) An electric light company, when engaged in the 482
business of supplying electricity for light, heat, or power 483
purposes to consumers within this state, including supplying 484
electric transmission service for electricity delivered to 485
consumers in this state, but excluding a regional transmission 486
organization approved by the federal energy regulatory 487

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 18
As Passed by the Senate
commission; . 488
An electric light company does not include a self- 489
generator or mercantile customer self-power system. 490
(D) A gas company, when engaged in the business of 491
supplying artificial gas for lighting, power, or heating 492
purposes to consumers within this state or when engaged in the 493
business of supplying artificial gas to gas companies or to 494
natural gas companies within this state, but a producer engaged 495
in supplying to one or more gas or natural gas companies, only 496
such artificial gas as is manufactured by that producer as a by- 497
product of some other process in which the producer is primarily 498
engaged within this state is not thereby a gas company. All 499
rates, rentals, tolls, schedules, charges of any kind, or 500
agreements between any gas company and any other gas company or 501
any natural gas company providing for the supplying of 502
artificial gas and for compensation for the same are subject to 503
the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission. 504
(E) A natural gas company, when engaged in the business of 505
supplying natural gas for lighting, power, or heating purposes 506
to consumers within this state. Notwithstanding the above, 507
neither the delivery nor sale of Ohio-produced natural gas or 508
Ohio-produced raw natural gas liquids by a producer or gatherer 509
under a public utilities commission-ordered exemption, adopted 510
before, as to producers, or after, as to producers or gatherers, 511
January 1, 1996, or the delivery or sale of Ohio-produced 512
natural gas or Ohio-produced raw natural gas liquids by a 513
producer or gatherer of Ohio-produced natural gas or Ohio- 514
produced raw natural gas liquids, either to a lessor under an 515
oil and gas lease of the land on which the producer's drilling 516
unit is located, or the grantor incident to a right-of-way or 517

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 19
As Passed by the Senate
easement to the producer or gatherer, shall cause the producer 518
or gatherer to be a natural gas company for the purposes of this 519
section. 520
All rates, rentals, tolls, schedules, charges of any kind, 521
or agreements between a natural gas company and other natural 522
gas companies or gas companies providing for the supply of 523
natural gas and for compensation for the same are subject to the 524
jurisdiction of the public utilities commission. The commission, 525
upon application made to it, may relieve any producer or 526
gatherer of natural gas, defined in this section as a gas 527
company or a natural gas company, of compliance with the 528
obligations imposed by this chapter and Chapters 4901., 4903., 529
4907., 4909., 4921., and 4923. of the Revised Code, so long as 530
the producer or gatherer is not affiliated with or under the 531
control of a gas company or a natural gas company engaged in the 532
transportation or distribution of natural gas, or so long as the 533
producer or gatherer does not engage in the distribution of 534
natural gas to consumers. 535
Nothing in division (E) of this section limits the 536
authority of the commission to enforce sections 4905.90 to 537
4905.96 of the Revised Code. 538
(F) A pipe-line company, when engaged in the business of 539
transporting natural gas, oil, or coal or its derivatives 540
through pipes or tubing, either wholly or partly within this 541
state, but not when engaged in the business of the transport 542
associated with gathering lines, raw natural gas liquids, or 543
finished product natural gas liquids; 544
(G) A water-works company, when engaged in the business of 545
supplying water through pipes or tubing, or in a similar manner, 546
to consumers within this state; 547

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 20
As Passed by the Senate
(H) A heating or cooling company, when engaged in the 548
business of supplying water, steam, or air through pipes or 549
tubing to consumers within this state for heating or cooling 550
purposes; 551
(I) A messenger company, when engaged in the business of 552
supplying messengers for any purpose; 553
(J) A street railway company, when engaged in the business 554
of operating as a common carrier, a railway, wholly or partly 555
within this state, with one or more tracks upon, along, above, 556
or below any public road, street, alleyway, or ground, within 557
any municipal corporation, operated by any motive power other 558
than steam and not a part of an interurban railroad, whether the 559
railway is termed street, inclined-plane, elevated, or 560
underground railway; 561
(K) A suburban railroad company, when engaged in the 562
business of operating as a common carrier, whether wholly or 563
partially within this state, a part of a street railway 564
constructed or extended beyond the limits of a municipal 565
corporation, and not a part of an interurban railroad; 566
(L) An interurban railroad company, when engaged in the 567
business of operating a railroad, wholly or partially within 568
this state, with one or more tracks from one municipal 569
corporation or point in this state to another municipal 570
corporation or point in this state, whether constructed upon the 571
public highways or upon private rights-of-way, outside of 572
municipal corporations, using electricity or other motive power 573
than steam power for the transportation of passengers, packages, 574
express matter, United States mail, baggage, and freight. Such 575
an interurban railroad company is included in the term 576
"railroad" as used in section 4907.02 of the Revised Code. 577

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 21
As Passed by the Senate
(M) A sewage disposal system company, when engaged in the 578
business of sewage disposal services through pipes or tubing, 579
and treatment works, or in a similar manner, within this state. 580
As used in division (E) of this section, "natural gas" 581
includes natural gas that has been processed to enable 582
consumption or to meet gas quality standards or that has been 583
blended with propane, hydrogen, biologically derived methane 584
gas, or any other artificially produced or processed gas. 585
As used in this section, "gathering lines" has the same 586
meaning as in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code, and "raw 587
natural gas liquids" and "finished product natural gas liquids" 588
have the same meanings as in section 4906.01 of the Revised 589
Code. 590
As used in this section, "self-generator" has the same 591
meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, and 592
"mercantile customer self-power system" has the same meaning as 593
in section 4928.73 of the Revised Code. 594
Sec. 4905.23. (A) As used in this section, "base load 595
electric generating facility" means an electric generating plant 596
and associated facilities located in this state that primarily 597
uses a nonrenewable fuel source to generate electricity, 598
including natural gas and nuclear reaction, and that is not 599
owned or operated by a public utility, municipal corporation, or 600
electric cooperative. 601
(B) No person shall enter into a settlement to abandon, 602
close, or shut down a base load electric generating facility or 603
a generating plant owned or operated by a public utility. 604
Sec. 4905.311. (A) As used in this section, "electric 605
distribution utility" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 606

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 22
As Passed by the Senate
of the Revised Code. 607
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to 608
the contrary, an electric distribution utility may supply behind 609
the meter electric generation service, provided that any behind 610
the meter electric generation facilities that the utility 611
intends to use to supply such service were in operation prior to 612
the effective date of this section. 613
(C) No electric distribution utility shall recover any of 614
the following costs through any rate, charge, or recovery from 615
retail electric service customers that are not receiving behind 616
the meter electric generation service from the utility: 617
(1) Costs associated with supplying behind the meter 618
electric generation service; 619
(2) Costs associated with any behind the meter electric 620
generation service facility; 621
(3) Stranded costs associated with the closing of any 622
behind the meter electric generation service facility or an end- 623
use customer of the behind the meter electric generation service 624
ceasing operations. 625
(D) No electric distribution utility shall offer direct, 626
associated inducements for contracting with the utility for any 627
behind the meter electric generation service. 628
(E) The public utilities commission shall periodically 629
audit all electric distribution utilities that provide any 630
behind the meter electric generation service to ensure 631
compliance with this section. 632
Sec. 4905.321. (A) Notwithstanding section 4905.32 of the 633
Revised Code, all revenues collected from customers by a public 634

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 23
As Passed by the Senate
utility as part of a rider or rates that are later found to be 635
unreasonable, unlawful, or otherwise improper by the supreme 636
court shall be subject to refund from the date of the issuance 637
of the supreme court's decision until the date when, on remand, 638
the public utilities commission makes changes to the rider or 639
rates to implement the supreme court's decision. 640
(B) The commission shall order the payment of the refunds 641
described in division (A) of this section in a manner designed 642
to allocate the refunds to customer classes in the same 643
proportion as the charges were originally collected. 644
(C) The commission shall determine how to allocate any 645
remaining funds described in division (A) of this section that 646
cannot be refunded for whatever reason. 647
(D) The commission shall order the payment of the funds 648
described in division (A) of this section and shall determine 649
how to allocate any remaining funds that cannot be refunded not 650
more than thirty days after the date of the issuance of the 651
supreme court's decision. 652
Sec. 4905.331. (A) As used in this section: 653
(1) "Electric distribution utility" has the same meaning 654
as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code. 655
(2) "Electric service" means any service involved in 656
supplying or arranging for the supply of electricity to ultimate 657
consumers in this state. "Electric service" includes "retail 658
electric service" as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised 659
Code. 660
(3) "Proceeding" includes a proceeding relating to 661
electric service under Chapters 4909. and 4928. of the Revised 662
Code. 663

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 24
As Passed by the Senate
(B) No electric distribution utility or its affiliate may 664
do either of the following to induce any party to a public 665
utilities commission proceeding to enter into a settlement of a 666
matter pending before the commission: 667
(1) Make a cash payment to that party; 668
(2) Enter into any agreement or any financial or private 669
arrangement with that party that is not made part of the public 670
case record. 671
(C) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, the 672
commission may do any of the following: 673
(1) Reasonably allocate costs among rate schedules; 674
(2) Reasonably design rates within a rate schedule; 675
(3) Approve reasonable rates designed for particular 676
customers or classes of customers; 677
(4) Approve a resolution of a proceeding under section 678
4905.26 of the Revised Code; 679
(5) Approve payments to any governmental entity, nonprofit 680
organization, or other association for implementing low-income 681
weatherization service programs, subject to the following 682
conditions: 683
(a) The payments are at a rate that is reasonably tailored 684
to the costs of providing the programs. 685
(b) The payments are for programs that are subject to an 686
existing or new audit procedure. 687
(c) The payments are not for low-income weatherization 688
education programs. 689
Sec. 4906.01. As used in Chapter 4906. of the Revised 690

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 25
As Passed by the Senate
Code: 691
(A) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business 692
trust, association, estate, trust, or partnership or any 693
officer, board, commission, department, division, or bureau of 694
the state or a political subdivision of the state, or any other 695
entity. 696
(B)(1) "Major utility facility" means: 697
(a) Electric generating plant and associated facilities 698
designed for, or capable of, operation at a capacity of fifty 699
megawatts or more; 700
(b) An electric transmission line and associated 701
facilities of a design capacity of one hundred kilovolts or 702
more; 703
(c) A gas pipeline that is greater than five hundred feet 704
in length, and its associated facilities, is more than nine 705
inches in outside diameter and is designed for transporting gas 706
at a maximum allowable operating pressure in excess of one 707
hundred twenty-five pounds per square inch. 708
(2) "Major utility facility" does not include any of the 709
following: 710
(a) Gas transmission lines over which an agency of the 711
United States has exclusive jurisdiction; 712
(b) Any solid waste facilities as defined in section 713
6123.01 of the Revised Code; 714
(c) Electric distributing lines and associated facilities 715
as defined by the power siting board; 716
(d) Any manufacturing facility that creates byproducts 717

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 26
As Passed by the Senate
that may be used in the generation of electricity as defined by 718
the power siting board; 719
(e) Gathering lines, gas gathering pipelines, and 720
processing plant gas stub pipelines as those terms are defined 721
in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code and associated 722
facilities; 723
(f) Any gas processing plant as defined in section 4905.90 724
of the Revised Code; 725
(g) Natural gas liquids finished product pipelines; 726
(h) Pipelines from a gas processing plant as defined in 727
section 4905.90 of the Revised Code to a natural gas liquids 728
fractionation plant, including a raw natural gas liquids 729
pipeline, or to an interstate or intrastate gas pipeline; 730
(i) Any natural gas liquids fractionation plant; 731
(j) A production operation as defined in section 1509.01 732
of the Revised Code, including all pipelines upstream of any 733
gathering lines; 734
(k) Any compressor stations used by the following: 735
(i) A gathering line, a gas gathering pipeline, a 736
processing plant gas stub pipeline, or a gas processing plant as 737
those terms are defined in section 4905.90 of the Revised Code; 738
(ii) A natural gas liquids finished product pipeline, a 739
natural gas liquids fractionation plant, or any pipeline 740
upstream of a natural gas liquids fractionation plant; or 741
(iii) A production operation as defined in section 1509.01 742
of the Revised Code. 743
(C) "Commence to construct" means any clearing of land, 744

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 27
As Passed by the Senate
excavation, or other action that would adversely affect the 745
natural environment of the site or route of a major utility 746
facility, but does not include surveying changes needed for 747
temporary use of sites or routes for nonutility purposes, or 748
uses in securing geological data, including necessary borings to 749
ascertain foundation conditions. 750
(D) "Certificate" means a certificate of environmental 751
compatibility and public need issued by the power siting board 752
under section 4906.10 of the Revised Code or a construction 753
certificate issued by the board under rules adopted under 754
division divisions (E) or (F) to (H) of section 4906.03 of the 755
Revised Code. 756
(E) "Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or gas that is 757
toxic or corrosive. 758
(F) "Natural gas liquids finished product pipeline" means 759
a pipeline that carries finished product natural gas liquids to 760
the inlet of an interstate or intrastate finished product 761
natural gas liquid transmission pipeline, rail loading facility, 762
or other petrochemical or refinery facility. 763
(G) "Large solar facility" means an electric generating 764
plant that consists of solar panels and associated facilities 765
with a single interconnection to the electrical grid that is a 766
major utility facility. 767
(H) "Large wind farm" means an electric generating plant 768
that consists of wind turbines and associated facilities with a 769
single interconnection to the electrical grid that is a major 770
utility facility. 771
(I) "Natural gas liquids fractionation plant" means a 772
facility that takes a feed of raw natural gas liquids and 773

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 28
As Passed by the Senate
produces finished product natural gas liquids. 774
(J) "Raw natural gas" means hydrocarbons that are produced 775
in a gaseous state from gas wells and that generally include 776
methane, ethane, propane, butanes, pentanes, hexanes, heptanes, 777
octanes, nonanes, and decanes, plus other naturally occurring 778
impurities like water, carbon dioxide, hydrogen sulfide, 779
nitrogen, oxygen, and helium. 780
(K) "Raw natural gas liquids" means naturally occurring 781
hydrocarbons contained in raw natural gas that are extracted in 782
a gas processing plant and liquefied and generally include 783
mixtures of ethane, propane, butanes, and natural gasoline. 784
(L) "Finished product natural gas liquids" means an 785
individual finished product produced by a natural gas liquids 786
fractionation plant as a liquid that meets the specifications 787
for commercial products as defined by the gas processors 788
association. Those products include ethane, propane, iso-butane, 789
normal butane, and natural gasoline. 790
Sec. 4906.03. The power siting board shall: 791
(A) Require such information from persons subject to its 792
jurisdiction as it considers necessary to assist in the conduct 793
of hearings and any investigations or studies it may undertake; 794
(B) Conduct any studies or investigations that it 795
considers necessary or appropriate to carry out its 796
responsibilities under this chapter; 797
(C) Adopt rules establishing criteria for evaluating the 798
effects on environmental values of proposed and alternative 799
sites, and projected needs for electric power, and such other 800
rules as are necessary and convenient to implement this chapter, 801
including rules governing application fees, supplemental 802

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 29
As Passed by the Senate
application fees, and other reasonable fees to be paid by 803
persons subject to the board's jurisdiction. The board shall 804
make an annual accounting of its collection and use of these 805
fees and shall issue an annual report of its accounting, in the 806
form and manner prescribed by its rules, not later than the last 807
day of June of the year following the calendar year to which the 808
report applies. 809
(D) Approve, disapprove, or modify and approve 810
applications for certificates; 811
(E) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the 812
Revised Code, the board may adopt rules to provide for an 813
accelerated review of an application for a construction 814
certificate for construction of a major utility facility related 815
to a coal research and development project as defined in section 816
1555.01 of the Revised Code, or to a coal development project as 817
defined in section 1551.30 of the Revised Code, submitted to the 818
Ohio coal development office for review under division (B)(7) of 819
section 1551.33 of the Revised Code. Applications for 820
construction certificates for construction of major utility 821
facilities for Ohio coal research and development shall be filed 822
with the board on the same day as the proposed facility or 823
project is submitted to the Ohio coal development office for 824
review. 825
The board shall render a decision on an application for a 826
construction certificate within ninety days after receipt of the 827
application and all of the data and information it may require 828
from the applicant. In rendering a decision on an application 829
for a construction certificate, the board shall only consider 830
the criteria and make the findings and determinations set forth 831
in divisions (A)(2), (3), (5), and (7) and division (B) of 832

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 30
As Passed by the Senate
section 4906.10 of the Revised Code. 833
(F) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the 834
Revised Code, the board shall adopt rules to provide for an 835
accelerated review of an application for a construction 836
certificate for any of the following: 837
(1) An electric transmission line that is: 838
(a) Not more than two miles in length; 839
(b) Primarily needed to attract or meet the requirements 840
of a specific customer or specific customers; 841
(c) Necessary to maintain reliable electric service as a 842
result of the retirement or shutdown of an electric generating 843
facility located within the state; or 844
(d) A rebuilding of an existing transmission line. 845
(2) An electric generating facility that uses waste heat 846
or natural gas and is primarily within the current boundary of 847
an existing industrial or electric generating facility; 848
(3) A gas pipeline that is not more than five miles in 849
length or is primarily needed to meet the requirements of a 850
specific customer or specific customers. 851
The board shall adopt rules that provide for the automatic 852
certification to any entity described in this division when an 853
application by any such entity is not suspended by the board, an 854
administrative law judge, or the chairperson or executive 855
director of the board for good cause shown, within ninety days 856
of submission of the application. If an application is 857
suspended, the board shall approve, disapprove, or modify and 858
approve the application not later than ninety days after the 859
date of the suspension. 860

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 31
As Passed by the Senate
(G) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the 861
Revised Code, the board shall adopt rules to provide for the 862
accelerated review of an application for a construction 863
certificate for any of the following that are located in a 864
priority investment area designated and approved under section 865
122.161 of the Revised Code: 866
(1) An electric generating plant and associated 867
facilities; 868
(2) An electric transmission line and associated 869
facilities; 870
(3) Gas Pipeline infrastructure. 871
The chairperson of the board, not later than forty-five 872
days after receipt of an application submitted under division 873
(G) of this section, shall determine if it complies with all 874
application requirements set by the public utilities commission 875
by rule. If the chairperson does not issue a determination 876
within the time period required by this division, the 877
application shall be deemed in compliance by operation of law. 878
The board shall render a decision on an application 879
submitted under this division not later than forty-five days 880
after the application is determined in compliance with all 881
requirements set by the commission. If the board does not render 882
a decision within forty-five days, the application shall be 883
considered approved by operation of law, and the board shall 884
issue a certificate to the applicant. 885
The board shall adopt rules to implement this division, 886
including rules that prioritize applications for construction on 887
areas negatively impacted by the decline of the coal industry. 888
(H) Notwithstanding sections 4906.06 to 4906.14 of the 889

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 32
As Passed by the Senate
Revised Code, the board shall adopt rules to provide for the 890
accelerated review of an application for a construction 891
certificate for a major utility facility if at the time the 892
application is filed the construction will be located, in whole, 893
on property owned by, or under a lease with a term of twenty- 894
five years or more with, the applicant; in whole or in part, on 895
an easement or right-of-way; or on any combination of such 896
property, easement, or right-of-way. 897
No accelerated application shall be granted under the 898
rules adopted under division (H) of this section for 899
construction of a major utility facility, in whole or in part, 900
on property under a lease or an easement or right-of-way, if 901
additional consent for construction on the property, easement, 902
or right-of-way is required by any person or entity other than 903
the power siting board. 904
The board shall render a decision on an application 905
submitted under this division not later than forty-five days 906
after receipt of the application. If the board does not render a 907
decision within forty-five days, the application shall be 908
considered approved by operation of law, and the board shall 909
issue a certificate to the applicant. 910
Sec. 4906.06. (A) An applicant for a certificate shall 911
file with the office of the chairperson of the power siting 912
board an application, in such form as the board prescribes, 913
containing the following information: 914
(1) A description of the location and of the major utility 915
facility; 916
(2) A summary of any studies that have been made by or for 917
the applicant of the environmental impact of the facility; 918

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 33
As Passed by the Senate
(3) A statement explaining the need for the facility; 919
(4) A statement of the reasons why the proposed location 920
is best suited for the facility; 921
(5) A statement of how the facility fits into the 922
applicant's forecast contained in the report submitted under 923
section 4935.04 of the Revised Code; 924
(6) Such other information as the applicant may consider 925
relevant or as the board by rule or order may require. Copies of 926
the studies referred to in division (A)(2) of this section shall 927
be filed with the office of the chairperson, if ordered, and 928
shall be available for public inspection. 929
The application shall be filed not more than five years 930
prior to the planned date of commencement of construction. The 931
five-year period may be waived by the board for good cause 932
shown. 933
(B) Each application shall be accompanied by proof of 934
service of a copy of such application on the chief executive 935
officer of each municipal corporation and county, and the head 936
of each public agency charged with the duty of protecting the 937
environment or of planning land use, in the area in which any 938
portion of such facility is to be located. 939
(C) Each applicant within fifteen days after the date of 940
the filing of the application shall give public notice to 941
persons residing in the municipal corporations and counties 942
entitled to receive notice under division (B) of this section, 943
by the publication of a summary of the application in newspapers 944
of general circulation in such area. Proof of such publication 945
shall be filed with the office of the chairperson. 946
(D) Inadvertent failure of service on, or notice to, any 947

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 34
As Passed by the Senate
of the persons identified in divisions (B) and (C) of this 948
section may be cured pursuant to orders of the board designed to 949
afford them adequate notice to enable them to participate 950
effectively in the proceeding. In addition, the board, after 951
filing, may require the applicant to serve notice of the 952
application or copies thereof or both upon such other persons, 953
and file proof thereof, as the board considers appropriate. 954
(E) An application for an amendment of a certificate shall 955
be in such form and contain such information as the board 956
prescribes. Notice of such an application shall be given as 957
required in divisions (B) and (C) of this section. 958
(F) Each application for certificate or an amendment shall 959
be accompanied by the application fee prescribed by board rule. 960
All application fees, supplemental application fees, and other 961
fees collected by the board shall be deposited in the state 962
treasury to the credit of the power siting board fund, which is 963
hereby created. The chairperson shall administer and authorize 964
expenditures from the fund for any of the purposes of this 965
chapter. If the chairperson determines that moneys credited to 966
the fund from an applicant's fee are not sufficient to pay the 967
board's expenses associated with its review of the application, 968
the chairperson shall request the approval of the controlling 969
board to assess a supplemental application fee upon an applicant 970
to pay anticipated additional expenses associated with the 971
board's review of the application or an amendment to an 972
application. If the chairperson finds that an application fee 973
exceeds the amount needed to pay the board's expenses for review 974
of the application, the chairperson shall cause a refund of the 975
excess amount to be issued to the applicant from the fund. 976
(G) The chairperson shall determine whether an application 977

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 35
As Passed by the Senate
is in compliance with this section not more than forty-five days 978
after the application is filed. If the chairperson does not 979
issue a determination within the time period required by this 980
division, the application shall be deemed in compliance by 981
operation of law. 982
Sec. 4906.07. (A) Upon the receipt of an application 983
complying with section 4906.06 of the Revised Code, the power 984
siting board shall promptly fix a date for a public hearing 985
thereon, not less than sixty forty-five nor more than ninety 986
sixty days after such receipt, and shall conclude the proceeding 987
as expeditiously as practicable. 988
(B) On an application for an amendment of a certificate, 989
the board shall hold a hearing in the same manner as a hearing 990
is held on an application for a certificate if the proposed 991
change in the facility would result in any material increase in 992
any environmental impact of the facility or a substantial change 993
in the location of all or a portion of such facility other than 994
as provided in the alternates set forth in the application. 995
(C) The chairperson of the power siting board shall cause 996
each application filed with the board to be investigated and 997
shall, not less than fifteen five days prior to the date any 998
application is set for hearing submit a written report to the 999
board and to the applicant. A copy of such report shall be made 1000
available to any person upon request. Such report shall set 1001
forth the nature of the investigation, and shall contain 1002
recommended findings with regard to division (A) of section 1003
4906.10 of the Revised Code and shall become part of the record 1004
and served upon all parties to the proceeding. 1005
Sec. 4906.10. (A) The power siting board shall render a 1006
decision upon the record either granting or denying the 1007

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 36
As Passed by the Senate
application as filed, or granting it upon such terms, 1008
conditions, or modifications of the construction, operation, or 1009
maintenance of the major utility facility as the board considers 1010
appropriate. The certificate shall be subject to sections 1011
4906.101, 4906.102, and 4906.103 of the Revised Code and 1012
conditioned upon the facility being in compliance with standards 1013
and rules adopted under section 4561.32 and Chapters 3704., 1014
3734., and 6111. of the Revised Code. An applicant may withdraw 1015
an application if the board grants a certificate on terms, 1016
conditions, or modifications other than those proposed by the 1017
applicant in the application. 1018
The board shall not grant a certificate for the 1019
construction, operation, and maintenance of a major utility 1020
facility, either as proposed or as modified by the board, unless 1021
it finds and determines all of the following: 1022
(1) The basis of the need for the facility if the facility 1023
is an electric transmission line or gas pipeline; 1024
(2) The nature of the probable environmental impact; 1025
(3) That the facility represents the minimum adverse 1026
environmental impact, considering the state of available 1027
technology and the nature and economics of the various 1028
alternatives, and other pertinent considerations; 1029
(4) In the case of an electric transmission line or 1030
generating facility, that the facility is consistent with 1031
regional plans for expansion of the electric power grid of the 1032
electric systems serving this state and interconnected utility 1033
systems and that the facility will serve the interests of 1034
electric system economy and reliability; 1035
(5) That the facility will comply with Chapters 3704., 1036

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 37
As Passed by the Senate
3734., and 6111. of the Revised Code and all rules and standards 1037
adopted under those chapters and under section 4561.32 of the 1038
Revised Code. In determining whether the facility will comply 1039
with all rules and standards adopted under section 4561.32 of 1040
the Revised Code, the board shall consult with the office of 1041
aviation of the division of multi-modal planning and programs of 1042
the department of transportation under section 4561.341 of the 1043
Revised Code. 1044
(6) That the facility will serve the public interest, 1045
convenience, and necessity; 1046
(7) In addition to the provisions contained in divisions 1047
(A)(1) to (6) of this section and rules adopted under those 1048
divisions, what its impact will be on the viability as 1049
agricultural land of any land in an existing agricultural 1050
district established under Chapter 929. of the Revised Code that 1051
is located within the site and alternative site of the proposed 1052
major utility facility. Rules adopted to evaluate impact under 1053
division (A)(7) of this section shall not require the 1054
compilation, creation, submission, or production of any 1055
information, document, or other data pertaining to land not 1056
located within the site and alternative site. 1057
(8) That the facility incorporates maximum feasible water 1058
conservation practices as determined by the board, considering 1059
available technology and the nature and economics of the various 1060
alternatives. 1061
(B) If the board determines that the location of all or a 1062
part of the proposed facility should be modified, it may 1063
condition its certificate upon that modification, provided that 1064
the municipal corporations and counties, and persons residing 1065
therein, affected by the modification shall have been given 1066

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 38
As Passed by the Senate
reasonable notice thereof. 1067
(C) A copy of the decision and any opinion issued 1068
therewith shall be served upon each party. 1069
(D) The board shall render a decision under this section 1070
not later than one hundred twenty days after the date the 1071
application is found in compliance with section 4906.06 of the 1072
Revised Code. If the board does not render a decision within the 1073
time period required by this division, the application shall be 1074
deemed approved by operation of law, and the board shall issue a 1075
certificate to the applicant subject to the conditions contained 1076
within the staff report issued under section 4906.07 of the 1077
Revised Code. 1078
Sec. 4909.04. (A) The public utilities commission, for the 1079
purpose of ascertaining the reasonableness and justice of rates 1080
and charges for the service rendered by public utilities or 1081
railroads, or for any other purpose authorized by law, may 1082
investigate and ascertain the value of the property of any 1083
public utility or railroad in this state used or useful for the 1084
service and convenience of the public, using the same criteria 1085
that are set forth in section sections 4909.042 and 4909.05 of 1086
the Revised Code. At the request of the legislative authority of 1087
any municipal corporation, the commission, after hearing and 1088
determining that such a valuation is necessary, may also 1089
investigate and ascertain the value of the property of any 1090
public utility used and useful for the service and convenience 1091
of the public where the whole or major portion of such public 1092
utility is situated in such municipal corporation. 1093
(B) To assist the commission in preparing such a 1094
valuation, every public utility or railroad shall: 1095

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 39
As Passed by the Senate
(1) Furnish to the commission, or to its agents, as the 1096
commission requires, maps, profiles, schedules of rates and 1097
tariffs, contracts, reports of engineers, and other documents, 1098
records, and papers, or copies of any of them, in aid of any 1099
investigation and ascertainment of the value of its property; 1100
(2) Grant to the commission or its agents free access to 1101
all of its premises and property and its accounts, records, and 1102
memoranda whenever and wherever requested by any such authorized 1103
agent; 1104
(3) Cooperate with and aid the commission and its agents 1105
in the work of the valuation of its property in such further 1106
particulars and to such extent as the commission requires and 1107
directs. 1108
(C) The commission may make all rules which seem necessary 1109
to ascertain the value of the property and plant of each public 1110
utility or railroad. 1111
Sec. 4909.041. As used in sections 4909.041, 4909.042, an d 1112
4909.05 of the Revised Code: 1113
(A) A "lease purchase agreement" is an agreement pursuant 1114
to which a public utility leasing property is required to make 1115
rental payments for the term of the agreement and either the 1116
utility is granted the right to purchase the property upon the 1117
completion of the term of the agreement and upon the payment of 1118
an additional fixed sum of money or title to the property vests 1119
in the utility upon the making of the final rental payment. 1120
(B) A "leaseback" is the sale or transfer of property by a 1121
public utility to another person contemporaneously followed by 1122
the leasing of the property to the public utility on a long-term 1123
basis. 1124

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 40
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 4909.042. (A) With respect to an electric light 1125
company that chooses to file a forecasted test period under 1126
section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the public utilities 1127
commission shall prescribe the form and details of the valuation 1128
report of the property of the utility. Such report shall include 1129
all the kinds and classes of property, with the value of each, 1130
owned, held, or projected to be owned or held during the test 1131
period, by the utility for the service and convenience of the 1132
public. 1133
(B) Such report shall contain the following facts in 1134
detail: 1135
(1) The original cost of each parcel of land owned in fee 1136
and projected to be owned in fee and in use during the test 1137
period, determined by the commission; and also a statement of 1138
the conditions of acquisition, whether by direct purchase, by 1139
donation, by exercise of the power of eminent domain, or 1140
otherwise; 1141
(2) The actual acquisition cost, not including periodic 1142
rental fees, of rights-of-way, trailways, or other land rights 1143
projected to be held during the test period, by virtue of 1144
easements, leases, or other forms of grants of rights as to 1145
usage; 1146
(3) The original cost of all other kinds and classes of 1147
property projected to be used and useful during the test period, 1148
in the rendition of service to the public. Such original costs 1149
of property, other than land owned in fee, shall be the cost, as 1150
determined to be reasonable by the commission, to the person 1151
that first dedicated or dedicates the property to the public use 1152
and shall be set forth in property accounts and subaccounts as 1153
prescribed by the commission; 1154

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 41
As Passed by the Senate
(4) The cost of property constituting all or part of a 1155
project projected to be leased to or used by the utility during 1156
the test period, under Chapter 165., 3706., 6121., or 6123. of 1157
the Revised Code and not included under division (B)(3) of this 1158
section exclusive of any interest directly or indirectly paid by 1159
the utility with respect thereto whether or not capitalized; 1160
(5) In the discretion of the commission, the cost to a 1161
utility, in an amount determined to be reasonable by the 1162
commission, of property constituting all or part of a project 1163
projected to be leased to the utility during the test period, 1164
under a lease purchase agreement or a leaseback and not included 1165
under division (B)(3) of this section exclusive of any interest 1166
directly or indirectly paid by the utility with respect thereto 1167
whether or not capitalized; 1168
(6) The proper and adequate reserve for depreciation, as 1169
determined to be reasonable by the commission; 1170
(7) Any sums of money or property that the utility is 1171
projected to receive during the test period, as total or partial 1172
defrayal of the cost of its property; 1173
(8) The valuation of the property of the utility, which 1174
shall be the sum of the amounts contained in the report pursuant 1175
to divisions (B)(1) to (5) of this section, less the sum of the 1176
amounts contained in the report pursuant to divisions (B)(6) and 1177
(7) of this section. 1178
(C) The report shall show separately the property 1179
projected to be used and useful to or held by the utility during 1180
the test period, and such other items as the commission 1181
considers proper. The commission may require an additional 1182
report showing the extent to which the property is projected to 1183

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 42
As Passed by the Senate
be used and useful during the test period. Such reports shall be 1184
filed in the office of the commission for the information of the 1185
governor and the general assembly. 1186
Sec. 4909.05. As used in this section: 1187
(A) A "lease purchase agreement" is an agreement pursuant 1188
to which a public utility leasing property is required to make 1189
rental payments for the term of the agreement and either the 1190
utility is granted the right to purchase the property upon the 1191
completion of the term of the agreement and upon the payment of 1192
an additional fixed sum of money or title to the property vests 1193
in the utility upon the making of the final rental payment. 1194
(B) A "leaseback" is the sale or transfer of property by a 1195
public utility to another person contemporaneously followed by 1196
the leasing of the property to the public utility on a long-term 1197
basis. 1198
(C) The With respect to every public utility, other than 1199
an electric light company that chooses to file a forecasted test 1200
period under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the public 1201
utilities commission shall prescribe the form and details of the 1202
valuation report of the property of each public utility or 1203
railroad in the state. Such report shall include all the kinds 1204
and classes of property, with the value of each, owned, held, 1205
or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage 1206
disposal system company, projected to be owned or held as of the 1207
date certain, by each public utility or railroad used and 1208
useful, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or 1209
sewage disposal system company, projected to be used and useful 1210
as of the date certain, for the service and convenience of the 1211
public. Such 1212

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 43
As Passed by the Senate
(B) Such report shall contain the following facts in 1213
detail: 1214
(1) The original cost of each parcel of land owned in fee 1215
and in use, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or 1216
sewage disposal system company, projected to be owned in fee and 1217
in use as of the date certain, determined by the commission; and 1218
also a statement of the conditions of acquisition, whether by 1219
direct purchase, by donation, by exercise of the power of 1220
eminent domain, or otherwise; 1221
(2) The actual acquisition cost, not including periodic 1222
rental fees, of rights-of-way, trailways, or other land rights 1223
held, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage 1224
disposal system company, projected to be held as of the date 1225
certain, by virtue of easements, leases, or other forms of 1226
grants of rights as to usage; 1227
(3) The original cost of all other kinds and classes of 1228
property used and useful, or, with respect to a natural gas, 1229
water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected to be 1230
used and useful as of the date certain, in the rendition of 1231
service to the public. Subject to section 4909.052 of the 1232
Revised Code, such original costs of property, other than land 1233
owned in fee, shall be the cost, as determined to be reasonable 1234
by the commission, to the person that first dedicated or 1235
dedicates the property to the public use and shall be set forth 1236
in property accounts and subaccounts as prescribed by the 1237
commission. To the extent that the costs of property comprising 1238
a coal research and development facility, as defined in section 1239
1555.01 of the Revised Code, or a coal development project, as 1240
defined in section 1551.30 of the Revised Code, have been 1241
allowed for recovery as Ohio coal research and development costs 1242

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 44
As Passed by the Senate
under section 4905.304 of the Revised Code, none of those costs 1243
shall be included as a cost of property under this division. 1244
(4) The cost of property constituting all or part of a 1245
project leased to or used by the utility, or, with respect to a 1246
natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, 1247
projected to be leased to or used by the utility as of the date 1248
certain, under Chapter 165., 3706., 6121., or 6123. of the 1249
Revised Code and not included under division (C)(3)(B)(3) of 1250
this section exclusive of any interest directly or indirectly 1251
paid by the utility with respect thereto whether or not 1252
capitalized; 1253
(5) In the discretion of the commission, the cost to a 1254
utility, in an amount determined to be reasonable by the 1255
commission, of property constituting all or part of a project 1256
leased to the utility, or, with respect to a natural gas, water- 1257
works, or sewage disposal system company, projected to be leased 1258
to the utility as of the date certain, under a lease purchase 1259
agreement or a leaseback and not included under division (C)(3) 1260
(B)(3) of this section exclusive of any interest directly or 1261
indirectly paid by the utility with respect thereto whether or 1262
not capitalized; 1263
(6) The cost of the replacement of water service lines 1264
incurred by a water-works company under section 4909.173 of the 1265
Revised Code and the water service line replacement 1266
reimbursement amounts provided to customers under section 1267
4909.174 of the Revised Code; 1268
(7) The proper and adequate reserve for depreciation, as 1269
determined to be reasonable by the commission; 1270
(8) Any sums of money or property that the company may 1271

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 45
As Passed by the Senate
have received, or, with respect to a natural gas, water-works, 1272
or sewage disposal system company, is projected to receive as of 1273
the date certain, as total or partial defrayal of the cost of 1274
its property; 1275
(9) The valuation of the property of the company, which 1276
shall be the sum of the amounts contained in the report pursuant 1277
to divisions (C)(1)(B)(1) to (6) of this section, less the sum 1278
of the amounts contained in the report pursuant to divisions (C) 1279
(7)(B)(7) and (8) of this section. 1280
(C) The report shall show separately the property used and 1281
useful to such public utility or railroad in the furnishing of 1282
the service to the public, the property held by such public 1283
utility or railroad for other purposes, and the property 1284
projected to be used and useful to or held by a natural gas, 1285
water-works, or sewage disposal system company as of the date 1286
certain, and such other items as the commission considers 1287
proper. The commission may require an additional report showing 1288
the extent to which the property is used and useful, or, with 1289
respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system 1290
company, projected to be used and useful as of the date certain. 1291
Such reports shall be filed in the office of the commission for 1292
the information of the governor and the general assembly. 1293
Sec. 4909.052. Subject to a finding that such costs are 1294
just and reasonable, the public utilities commission in 1295
evaluating a petition submitted under section 4905.481 of the 1296
Revised Code shall accept the original cost, reported under 1297
division (C)(3) (B)(3) of section 4909.05 of the Revised Code, 1298
of the acquisition of a municipal water-works or sewage disposal 1299
system company that is acquired by a large water-works or sewage 1300
disposal system company, provided that the original cost is 1301

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 46
As Passed by the Senate
determined according to all of the following requirements: 1302
(A) The acquiring company has three appraisals performed 1303
on the property of the company being acquired. 1304
(B) The three appraisals are performed by three 1305
independent utility-valuation experts mutually selected by the 1306
acquiring company and the company being acquired from the list 1307
maintained under section 4909.054 of the Revised Code. 1308
(C) The average of the three appraisals is used as the 1309
fair market value of the company being acquired. 1310
(D) Each utility-valuation expert does all of the 1311
following: 1312
(1) Determines the fair market value of the company to be 1313
acquired by establishing the amount for which the company would 1314
be sold in a voluntary transaction between a willing buyer and a 1315
willing seller under no obligation to buy or sell; 1316
(2) Determines the fair market value in compliance with 1317
the uniform standards of professional appraisal practice; 1318
(3) Employs the cost, market, and income approach to 1319
independently quantify the future benefits of the company to be 1320
acquired; 1321
(4) Incorporates the assessment described in division (D) 1322
(5) of this section into the appraisal under the cost, market, 1323
and income approach; 1324
(5) Engages one engineer who is licensed to prepare an 1325
assessment of the tangible assets of the company to be acquired. 1326
The original source of funding for any part of the tangible 1327
assets shall not be relevant to the determination of the value 1328
of those assets. 1329

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 47
As Passed by the Senate
(E) The lesser of the purchase price or the fair market 1330
value, described in division (C) of this section, is reported as 1331
the original cost under division (C)(3) (B)(3) of section 1332
4909.05 of the Revised Code of the company to be acquired. 1333
Sec. 4909.06. The investigation and report required by 1334
section section 4909.042 or 4909.05 of the Revised Code shall 1335
show, when the public utilities commission deems it necessary, 1336
the amounts, dates, and rates of interest of all bonds 1337
outstanding against each public utility or railroad, the 1338
property upon which such bonds are a lien, the amounts paid for 1339
them, and, the original capital stock and the moneys received by 1340
any such public utility or railroad by reason of any issue of 1341
stock, bonds, or other securities. Such report shall also show 1342
the net and gross receipts of such public utility or railroad 1343
and the method by which moneys were expended or paid out and the 1344
purpose of such payments. The commission may prescribe the 1345
procedure to be followed in making the investigation and 1346
valuation, the form in which the results of the ascertainment of 1347
the value of each public utility or railroad shall be submitted, 1348
and the classifications of the elements that constitute the 1349
ascertained value. Such investigation shall also show the value 1350
of the property of every public utility or railroad as a whole, 1351
and if such property is in more than one county, the value of 1352
its property in each of such counties. 1353
"Valuation" and "value," as used in this section, may 1354
include, with : 1355
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural 1356
gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected 1357
valuation and value as of the date certain, if applicable 1358
because of a future date certain under section 4909.15 of the 1359

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 48
As Passed by the Senate
Revised Code; 1360
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses 1361
to file a forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the 1362
Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test 1363
period. 1364
Sec. 4909.07. The public utilities commission, during the 1365
making of the valuation provided for in sections 4909.04 to 1366
4909.13 of the Revised Code, and after its completion, shall in 1367
like manner keep itself informed through its engineers, experts, 1368
and other assistants of all extensions, improvements, or other 1369
changes in the condition and value of the property of all public 1370
utilities or railroads and shall ascertain the value of such 1371
extensions, improvements, and changes. The commission shall, as 1372
is required for the proper regulation of such public utilities 1373
or railroads, revise and correct its valuations of property, 1374
showing such revisions and corrections as a whole and as to each 1375
county. Such revisions and corrections shall be filed in the 1376
same manner as original reports. 1377
"Valuation" and "value," as used in this section, may 1378
include, with : 1379
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural 1380
gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected 1381
valuation and value as of the date certain, if applicable 1382
because of a future date certain under section 4909.15 of the 1383
Revised Code; 1384
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses 1385
to file a forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the 1386
Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test 1387
period. 1388

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 49
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 4909.08. When the public utilities commission has 1389
completed the valuation of the property of any public utility or 1390
railroad and before such valuation becomes final, it shall give 1391
notice by registered letter to such public utility or railroad, 1392
and if a substantial portion of said public utility or railroad 1393
is situated in a municipal corporation, then to the mayor of 1394
such municipal corporation, stating the valuations placed upon 1395
the several kinds and classes of property of such public utility 1396
or railroad and upon the property as a whole and give such 1397
further notice by publication or otherwise as it shall deem 1398
necessary to apprise the public of such valuation. If, within 1399
thirty days after such notification, no protest has been filed 1400
with the commission, such valuation becomes final. If notice of 1401
protest has been filed by any public utility or railroad, the 1402
commission shall fix a time for hearing such protest and shall 1403
consider at such hearing any matter material thereto presented 1404
by such public utility, railroad, or municipal corporation, in 1405
support of its protest or by any representative of the public 1406
against such protest. If, after the hearing of any protest of 1407
any valuation so fixed, the commission is of the opinion that 1408
its inventory is incomplete or inaccurate or that its valuation 1409
is incorrect, it shall make such changes as are necessary and 1410
shall issue an order making such corrected valuations final. A 1411
final valuation by the commission and all classifications made 1412
for the ascertainment of such valuations shall be public and are 1413
prima-facie evidence relative to the value of the property. 1414
"Valuation" and "value," as used in this section, may 1415
include, with : 1416
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural 1417
gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected 1418
valuation and value as of the date certain, if applicable 1419

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 50
As Passed by the Senate
because of a future date certain under section 4909.15 of the 1420
Revised Code; 1421
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses 1422
to file a forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the 1423
Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test 1424
period. 1425
Sec. 4909.15. (A) The public utilities commission, when 1426
fixing and determining just and reasonable rates, fares, tolls, 1427
rentals, and charges, shall determine: 1428
(1) The (1)(a) With respect to a public utility that is a 1429
natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, or 1430
that is an electric light company that chooses not to file a 1431
forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the Revised 1432
Code, the valuation as of the date certain of the property of 1433
the public utility that is used and useful or, with respect to a 1434
natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, is 1435
projected to be used and useful as of the date certain, in 1436
rendering the public utility service for which rates are to be 1437
fixed and determined. The 1438
(b) With respect to an electric light company that chooses 1439
to file a forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the 1440
Revised Code, the valuation of the property of the utility that 1441
is projected to be used and useful during the forecasted test 1442
period in rendering the public utility service for which rates 1443
are to be fixed and determined. 1444
(c) The valuation so determined under division (A)(1) of 1445
this section for any public utility shall be the total value as 1446
set forth in division (C)(9)(B)(8) of section 4909.042 of the 1447
Revised Code and division (B)(9) of section 4909.05 of the 1448

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 51
As Passed by the Senate
Revised Code, and a reasonable allowance for materials and 1449
supplies and a reasonable allowance for cash working capital as 1450
determined by the commission. 1451
The commission, in its discretion, may include in the 1452
valuation a reasonable allowance for construction work in 1453
progress but, in no event, may such an allowance be made by the 1454
commission until it has determined that the particular 1455
construction project is at least seventy-five per cent complete. 1456
In determining the percentage completion of a particular 1457
construction project, the commission shall consider, among other 1458
relevant criteria, the per cent of time elapsed in construction; 1459
the per cent of construction funds, excluding allowance for 1460
funds used during construction, expended, or obligated to such 1461
construction funds budgeted where all such funds are adjusted to 1462
reflect current purchasing power; and any physical inspection 1463
performed by or on behalf of any party, including the 1464
commission's staff. 1465
A reasonable allowance for construction work in progress 1466
shall not exceed ten per cent of the total valuation as stated 1467
in this division, not including such allowance for construction 1468
work in progress. 1469
Where the commission permits an allowance for construction 1470
work in progress, the dollar value of the project or portion 1471
thereof included in the valuation as construction work in 1472
progress shall not be included in the valuation as plant in 1473
service until such time as the total revenue effect of the 1474
construction work in progress allowance is offset by the total 1475
revenue effect of the plant in service exclusion. Carrying 1476
charges calculated in a manner similar to allowance for funds 1477
used during construction shall accrue on that portion of the 1478

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 52
As Passed by the Senate
project in service but not reflected in rates as plant in 1479
service, and such accrued carrying charges shall be included in 1480
the valuation of the property at the conclusion of the offset 1481
period for purposes of division (C)(9) of section 4909.05 of the 1482
Revised Code. 1483
From and after April 10, 1985, no allowance for 1484
construction work in progress as it relates to a particular 1485
construction project shall be reflected in rates for a period 1486
exceeding forty-eight consecutive months commencing on the date 1487
the initial rates reflecting such allowance become effective, 1488
except as otherwise provided in this division. 1489
The applicable maximum period in rates for an allowance 1490
for construction work in progress as it relates to a particular 1491
construction project shall be tolled if, and to the extent, a 1492
delay in the in-service date of the project is caused by the 1493
action or inaction of any federal, state, county, or municipal 1494
agency having jurisdiction, where such action or inaction 1495
relates to a change in a rule, standard, or approval of such 1496
agency, and where such action or inaction is not the result of 1497
the failure of the utility to reasonably endeavor to comply with 1498
any rule, standard, or approval prior to such change. 1499
In the event that such period expires before the project 1500
goes into service, the commission shall exclude, from the date 1501
of expiration, the allowance for the project as construction 1502
work in progress from rates, except that the commission may 1503
extend the expiration date up to twelve months for good cause 1504
shown. 1505
In the event that a utility has permanently canceled, 1506
abandoned, or terminated construction of a project for which it 1507
was previously permitted a construction work in progress 1508

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 53
As Passed by the Senate
allowance, the commission immediately shall exclude the 1509
allowance for the project from the valuation. 1510
In the event that a construction work in progress project 1511
previously included in the valuation is removed from the 1512
valuation pursuant to this division, any revenues collected by 1513
the utility from its customers after April 10, 1985, that 1514
resulted from such prior inclusion shall be offset against 1515
future revenues over the same period of time as the project was 1516
included in the valuation as construction work in progress. The 1517
total revenue effect of such offset shall not exceed the total 1518
revenues previously collected. 1519
In no event shall the total revenue effect of any offset 1520
or offsets provided under division (A)(1) of this section exceed 1521
the total revenue effect of any construction work in progress 1522
allowance. 1523
(2) A fair and reasonable rate of return to the utility on 1524
the valuation as determined in division (A)(1) of this section; 1525
(3) The dollar annual return to which the utility is 1526
entitled by applying the fair and reasonable rate of return as 1527
determined under division (A)(2) of this section to the 1528
valuation of the utility determined under division (A)(1) of 1529
this section; 1530
(4) The cost to the utility of rendering the public 1531
utility service for the test period used for the determination 1532
under division (C)(1) of this section, less the total of any 1533
interest on cash or credit refunds paid, pursuant to section 1534
4909.42 of the Revised Code, by the utility during the test 1535
period. 1536
(a) Federal, state, and local taxes imposed on or measured 1537

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 54
As Passed by the Senate
by net income may, in the discretion of the commission, be 1538
computed by the normalization method of accounting, provided the 1539
utility maintains accounting reserves that reflect differences 1540
between taxes actually payable and taxes on a normalized basis, 1541
provided that no determination as to the treatment in the rate- 1542
making process of such taxes shall be made that will result in 1543
loss of any tax depreciation or other tax benefit to which the 1544
utility would otherwise be entitled, and further provided that 1545
such tax benefit as redounds to the utility as a result of such 1546
a computation may not be retained by the company, used to fund 1547
any dividend or distribution, or utilized for any purpose other 1548
than the defrayal of the operating expenses of the utility and 1549
the defrayal of the expenses of the utility in connection with 1550
construction work. 1551
(b) The amount of any tax credits granted to an electric 1552
light company under section 5727.391 of the Revised Code for 1553
Ohio coal burned prior to January 1, 2000, shall not be retained 1554
by the company, used to fund any dividend or distribution, or 1555
utilized for any purposes other than the defrayal of the 1556
allowable operating expenses of the company and the defrayal of 1557
the allowable expenses of the company in connection with the 1558
installation, acquisition, construction, or use of a compliance 1559
facility. The amount of the tax credits granted to an electric 1560
light company under that section for Ohio coal burned prior to 1561
January 1, 2000, shall be returned to its customers within three 1562
years after initially claiming the credit through an offset to 1563
the company's rates or fuel component, as determined by the 1564
commission, as set forth in schedules filed by the company under 1565
section 4905.30 of the Revised Code. As used in division (A)(4) 1566
(b) of this section, "compliance facility" has the same meaning 1567
as in section 5727.391 of the Revised Code. 1568

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 55
As Passed by the Senate
(B) The commission shall compute the gross annual revenues 1569
to which the utility is entitled by adding the dollar amount of 1570
return under division (A)(3) of this section to the cost, for 1571
the test period used for the determination under division (C)(1) 1572
of this section, of rendering the public utility service under 1573
division (A)(4) of this section. 1574
(C)(1) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, 1575
the revenues and expenses of the utility shall be determined 1576
during a test period. The utility may as follows: 1577
(a) Electric light companies may propose a forecasted test 1578
period. If the company proposes a forecasted test period, the 1579
company shall propose annual base rates for three consecutive 1580
twelve-month periods in a single forecasted test period 1581
application. During the first twelve-month period, the company 1582
may propose a reasonably forecasted rate base during a thirteen- 1583
month average, revenues, and expenses for the first twelve 1584
months that new base rates will be in effect. 1585
During the second twelve-month period, the base rate 1586
revenue requirement shall be adjusted for the return of, and 1587
return on, incremental rate base additions approved by the 1588
commission in the initial application. During the third twelve- 1589
month period, the base rate revenue requirement may be adjusted 1590
for the return of and return on incremental rate base additions 1591
approved by the commission in the initial application. 1592
For each twelve-month period, forecasted plant investment, 1593
forecasted revenue, and forecasted expenses versus actual 1594
investment, actual revenue, and actual expenses shall be trued 1595
up via a cost recovery mechanism approved by the commission. 1596
Each true-up process shall include an adjustment to actual 1597

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 56
As Passed by the Senate
for the rate of return that the company is authorized to earn on 1598
the actual investments made. The company shall provide the 1599
commission with actual financial information during the true-up 1600
process to ensure accuracy. As part of the true-up process, the 1601
commission shall include only rate base components that have 1602
been found by the commission to be used and useful in rendering 1603
public utility service. 1604
(b) All utilities, except for electric light companies 1605
that choose to file under division (C)(1)(a) of this section, 1606
shall propose a test period for this determination that is any 1607
twelve-month period beginning not more than six months prior to 1608
the date the application is filed and ending not more than nine 1609
months subsequent to that date. The test period for determining 1610
revenues and expenses of the utility shall be the test period 1611
proposed by the utility, unless otherwise ordered by the 1612
commission. 1613
(2) The For utilities filing under division (C)(1)(b) of 1614
this section, the date certain shall be not later than the date 1615
of filing, except that it shall be, for a natural gas, water- 1616
works, or sewage disposal system company, not later than the end 1617
of the test period. 1618
(D) A natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system 1619
company Utilities filing under division (C)(1)(b) of this 1620
section may propose adjustments to the revenues and expenses to 1621
be determined under division (C)(1) of this section for any 1622
changes that are, during the test period or the twelve-month 1623
period immediately following the test period, reasonably 1624
expected to occur. The natural gas, water-works, or sewage 1625
disposal system company utility shall identify and quantify, 1626
individually, any proposed adjustments. The commission shall 1627

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 57
As Passed by the Senate
incorporate the proposed adjustments into the determination if 1628
the adjustments are just and reasonable. 1629
(E) When the commission is of the opinion, after hearing 1630
and after making the determinations under divisions (A) and (B) 1631
of this section, that any rate, fare, charge, toll, rental, 1632
schedule, classification, or service, or any joint rate, fare, 1633
charge, toll, rental, schedule, classification, or service 1634
rendered, charged, demanded, exacted, or proposed to be 1635
rendered, charged, demanded, or exacted, is, or will be, unjust, 1636
unreasonable, unjustly discriminatory, unjustly preferential, or 1637
in violation of law, that the service is, or will be, 1638
inadequate, or that the maximum rates, charges, tolls, or 1639
rentals chargeable by any such public utility are insufficient 1640
to yield reasonable compensation for the service rendered, and 1641
are unjust and unreasonable, the commission shall: 1642
(1) With due regard among other things to the value of all 1643
property of the public utility actually used and useful for the 1644
convenience of the public as determined under division (A)(1) of 1645
this section, excluding from such value the value of any 1646
franchise or right to own, operate, or enjoy the same in excess 1647
of the amount, exclusive of any tax or annual charge, actually 1648
paid to any political subdivision of the state or county, as the 1649
consideration for the grant of such franchise or right, and 1650
excluding any value added to such property by reason of a 1651
monopoly or merger, with due regard in determining the dollar 1652
annual return under division (A)(3) of this section to the 1653
necessity of making reservation out of the income for surplus, 1654
depreciation, and contingencies, and; 1655
(2) With due regard to all such other matters as are 1656
proper, according to the facts in each case, 1657

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 58
As Passed by the Senate
(a) Including a fair and reasonable rate of return 1658
determined by the commission with reference to a cost of debt 1659
equal to the actual embedded cost of debt of such public 1660
utility, 1661
(b) But not including the portion of any periodic rental 1662
or use payments representing that cost of property that is 1663
included in the valuation report under divisions (C)(4)(B)(4) 1664
and (5) of section 4909.042 of the Revised Code and divisions 1665
(B)(4) and (5) of section 4909.05 of the Revised Code, fix and 1666
determine the just and reasonable rate, fare, charge, toll, 1667
rental, or service to be rendered, charged, demanded, exacted, 1668
or collected for the performance or rendition of the service 1669
that will provide the public utility the allowable gross annual 1670
revenues under division (B) of this section, and order such just 1671
and reasonable rate, fare, charge, toll, rental, or service to 1672
be substituted for the existing one. After such determination 1673
and order no change in the rate, fare, toll, charge, rental, 1674
schedule, classification, or service shall be made, rendered, 1675
charged, demanded, exacted, or changed by such public utility 1676
without the order of the commission, and any other rate, fare, 1677
toll, charge, rental, classification, or service is prohibited. 1678
(F) Upon application of any person or any public utility, 1679
and after notice to the parties in interest and opportunity to 1680
be heard as provided in Chapters 4901., 4903., 4905., 4907., 1681
4909., 4921., and 4923. of the Revised Code for other hearings, 1682
has been given, the commission may rescind, alter, or amend an 1683
order fixing any rate, fare, toll, charge, rental, 1684
classification, or service, or any other order made by the 1685
commission. Certified copies of such orders shall be served and 1686
take effect as provided for original orders. 1687

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 59
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 4909.156. In fixing the just, reasonable, and 1688
compensatory rates, joint rates, tolls, classifications, 1689
charges, or rentals to be observed and charged for service by 1690
any public utility, the public utilities commission shall, in 1691
action upon an application filed pursuant to section 4909.18 of 1692
the Revised Code, require a public utility to file a report 1693
showing the proportionate amounts of the valuation of the 1694
property of the utility, as determined under section 4909.042 or 1695
4909.05 of the Revised Code, and the proportionate amounts of 1696
the revenues and expenses of the utility that are proposed to be 1697
considered as attributable to the service area involved in the 1698
application. 1699
"Valuation," as used in this section, may include, with : 1700
(A) With respect to a public utility that is a natural 1701
gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company, projected 1702
valuation as of the date certain, if applicable because of a 1703
future date certain under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code; 1704
(B) With respect to an electric light company that chooses 1705
to file a forecasted test period under section 4909.18 of the 1706
Revised Code, the valuation and value during the forecasted test 1707
period. 1708
Sec. 4909.173. (A) As used in this section and section 1709
4909.174 of the Revised Code: 1710
(1) "Customer-owned water service line" means the water 1711
service line connected to the water-works company's water 1712
service line at the curb of a customer's property. 1713
(2) "Water-works company" means an entity defined under 1714
division (G) of section 4905.03 of the Revised Code that is a 1715
public utility under section 4905.02 of the Revised Code. 1716

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 60
As Passed by the Senate
(B) A water-works company may do any of the following: 1717
(1) Replace lead customer-owned water service lines 1718
concurrently with a scheduled utility main replacement project, 1719
an emergency replacement, or company-initiated lead water 1720
service line replacement program; 1721
(2) Replace lead customer-owned water service lines when 1722
mandated or ordered to replace such lines by law or a state or 1723
federal regulatory agency; 1724
(3) Replace customer-owned water service lines of other 1725
composition when mandated or ordered to replace such lines by 1726
law or a state or federal regulatory agency. 1727
(C) If a water-works company replaces customer-owned water 1728
service lines under this section, then the company shall include 1729
the cost of the replacement of the water service lines, 1730
including the cost of replacement of both company side and 1731
customer-owned water service lines and the cost to evaluate 1732
customer-owned water service lines of unknown composition, in 1733
the valuation report of the property of the company as required 1734
under division (C)(6)(B)(6) of section 4909.05 of the Revised 1735
Code for inclusion in a rate case under this chapter. 1736
(D) The water service customer who is responsible for the 1737
customer-owned water service line that was replaced under this 1738
section shall hold legal title to the replaced water service 1739
line. 1740
Sec. 4909.174. (A) A water-works company shall reimburse a 1741
customer who replaces the customer's customer-owned water 1742
service line, if both of the following occur: 1743
(1) The company confirms that the customer-owned water 1744
service line was composed of lead or other composition that was 1745

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 61
As Passed by the Senate
mandated or ordered to be replaced by law or a state or federal 1746
regulatory agency; 1747
(2) The customer submits the reimbursement request to the 1748
company not later than twelve months after the completion of the 1749
water line replacement. 1750
(B) A water-works company that provides a reimbursement to 1751
a customer under this section shall include the reimbursement 1752
amount in the valuation report of the property of the company as 1753
required under division (C)(6)(B)(6) of section 4909.05 of the 1754
Revised Code for inclusion in a rate case under this chapter. 1755
Sec. 4909.18. Any public utility desiring to establish any 1756
rate, joint rate, toll, classification, charge, or rental, or to 1757
modify, amend, change, increase, or reduce any existing rate, 1758
joint rate, toll, classification, charge, or rental, or any 1759
regulation or practice affecting the same, shall file a written 1760
application with the public utilities commission. Except for 1761
actions under section 4909.16 of the Revised Code, no public 1762
utility may issue the notice of intent to file an application 1763
pursuant to division (B) of section 4909.43 of the Revised Code 1764
to increase any existing rate, joint rate, toll, classification, 1765
charge, or rental, until a final order under this section has 1766
been issued by the commission on any pending prior application 1767
to increase the same rate, joint rate, toll, classification, 1768
charge, or rental or until two hundred seventy-five days after 1769
filing such application, whichever is sooner. Such application 1770
shall be verified by the president or a vice-president and the 1771
secretary or treasurer of the applicant. Such application shall 1772
contain a schedule of the existing rate, joint rate, toll, 1773
classification, charge, or rental, or regulation or practice 1774
affecting the same, a schedule of the modification amendment, 1775

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 62
As Passed by the Senate
change, increase, or reduction sought to be established, and a 1776
statement of the facts and grounds upon which such application 1777
is based. If such application proposes a new service or the use 1778
of new equipment, or proposes the establishment or amendment of 1779
a regulation, the application shall fully describe the new 1780
service or equipment, or the regulation proposed to be 1781
established or amended, and shall explain how the proposed 1782
service or equipment differs from services or equipment 1783
presently offered or in use, or how the regulation proposed to 1784
be established or amended differs from regulations presently in 1785
effect. The application shall provide such additional 1786
information as the commission may require in its discretion. If 1787
the commission determines that such application is not for an 1788
increase in any rate, joint rate, toll, classification, charge, 1789
or rental, the commission may permit the filing of the schedule 1790
proposed in the application and fix the time when such schedule 1791
shall take effect. If it appears to the commission that the 1792
proposals in the application may be unjust or unreasonable, the 1793
commission shall set the matter for hearing and shall give 1794
notice of such hearing by sending written notice of the date set 1795
for the hearing to the public utility and publishing notice of 1796
the hearing one time in a newspaper of general circulation in 1797
each county in the service area affected by the application. At 1798
such hearing, the burden of proof to show that the proposals in 1799
the application are just and reasonable shall be upon the public 1800
utility. After such hearing, the commission shall, where 1801
practicable, issue an appropriate order within six months from 1802
the date the application was filed. 1803
If the commission determines that said application is for 1804
an increase in any rate, joint rate, toll, classification, 1805
charge, or rental there shall also, unless otherwise ordered by 1806

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 63
As Passed by the Senate
the commission, be filed with the application in duplicate the 1807
following exhibits: 1808
(A) A report of its property used and useful, or, with 1809
respect to a natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system 1810
company, projected to be used and useful, as of the date 1811
certain, or during the forecasted test period, if the 1812
application is filed under division (C)(1)(a) of section 4909.15 1813
of the Revised Code, in rendering the service referred to in 1814
such application, as provided in section sections 4909.042 and 1815
4909.05 of the Revised Code; 1816
(B) A complete operating statement of its last fiscal 1817
year, showing in detail all its receipts, revenues, and incomes 1818
from all sources, all of its operating costs and other 1819
expenditures, and any analysis such public utility deems 1820
applicable to the matter referred to in said application; 1821
(C) A statement of the income and expense anticipated 1822
under the application filed; 1823
(D) A statement of financial condition summarizing assets, 1824
liabilities, and net worth; 1825
(E) Such other information as the commission may require 1826
in its discretion. 1827
Sec. 4909.181. (A) As used in this section, "electric 1828
distribution utility" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 1829
of the Revised Code. 1830
(B) Not later than December 31, 2029, and at least every 1831
three years thereafter, each electric distribution utility shall 1832
file a rate case application regarding distribution service 1833
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code. 1834

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 64
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 4909.19. (A) Upon the filing of any application for 1835
increase provided for by section 4909.18 of the Revised Code the 1836
public utility shall forthwith publish notice of such 1837
application, in a form approved by the public utilities 1838
commission, once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper 1839
published and in general circulation throughout the territory in 1840
which such public utility operates and directly affected by the 1841
matters referred to in said application. The notice shall 1842
include instructions for direct electronic access to the 1843
application or other documents on file with the public utilities 1844
commission. The first publication of the notice shall be made in 1845
its entirety and may be made in a preprinted insert in the 1846
newspaper. The second publication may be abbreviated if all of 1847
the following apply: 1848
(1) The abbreviated notice is at least one-fourth of the 1849
size of the notice in the first publication. 1850
(2) At the same time the abbreviated notice is published, 1851
the notice in the first publication is posted in its entirety on 1852
the newspaper's web site, if the newspaper has a web site, and 1853
the commission's web site. 1854
(3) The abbreviated notice contains a statement of the web 1855
site posting or postings, as applicable, and instructions for 1856
accessing the posting or postings. 1857
(B) The commission shall determine a format for the 1858
content of all notices required under this section, and shall 1859
consider costs and technological efficiencies in making that 1860
determination. Defects in the publication of said notice shall 1861
not affect the legality or sufficiency of notices published 1862
under this section provided that the commission has 1863
substantially complied with this section, as described in 1864

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 65
As Passed by the Senate
section 4905.09 of the Revised Code. 1865
(C) The commission shall at once cause an investigation to 1866
be made of the facts set forth in said application and the 1867
exhibits attached thereto, and of the matters connected 1868
therewith. Within a reasonable time as determined by the 1869
commission one hundred eighty days after the filing of such 1870
application is determined to be complete, a written report shall 1871
be made and filed with the commission, a copy of which shall be 1872
sent by certified mail to the applicant, the mayor of any 1873
municipal corporation affected by the application, and to such 1874
other persons as the commission deems interested. If no 1875
objection to such report is made by any party interested within 1876
thirty days after such filing and the mailing of copies thereof, 1877
the commission shall fix a date within ten days for the final 1878
hearing upon said application, giving notice thereof to all 1879
parties interested. At such hearing the commission shall 1880
consider the matters set forth in said application and make such 1881
order respecting the prayer thereof as to it seems just and 1882
reasonable. 1883
If objections are filed with the commission, the 1884
commission shall cause a pre-hearing conference to be held 1885
between all parties, intervenors, and the commission staff in 1886
all cases involving more than one hundred thousand customers. 1887
If objections are filed with the commission within thirty 1888
days after the filing of such report, the application shall be 1889
promptly set down for hearing of testimony before the commission 1890
or be forthwith referred to an attorney examiner designated by 1891
the commission to take all the testimony with respect to the 1892
application and objections which may be offered by any 1893
interested party. The commission shall also fix the time and 1894

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 66
As Passed by the Senate
place to take testimony giving ten days' written notice of such 1895
time and place to all parties. The taking of testimony shall 1896
commence on the date fixed in said notice and shall continue 1897
from day to day until completed. The attorney examiner may, upon 1898
good cause shown, grant continuances for not more than three 1899
days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The commission 1900
may grant continuances for a longer period than three days upon 1901
its order for good cause shown. At any hearing involving rates 1902
or charges sought to be increased, the burden of proof to show 1903
that the increased rates or charges are just and reasonable 1904
shall be on the public utility. 1905
When the taking of testimony is completed, a full and 1906
complete record of such testimony noting all objections made and 1907
exceptions taken by any party or counsel, shall be made, signed 1908
by the attorney examiner, and filed with the commission. Prior 1909
to the formal consideration of the application by the commission 1910
and the rendition of any order respecting the prayer of the 1911
application, a quorum of the commission shall consider the 1912
recommended opinion and order of the attorney examiner, in an 1913
open, formal, public proceeding in which an overview and 1914
explanation is presented orally. Thereafter, the commission 1915
shall make such order respecting the prayer of such application 1916
as seems just and reasonable to it. 1917
In all proceedings before the commission in which the 1918
taking of testimony is required, except when heard by the 1919
commission, attorney examiners shall be assigned by the 1920
commission to take such testimony and fix the time and place 1921
therefor, and such testimony shall be taken in the manner 1922
prescribed in this section. All testimony shall be under oath or 1923
affirmation and taken down and transcribed by a reporter and 1924
made a part of the record in the case. The commission may hear 1925

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 67
As Passed by the Senate
the testimony or any part thereof in any case without having the 1926
same referred to an attorney examiner and may take additional 1927
testimony. Testimony shall be taken and a record made in 1928
accordance with such general rules as the commission prescribes 1929
and subject to such special instructions in any proceedings as 1930
it, by order, directs. 1931
Sec. 4909.191. (A) If the public utilities commission, 1932
under division (D) of section 4909.15 of the Revised Code, 1933
incorporated proposed adjustments to revenues and expenses into 1934
the commission's determination under that section, the natural 1935
gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company public 1936
utility shall, not later than ninety days after actual data for 1937
all of the incorporated adjustments becomes known, submit to the 1938
commission proposed rate or charge adjustments that provide for 1939
the recalculation of rates or charges, reflective of customer- 1940
class responsibility, corresponding to the differences, if any, 1941
between the incorporated adjustments to revenues and expenses 1942
and the actual revenues and expenses associated with the 1943
incorporated adjustments. 1944
(B) If the commission incorporated projected value or 1945
valuation of property into the commission's determination under 1946
division (A)(1)(A)(1)(a) of section 4909.15 of the Revised Code, 1947
the natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system company 1948
shall, not later than ninety days after data for the actual 1949
value or valuation as of the date certain becomes known, submit 1950
to the commission proposed rate or charge adjustments that 1951
provide for the recalculation of rates or charges, reflective of 1952
customer-class responsibility, corresponding to the differences, 1953
if any, between the projected value or valuation incorporated 1954
into the commission's determination and the actual value or 1955
valuation as of the date certain. 1956

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 68
As Passed by the Senate
(C) The commission shall review the proposed rate or 1957
charge adjustments submitted under divisions (A) and (B) of this 1958
section. The review shall not include a hearing unless the 1959
commission finds that the proposed rate or charge adjustments 1960
may be unreasonable, in which case the commission may, in its 1961
discretion, schedule the matter for a hearing. 1962
(D) The commission shall issue, not later than one hundred 1963
fifty days after the date that any proposed rate or charge 1964
adjustments are submitted under division (A) or (B) of this 1965
section, a final order on the proposed rate or charge 1966
adjustments. Any rate or charge adjustments authorized under 1967
this division shall be limited to amounts that are not greater 1968
than those consistent with the proposed adjustments to revenues 1969
and expenses that were incorporated into the commission's 1970
determination under division (D) of section 4909.15 of the 1971
Revised Code, and not greater than those consistent with the 1972
incorporated projected value or valuation. In no event shall 1973
rate or charge adjustments authorized under this division be 1974
upward. 1975
After the commission has issued such a final order, the 1976
natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system 1977
companypublic utility, if applicable, shall submit to the 1978
commission proposed reconciliation adjustments that refund to 1979
customers the difference between the actual revenues collected 1980
by the natural gas, water-works, or sewage disposal system 1981
company,utility under the rates and charges determined by the 1982
commission under section 4909.15 of the Revised Code, and the 1983
rates or charges recalculated under the adjustments authorized 1984
under this division. The reconciliation adjustments shall be 1985
effective for a twelve-month period. 1986

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 69
As Passed by the Senate
(E) The reconciliation adjustments ordered under division 1987
(D) of this section may be subject to a final reconciliation by 1988
the commission. Any such final reconciliation shall occur after 1989
the twelve-month period described in division (D) of this 1990
section. 1991
Sec. 4909.192. When considering an application to increas e 1992
rates under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, the public 1993
utilities commission may approve the following: 1994
(A) Nondiscriminatory programs available for all energy- 1995
intensive customers to implement economic development, job 1996
growth, job retention, or interruptible rates that enhance 1997
distribution and transmission grid reliability and promote 1998
economic development. 1999
(B) Nondiscriminatory programs available for all 2000
mercantile customers, as defined in section 4928.01 of the 2001
Revised Code, that align retail rate recovery with how 2002
transmission costs are incurred by or charged to the electric 2003
distribution utility, as defined in section 4928.01 of the 2004
Revised Code, or programs that allow customers to be billed 2005
directly for transmission service by a competitive retail 2006
electric service provider. 2007
(C) Nondiscriminatory programs available for residential 2008
customers and small commercial customers, as defined in section 2009
4928.101 of the Revised Code, that reduce demand at peak times 2010
for purposes of grid reliability or to help lower customer 2011
rates, including peak demand reduction programs under section 2012
4928.107 of the Revised Code. Any programs to reduce demand 2013
proposed in an application to increase rates shall include terms 2014
permitting competitive retail electric service providers, 2015
certified under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, to offer 2016

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 70
As Passed by the Senate
their customers access to these programs. 2017
Sec. 4909.193. The public utilities commission shall 2018
determine whether an application for an increase filed under 2019
section 4909.18 of the Revised Code is complete not more than 2020
forty-five days after the application is filed. If the 2021
commission does not issue a determination within the time period 2022
required by this section, the application shall be deemed 2023
complete by operation of law. 2024
Sec. 4909.42. If the proceeding on an application filed 2025
with the public utilities commission under section 4909.18 of 2026
the Revised Code by any public utility requesting an increase on 2027
any rate, rate mechanism, joint rate, toll, classification, 2028
charge, or rental or requesting a change in a regulation or 2029
practice affecting the same has not been concluded and an order 2030
entered pursuant to section 4909.19 of the Revised Code at the 2031
expiration of two hundred seventy-five two hundred ninety days 2032
from the date of filing the application is determined complete, 2033
an the public utility may request a temporary increase not to 2034
exceed the proposed increase and any party to the proceeding may 2035
request a temporary decrease, which shall go into effect upon 2036
the filing of a bond or a letter of credit by the public 2037
utilityand remain in effect until modified in accordance with 2038
the commission's determination on the merits of the application. 2039
The bond or letter of credit shall be filed with the commission 2040
and shall be payable to the state for the use and benefit of the 2041
customers affected by the proposed increase or changeIf the 2042
commission does not issue an order within three hundred twenty 2043
days after the application is deemed complete, the application 2044
shall be deemed approved by operation of law. A temporary 2045
increase or decrease under this section shall not exceed the 2046
midpoint of the rates recommended in the staff report filed 2047

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 71
As Passed by the Senate
pursuant to section 4909.19 of the Revised Code and is subject 2048
to refund. 2049
An affidavit attached to the bond or letter of credit must 2050
be signed by two of the officers of the utility, under oath, and 2051
must contain a promise on behalf of the utility to refund any 2052
amounts collected by the utility over the rate, joint rate, 2053
toll, classification, charge, or rental, as determined in the 2054
final order of the commission. All refunds shall include 2055
interest at the rate stated in section 1343.03 of the Revised 2056
Code. The refund shall be in the form of a temporary reduction 2057
in rates following the final order of the commission, and shall 2058
be accomplished in such manner as shall be prescribed by the 2059
commission in its final order. The commission shall exercise 2060
continuing and exclusive jurisdiction over such refunds. 2061
If the public utilities commission has not entered a final 2062
order within five hundred forty-five days from the date of the 2063
filing of an application for an increase in rates under section 2064
4909.18 of the Revised Code, a public utility shall have no 2065
obligation to make a refund of amounts collected after the five 2066
hundred forty-fifth day which exceed the amounts authorized by 2067
the commission's final order. 2068
Nothing in this section shall be construed to mitigate any 2069
duty of the commission to issue a final order under section 2070
4909.19 of the Revised Code. 2071
Sec. 4928.01. (A) As used in this chapter: 2072
(1) "Ancillary service" means any function necessary to 2073
the provision of electric transmission or distribution service 2074
to a retail customer and includes, but is not limited to, 2075
scheduling, system control, and dispatch services; reactive 2076

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 72
As Passed by the Senate
supply from generation resources and voltage control service; 2077
reactive supply from transmission resources service; regulation 2078
service; frequency response service; energy imbalance service; 2079
operating reserve-spinning reserve service; operating reserve- 2080
supplemental reserve service; load following; back-up supply 2081
service; real-power loss replacement service; dynamic 2082
scheduling; system black start capability; and network stability 2083
service. 2084
(2) "Billing and collection agent" means a fully 2085
independent agent, not affiliated with or otherwise controlled 2086
by an electric utility, electric services company, electric 2087
cooperative, or governmental aggregator subject to certification 2088
under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, to the extent that 2089
the agent is under contract with such utility, company, 2090
cooperative, or aggregator solely to provide billing and 2091
collection for retail electric service on behalf of the utility 2092
company, cooperative, or aggregator. 2093
(3) "Certified territory" means the certified territory 2094
established for an electric supplier under sections 4933.81 to 2095
4933.90 of the Revised Code. 2096
(4) "Competitive retail electric service" means a 2097
component of retail electric service that is competitive as 2098
provided under division (B) of this section. 2099
(5) "Electric cooperative" means a not-for-profit electric 2100
light company that both is or has been financed in whole or in 2101
part under the "Rural Electrification Act of 1936," 49 Stat. 2102
1363, 7 U.S.C. 901, and owns or operates facilities in this 2103
state to generate, transmit, or distribute electricity, or a 2104
not-for-profit successor of such company. 2105

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 73
As Passed by the Senate
(6) "Electric distribution utility" means an electric 2106
utility that supplies at least retail electric distribution 2107
service and does not own or operate an electric generating 2108
facility. 2109
(7) "Electric light company" has the same meaning as in 2110
section 4905.03 of the Revised Code and includes an electric 2111
services company, but excludes any self-generator to the extent 2112
that it consumes electricity it so produces, sells that 2113
electricity for resale, or obtains electricity from a generating 2114
facility it hosts on its premises. 2115
(8) "Electric load center" has the same meaning as in 2116
section 4933.81 of the Revised Code. 2117
(9) "Electric services company" means an electric light 2118
company that is engaged on a for-profit or not-for-profit basis 2119
in the business of supplying or arranging for the supply of only 2120
a competitive retail electric service in this state. "Electric 2121
services company" includes a power marketer, power broker, 2122
aggregator, or independent power producer but excludes an 2123
electric cooperative, municipal electric utility, governmental 2124
aggregator, or billing and collection agent. 2125
(10) "Electric supplier" has the same meaning as in 2126
section 4933.81 of the Revised Code. 2127
(11) "Electric utility" means an electric light company 2128
that has a certified territory and is engaged on a for-profit 2129
basis either in the business of supplying at least a 2130
noncompetitive retail electric service in this state or in the 2131
businesses of supplying both a noncompetitive and a competitive 2132
retail electric service in this state. "Electric utility" 2133
excludes a municipal electric utility or a billing and 2134

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 74
As Passed by the Senate
collection agent. 2135
(12) "Firm electric service" means electric service other 2136
than nonfirm electric service. 2137
(13) "Governmental aggregator" means a legislative 2138
authority of a municipal corporation, a board of township 2139
trustees, or a board of county commissioners acting as an 2140
aggregator for the provision of a competitive retail electric 2141
service under authority conferred under section 4928.20 of the 2142
Revised Code. 2143
(14) A person acts "knowingly," regardless of the person's 2144
purpose, when the person is aware that the person's conduct will 2145
probably cause a certain result or will probably be of a certain 2146
nature. A person has knowledge of circumstances when the person 2147
is aware that such circumstances probably exist. 2148
(15) "Level of funding for low-income customer energy 2149
efficiency programs provided through electric utility rates" 2150
means the level of funds specifically included in an electric 2151
utility's rates on October 5, 1999, pursuant to an order of the 2152
public utilities commission issued under Chapter 4905. or 4909. 2153
of the Revised Code and in effect on October 4, 1999, for the 2154
purpose of improving the energy efficiency of housing for the 2155
utility's low-income customers. The term excludes the level of 2156
any such funds committed to a specific nonprofit organization or 2157
organizations pursuant to a stipulation or contract. 2158
(16) "Low-income customer assistance programs" means the 2159
percentage of income payment plan program, the home energy 2160
assistance program, the home weatherization assistance program, 2161
and the targeted energy efficiency and weatherization program. 2162
(17) "Market development period" for an electric utility 2163

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 75
As Passed by the Senate
means the period of time beginning on the starting date of 2164
competitive retail electric service and ending on the applicable 2165
date for that utility as specified in section 4928.40 of the 2166
Revised Code, irrespective of whether the utility applies to 2167
receive transition revenues under this chapter. 2168
(18) "Market power" means the ability to impose on 2169
customers a sustained price for a product or service above the 2170
price that would prevail in a competitive market. 2171
(19) "Mercantile customer" means a commercial or 2172
industrial customer if the electricity consumed is for 2173
nonresidential use and the customer consumes more than seven 2174
hundred thousand kilowatt hours per year or is part of a 2175
national account involving multiple facilities in one or more 2176
states. 2177
(20) "Municipal electric utility" means a municipal 2178
corporation that owns or operates facilities to generate, 2179
transmit, or distribute electricity. 2180
(21) "Noncompetitive retail electric service" means a 2181
component of retail electric service that is noncompetitive as 2182
provided under division (B) of this section. 2183
(22) "Nonfirm electric service" means electric service 2184
provided pursuant to a schedule filed under section 4905.30 of 2185
the Revised Code or pursuant to an arrangement under section 2186
4905.31 of the Revised Code, which schedule or arrangement 2187
includes conditions that may require the customer to curtail or 2188
interrupt electric usage during nonemergency circumstances upon 2189
notification by an electric utility. 2190
(23) "Percentage of income payment plan arrears" means 2191
funds eligible for collection through the percentage of income 2192

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 76
As Passed by the Senate
payment plan rider, but uncollected as of July 1, 2000. 2193
(24) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of 2194
the Revised Code. 2195
(25) "Advanced energy project" means any technologies, 2196
products, activities, or management practices or strategies that 2197
facilitate the generation or use of electricity or energy and 2198
that reduce or support the reduction of energy consumption or 2199
support the production of clean, renewable energy for 2200
industrial, distribution, commercial, institutional, 2201
governmental, research, not-for-profit, or residential energy 2202
users, including, but not limited to, advanced energy resources 2203
and renewable energy resources. "Advanced energy project" also 2204
includes any project described in division (A), (B), or (C) of 2205
section 4928.621 of the Revised Code. 2206
(26) "Regulatory assets" means the unamortized net 2207
regulatory assets that are capitalized or deferred on the 2208
regulatory books of the electric utility, pursuant to an order 2209
or practice of the public utilities commission or pursuant to 2210
generally accepted accounting principles as a result of a prior 2211
commission rate-making decision, and that would otherwise have 2212
been charged to expense as incurred or would not have been 2213
capitalized or otherwise deferred for future regulatory 2214
consideration absent commission action. "Regulatory assets" 2215
includes, but is not limited to, all deferred demand-side 2216
management costs; all deferred percentage of income payment plan 2217
arrears; post-in-service capitalized charges and assets 2218
recognized in connection with statement of financial accounting 2219
standards no. 109 (receivables from customers for income taxes); 2220
future nuclear decommissioning costs and fuel disposal costs as 2221
those costs have been determined by the commission in the 2222

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 77
As Passed by the Senate
electric utility's most recent rate or accounting application 2223
proceeding addressing such costs; the undepreciated costs of 2224
safety and radiation control equipment on nuclear generating 2225
plants owned or leased by an electric utility; and fuel costs 2226
currently deferred pursuant to the terms of one or more 2227
settlement agreements approved by the commission. 2228
(27) "Retail electric service" means any service involved 2229
in supplying or arranging for the supply of electricity to 2230
ultimate consumers in this state, from the point of generation 2231
to the point of consumption. For the purposes of this chapter, 2232
retail electric service includes one or more of the following 2233
"service components": generation service, aggregation service, 2234
power marketing service, power brokerage service, transmission 2235
service, distribution service, ancillary service, metering 2236
service, and billing and collection service. 2237
(28) "Starting date of competitive retail electric 2238
service" means January 1, 2001. 2239
(29) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering 2240
system. 2241
(30) "Net metering" means measuring the difference in an 2242
applicable billing period between the electricity supplied by an 2243
electric service provider and the electricity generated by a 2244
customer-generator that is fed back to the electric service 2245
provider. 2246
(31) "Net metering system" means a facility for the 2247
production of electrical energy that does all of the following: 2248
(a) Uses as its fuel either solar, wind, biomass, landfill 2249
gas, or hydropower, or uses a microturbine or a fuel cell; 2250
(b) Is located on a customer-generator's premises; 2251

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 78
As Passed by the Senate
(c) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's 2252
transmission and distribution facilities; 2253
(d) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the 2254
customer-generator's requirements for electricity. For an 2255
industrial customer-generator with a net metering system that 2256
has a capacity of less than twenty megawatts and uses wind as 2257
energy, this means the net metering system was sized so as to 2258
not exceed one hundred per cent of the customer-generator's 2259
annual requirements for electric energy at the time of 2260
interconnection. 2261
(32) "Self-generator" means an entity in this state that 2262
owns or hosts on its premises property the entity controls an 2263
electric generation facility that produces electricity primarily 2264
for the owner's consumption and that may provide any such excess 2265
electricity to another entity, whether the and that meets all of 2266
the following: 2267
(a) The facility is installed or operated by the owner or 2268
by an agent a third party under a contract, including a lease, 2269
purchase power agreement, or other service contract. 2270
(b) The facility connects directly to the owner's side of 2271
the electric meter. 2272
(c) The facility delivers electricity to the owner's side 2273
of the electric meter without the use of an electric 2274
distribution utility's or electric cooperative's distribution 2275
system or transmission system. 2276
(33) "Rate plan" means the standard service offer in 2277
effect on the effective date of the amendment of this section by 2278
S.B. 221 of the 127th general assembly, July 31, 2008. 2279
(34) "Advanced energy resource" means any of the 2280

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 79
As Passed by the Senate
following: 2281
(a) Any method or any modification or replacement of any 2282
property, process, device, structure, or equipment that 2283
increases the generation output of an electric generating 2284
facility to the extent such efficiency is achieved without 2285
additional carbon dioxide emissions by that facility; 2286
(b) Any distributed generation system consisting of 2287
customer cogeneration technology; 2288
(c) Clean coal technology that includes a carbon-based 2289
product that is chemically altered before combustion to 2290
demonstrate a reduction, as expressed as ash, in emissions of 2291
nitrous oxide, mercury, arsenic, chlorine, sulfur dioxide, or 2292
sulfur trioxide in accordance with the American society of 2293
testing and materials standard D1757A or a reduction of metal 2294
oxide emissions in accordance with standard D5142 of that 2295
society, or clean coal technology that includes the design 2296
capability to control or prevent the emission of carbon dioxide, 2297
which design capability the commission shall adopt by rule and 2298
shall be based on economically feasible best available 2299
technology or, in the absence of a determined best available 2300
technology, shall be of the highest level of economically 2301
feasible design capability for which there exists generally 2302
accepted scientific opinion; 2303
(d) Advanced nuclear energy technology consisting of 2304
generation III technology as defined by the nuclear regulatory 2305
commission; other, later technology; or significant improvements 2306
to existing facilities; 2307
(e) Any fuel cell used in the generation of electricity, 2308
including, but not limited to, a proton exchange membrane fuel 2309

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 80
As Passed by the Senate
cell, phosphoric acid fuel cell, molten carbonate fuel cell, or 2310
solid oxide fuel cell; 2311
(f) Advanced solid waste or construction and demolition 2312
debris conversion technology, including, but not limited to, 2313
advanced stoker technology, and advanced fluidized bed 2314
gasification technology, that results in measurable greenhouse 2315
gas emissions reductions as calculated pursuant to the United 2316
States environmental protection agency's waste reduction model 2317
(WARM); 2318
(g) Demand-side management and any energy efficiency 2319
improvement; 2320
(h) Any new, retrofitted, refueled, or repowered 2321
generating facility located in Ohio, including a simple or 2322
combined-cycle natural gas generating facility or a generating 2323
facility that uses biomass, coal, modular nuclear, or any other 2324
fuel as its input; 2325
(i) Any uprated capacity of an existing electric 2326
generating facility if the uprated capacity results from the 2327
deployment of advanced technology. 2328
"Advanced energy resource" does not include a waste energy 2329
recovery system that is, or has been, included in an energy 2330
efficiency program of an electric distribution utility pursuant 2331
to requirements under section 4928.66 of the Revised Code. 2332
(35) "Air contaminant source" has the same meaning as in 2333
section 3704.01 of the Revised Code. 2334
(36) "Cogeneration technology" means technology that 2335
produces electricity and useful thermal output simultaneously. 2336
(37)(a) "Renewable energy resource" means any of the 2337

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 81
As Passed by the Senate
following: 2338
(i) Solar photovoltaic or solar thermal energy; 2339
(ii) Wind energy; 2340
(iii) Power produced by a hydroelectric facility; 2341
(iv) Power produced by a small hydroelectric facility, 2342
which is a facility that operates, or is rated to operate, at an 2343
aggregate capacity of less than six megawatts; 2344
(v) Power produced by a run-of-the-river hydroelectric 2345
facility placed in service on or after January 1, 1980, that is 2346
located within this state, relies upon the Ohio river, and 2347
operates, or is rated to operate, at an aggregate capacity of 2348
forty or more megawatts; 2349
(vi) Geothermal energy; 2350
(vii) Fuel derived from solid wastes, as defined in 2351
section 3734.01 of the Revised Code, through fractionation, 2352
biological decomposition, or other process that does not 2353
principally involve combustion; 2354
(viii) Biomass energy; 2355
(ix) Energy produced by cogeneration technology that is 2356
placed into service on or before December 31, 2015, and for 2357
which more than ninety per cent of the total annual energy input 2358
is from combustion of a waste or byproduct gas from an air 2359
contaminant source in this state, which source has been in 2360
operation since on or before January 1, 1985, provided that the 2361
cogeneration technology is a part of a facility located in a 2362
county having a population of more than three hundred sixty-five 2363
thousand but less than three hundred seventy thousand according 2364
to the most recent federal decennial census; 2365

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 82
As Passed by the Senate
(x) Biologically derived methane gas; 2366
(xi) Heat captured from a generator of electricity, 2367
boiler, or heat exchanger fueled by biologically derived methane 2368
gas; 2369
(xii) Energy derived from nontreated by-products of the 2370
pulping process or wood manufacturing process, including bark, 2371
wood chips, sawdust, and lignin in spent pulping liquors. 2372
"Renewable energy resource" includes, but is not limited 2373
to, any fuel cell used in the generation of electricity, 2374
including, but not limited to, a proton exchange membrane fuel 2375
cell, phosphoric acid fuel cell, molten carbonate fuel cell, or 2376
solid oxide fuel cell; a linear generator; wind turbine located 2377
in the state's territorial waters of Lake Erie; methane gas 2378
emitted from an abandoned coal mine; waste energy recovery 2379
system placed into service or retrofitted on or after the 2380
effective date of the amendment of this section by S.B. 315 of 2381
the 129th general assembly, September 10, 2012, except that a 2382
waste energy recovery system described in division (A)(38)(b) of 2383
this section may be included only if it was placed into service 2384
between January 1, 2002, and December 31, 2004; storage facility 2385
that will promote the better utilization of a renewable energy 2386
resource; or distributed generation system used by a customer to 2387
generate electricity from any such energy. 2388
"Renewable energy resource" does not include a waste 2389
energy recovery system that is, or was, on or after January 1, 2390
2012, included in an energy efficiency program of an electric 2391
distribution utility pursuant to requirements under section 2392
4928.66 of the Revised Code. 2393
(b) As used in division (A)(37) of this section, 2394

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 83
As Passed by the Senate
"hydroelectric facility" means a hydroelectric generating 2395
facility that is located at a dam on a river, or on any water 2396
discharged to a river, that is within or bordering this state or 2397
within or bordering an adjoining state and meets all of the 2398
following standards: 2399
(i) The facility provides for river flows that are not 2400
detrimental for fish, wildlife, and water quality, including 2401
seasonal flow fluctuations as defined by the applicable 2402
licensing agency for the facility. 2403
(ii) The facility demonstrates that it complies with the 2404
water quality standards of this state, which compliance may 2405
consist of certification under Section 401 of the "Clean Water 2406
Act of 1977," 91 Stat. 1598, 1599, 33 U.S.C. 1341, and 2407
demonstrates that it has not contributed to a finding by this 2408
state that the river has impaired water quality under Section 2409
303(d) of the "Clean Water Act of 1977," 114 Stat. 870, 33 2410
U.S.C. 1313. 2411
(iii) The facility complies with mandatory prescriptions 2412
regarding fish passage as required by the federal energy 2413
regulatory commission license issued for the project, regarding 2414
fish protection for riverine, anadromous, and catadromous fish. 2415
(iv) The facility complies with the recommendations of the 2416
Ohio environmental protection agency and with the terms of its 2417
federal energy regulatory commission license regarding watershed 2418
protection, mitigation, or enhancement, to the extent of each 2419
agency's respective jurisdiction over the facility. 2420
(v) The facility complies with provisions of the 2421
"Endangered Species Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 884, 16 U.S.C. 1531 2422
to 1544, as amended. 2423

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 84
As Passed by the Senate
(vi) The facility does not harm cultural resources of the 2424
area. This can be shown through compliance with the terms of its 2425
federal energy regulatory commission license or, if the facility 2426
is not regulated by that commission, through development of a 2427
plan approved by the Ohio historic preservation office, to the 2428
extent it has jurisdiction over the facility. 2429
(vii) The facility complies with the terms of its federal 2430
energy regulatory commission license or exemption that are 2431
related to recreational access, accommodation, and facilities 2432
or, if the facility is not regulated by that commission, the 2433
facility complies with similar requirements as are recommended 2434
by resource agencies, to the extent they have jurisdiction over 2435
the facility; and the facility provides access to water to the 2436
public without fee or charge. 2437
(viii) The facility is not recommended for removal by any 2438
federal agency or agency of any state, to the extent the 2439
particular agency has jurisdiction over the facility. 2440
(c) The standards in divisions (A)(37)(b)(i) to (viii) of 2441
this section do not apply to a small hydroelectric facility 2442
under division (A)(37)(a)(iv) of this section. 2443
(38) "Waste energy recovery system" means any of the 2444
following: 2445
(a) A facility that generates electricity through the 2446
conversion of energy from either of the following: 2447
(i) Exhaust heat from engines or manufacturing, 2448
industrial, commercial, or institutional sites, except for 2449
exhaust heat from a facility whose primary purpose is the 2450
generation of electricity; 2451
(ii) Reduction of pressure in gas pipelines before gas is 2452

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 85
As Passed by the Senate
distributed through the pipeline, provided that the conversion 2453
of energy to electricity is achieved without using additional 2454
fossil fuels. 2455
(b) A facility at a state institution of higher education 2456
as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code that recovers 2457
waste heat from electricity-producing engines or combustion 2458
turbines and that simultaneously uses the recovered heat to 2459
produce steam, provided that the facility was placed into 2460
service between January 1, 2002, and December 31, 2004; 2461
(c) A facility that produces steam from recovered waste 2462
heat from a manufacturing process and uses that steam, or 2463
transfers that steam to another facility, to provide heat to 2464
another manufacturing process or to generate electricity. 2465
(39) "Smart grid" means capital improvements to an 2466
electric distribution utility's distribution infrastructure that 2467
improve reliability, efficiency, resiliency, or reduce energy 2468
demand or use, including, but not limited to, advanced metering 2469
and automation of system functions. 2470
(40) "Combined heat and power system" means the 2471
coproduction of electricity and useful thermal energy from the 2472
same fuel source designed to achieve thermal-efficiency levels 2473
of at least sixty per cent, with at least twenty per cent of the 2474
system's total useful energy in the form of thermal energy. 2475
(41) "Legacy generation resource" means all generating 2476
facilities owned directly or indirectly by a corporation that 2477
was formed prior to 1960 by investor-owned utilities for the 2478
original purpose of providing power to the federal government 2479
for use in the nation's defense or in furtherance of national 2480
interests, including the Ohio valley electric corporation. 2481

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 86
As Passed by the Senate
(42) "Prudently incurred costs related to a legacy 2482
generation resource" means costs, including deferred costs, 2483
allocated pursuant to a power agreement approved by the federal 2484
energy regulatory commission that relates to a legacy generation 2485
resource, less any revenues realized from offering the 2486
contractual commitment for the power agreement into the 2487
wholesale markets, provided that where the net revenues exceed 2488
net costs, those excess revenues shall be credited to customers. 2489
Such costs shall exclude any return on investment in common 2490
equity and, in the event of a premature retirement of a legacy 2491
generation resource, shall exclude any recovery of remaining 2492
debt. Such costs shall include any incremental costs resulting 2493
from the bankruptcy of a current or former sponsor under such 2494
power agreement or co-owner of the legacy generation resource if 2495
not otherwise recovered through a utility rate cost recovery 2496
mechanism. 2497
(43)(a) (41)(a) "Green energy" means any energy generated 2498
by using an energy resource that does one or more of the 2499
following: 2500
(i) Releases reduced air pollutants, thereby reducing 2501
cumulative air emissions; 2502
(ii) Is more sustainable and reliable relative to some 2503
fossil fuels. 2504
(b) "Green energy" includes energy generated using the 2505
following: 2506
(i) Natural gas as a resource; 2507
(ii) Nuclear reaction. 2508
(42) "Linear generator" means an integrated system 2509
consisting of oscillators, cylinders, electricity conversion 2510

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 87
As Passed by the Senate
equipment, and associated balance of plant components that meet 2511
the following criteria: 2512
(a) Converts the linear motion of oscillators directly 2513
into electricity without the use of a flame or spark; 2514
(b) Is dispatchable with the ability to vary power output 2515
across all loads; 2516
(c) Can operate on multiple fuel types including renewable 2517
fuels such as hydrogen, ammonia, and biogas. 2518
(B) For the purposes of this chapter, a retail electric 2519
service component shall be deemed a competitive retail electric 2520
service if the service component is competitive pursuant to a 2521
declaration by a provision of the Revised Code or pursuant to an 2522
order of the public utilities commission authorized under 2523
division (A) of section 4928.04 of the Revised Code. Otherwise, 2524
the service component shall be deemed a noncompetitive retail 2525
electric service. 2526
Sec. 4928.041. (A) Except as provided in sections 4928.14 1 2527
and 4928.142 of the Revised Code, no electric utility shall 2528
provide a competitive retail electric service in this state if 2529
that service was deemed competitive or otherwise legally 2530
classified as competitive prior to the effective date of this 2531
section. 2532
(B) The standard service offer under section 4928.141 of 2533
the Revised Code shall continue to be provided to consumers in 2534
this state by electric utilities. 2535
Sec. 4928.05. (A)(1) On and after the starting date of 2536
competitive retail electric service, a A competitive retail 2537
electric service supplied by an electric utility or electric 2538
services company, or by an electric utility consistent with 2539

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 88
As Passed by the Senate
section 4928.141 of the Revised Code, shall not be subject to 2540
supervision and regulation by a municipal corporation under 2541
Chapter 743. of the Revised Code or by the public utilities 2542
commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 2543
4963. of the Revised Code, except sections 4905.10 and 4905.31, 2544
division (B) of section 4905.33, and sections 4905.35 and 2545
4933.81 to 4933.90; except sections 4905.06, 4935.03, 4963.40, 2546
and 4963.41 of the Revised Code only to the extent related to 2547
service reliability and public safety; and except as otherwise 2548
provided in this chapter. The commission's authority to enforce 2549
those excepted provisions with respect to a competitive retail 2550
electric service shall be such authority as is provided for 2551
their enforcement under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., 2552
and 4963. of the Revised Code and this chapter. Nothing in this 2553
division shall be construed to limit the commission's authority 2554
under sections 4928.141 to , 4928.142, and 4928.144 of the 2555
Revised Code. 2556
On and after the starting date of competitive retail 2557
electric service, a (2) A competitive retail electric service 2558
supplied by an electric cooperative shall not be subject to 2559
supervision and regulation by the commission under Chapters 2560
4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code, 2561
except as otherwise expressly provided in sections 4928.01 to 2562
4928.10 and 4928.16 of the Revised Code. 2563
(2) On and after the starting date of competitive retail 2564
electric service, a (B)(1) A noncompetitive retail electric 2565
service supplied by an electric utility shall be subject to 2566
supervision and regulation by the commission under Chapters 2567
4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code and 2568
this chapter, to the extent that authority is not preempted by 2569
federal law. The commission's authority to enforce those 2570

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 89
As Passed by the Senate
provisions with respect to a noncompetitive retail electric 2571
service shall be the authority provided under those chapters and 2572
this chapter, to the extent the authority is not preempted by 2573
federal law. Notwithstanding Chapters 4905. and 4909. of the 2574
Revised Code, commission authority under this chapter shall 2575
include the authority to provide for the recovery, through a 2576
reconcilable rider on an electric distribution utility's 2577
distribution rates, of all transmission and transmission-related 2578
costs, including ancillary and congestion costs, imposed on or 2579
charged to the utility by the federal energy regulatory 2580
commission or a regional transmission organization, independent 2581
transmission operator, or similar organization approved by the 2582
federal energy regulatory commission. 2583
(2) The commission shall exercise its jurisdiction with 2584
respect to the delivery of electricity by an electric utility in 2585
this state on or after the starting date of competitive retail 2586
electric service so as to ensure that no aspect of the delivery 2587
of electricity by the utility to consumers in this state that 2588
consists of a noncompetitive retail electric service is 2589
unregulated. 2590
On and after that starting date, a (3) A noncompetitive 2591
retail electric service supplied by an electric cooperative 2592
shall not be subject to supervision and regulation by the 2593
commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 2594
4963. of the Revised Code, except sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 2595
and 4935.03 of the Revised Code. The commission's authority to 2596
enforce those excepted sections with respect to a noncompetitive 2597
retail electric service of an electric cooperative shall be such 2598
authority as is provided for their enforcement under Chapters 2599
4933. and 4935. of the Revised Code. 2600

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 90
As Passed by the Senate
(B) Nothing in this chapter affects the authority of the 2601
commission under Title XLIX of the Revised Code to regulate an 2602
electric light company in this state or an electric service 2603
supplied in this state prior to the starting date of competitive 2604
retail electric service. 2605
Sec. 4928.08. (A) This section applies to an electric 2606
cooperative, or to a governmental aggregator that is a municipal 2607
electric utility, only to the extent of a competitive retail 2608
electric service it provides to a customer to whom it does not 2609
provide a noncompetitive retail electric service through 2610
transmission or distribution facilities it singly or jointly 2611
owns or operates. 2612
(B) (B)(1) No electric utility, electric services company, 2613
electric cooperative, or governmental aggregator shall provide a 2614
competitive retail electric service to a consumer in this state 2615
on and after the starting date of competitive retail electric 2616
service without first being certified by the public utilities 2617
commission regarding its managerial, technical, and financial 2618
capability to provide that service and providing a financial 2619
guarantee sufficient to protect customers and electric 2620
distribution utilities from default. Certification shall be 2621
granted pursuant to procedures and standards the commission 2622
shall prescribe in accordance with division (C) of this section, 2623
except that certification or certification renewal shall be 2624
deemed approved thirty days after the filing of an application 2625
with the commission unless the commission suspends that approval 2626
for good cause shown. In the case of such a suspension, the 2627
commission shall act to approve or deny certification or 2628
certification renewal to the applicant not later than ninety 2629
days after the date of the suspension. 2630

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 91
As Passed by the Senate
(2) The public utilities commission shall establish rules 2631
to require an electric services company to maintain financial 2632
assurances sufficient to protect customers and electric 2633
distribution utilities from default. Such rules also shall 2634
specifically allow an electric distribution utility to set 2635
reasonable standards for its security and the security of its 2636
customers through financial requirements set in its tariffs. 2637
(3) As used in division (B)(2) of this section, an 2638
"electric services company" has the same meaning as in section 2639
4928.01 of the Revised Code, but excludes a power broker or 2640
aggregator. 2641
(C) Capability standards adopted in rules under division 2642
(B) of this section shall be sufficient to ensure compliance 2643
with the minimum service requirements established under section 2644
4928.10 of the Revised Code and with section 4928.09 of the 2645
Revised Code. The standards shall allow flexibility for 2646
voluntary aggregation, to encourage market creativity in 2647
responding to consumer needs and demands, and shall allow 2648
flexibility for electric services companies that exclusively 2649
provide installation of small electric generation facilities, to 2650
provide ease of market access. The rules shall include 2651
procedures for biennially renewing certification. 2652
(D) The commission may suspend, rescind, or conditionally 2653
rescind the certification of any electric utility, electric 2654
services company, electric cooperative, or governmental 2655
aggregator issued under this section if the commission 2656
determines, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, 2657
that the utility, company, cooperative, or aggregator has failed 2658
to comply with any applicable certification standards or has 2659
engaged in anticompetitive or unfair, deceptive, or 2660

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 92
As Passed by the Senate
unconscionable acts or practices in this state. 2661
(E) No electric distribution utility on and after the 2662
starting date of competitive retail electric service shall 2663
knowingly distribute electricity, to a retail consumer in this 2664
state, for any supplier of electricity that has not been 2665
certified by the commission pursuant to this section. 2666
(F) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 2667
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 2668
in a rule adopted under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code is 2669
not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 2670
Sec. 4928.101. (A) As used in this section and section 2671
4928.102 of the Revised Code: 2672
(1) "Small commercial customer" means any customer that 2673
receives electric service pursuant to a nonresidential tariff if 2674
the customer's demand for electricity does not exceed twenty- 2675
five kilowatts within the last twelve months. 2676
(2) "Small commercial customer" excludes any customer that 2677
does one or both of the following: 2678
(a) Manages multiple electric meters and, within the last 2679
twelve months, the electricity demand for at least one of the 2680
meters is twenty-five kilowatts or more; 2681
(b) Has, at the customer's discretion, aggregated the 2682
demand for the customer-managed meters. 2683
(B) The consumer protections described in section 4928.10 2684
of the Revised Code and the rules adopted pursuant to that 2685
section apply to small commercial customers and to all other 2686
customers as set forth in the rules. 2687
Sec. 4928.102. (A) If a competitive retail electric 2688

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 93
As Passed by the Senate
service supplier offers a residential or small commercial 2689
customer a contract for a fixed introductory rate that converts 2690
to a variable rate upon the expiration of the fixed rate, the 2691
supplier shall send two notices to each residential and small 2692
commercial customer that enters into such a contract. Each 2693
notice shall provide all of the following information to the 2694
customer: 2695
(1) The fixed rate that is expiring under the contract; 2696
(2) The expiration date of the contract's fixed rate; 2697
(3) The rate to be charged upon the contract's conversion 2698
to a variable rate; 2699
(4) The public utilities commission web site that, as a 2700
comparison tool, lists rates offered by competitive retail 2701
electric service suppliers; 2702
(5) A statement explaining that appearing on each 2703
customer's bill is a price-to-compare notice that lists the 2704
utility's standard service offer price. 2705
(B) The notices shall be sent by standard United States 2706
mail as follows: 2707
(1) The supplier shall send the first notice not earlier 2708
than ninety days, and not later than sixty days, prior to the 2709
expiration of the fixed rate. 2710
(2) The supplier shall send the second notice not earlier 2711
than forty-five days, and not later than thirty days, prior to 2712
the expiration of the fixed rate. 2713
(C) A competitive retail electric service supplier shall 2714
provide an annual notice, by standard United States mail, to 2715
each residential and small commercial customer that has entered 2716

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 94
As Passed by the Senate
into a contract with the supplier that has converted to a 2717
variable rate upon the expiration of the contract's fixed 2718
introductory rate. The notice shall inform the customer that the 2719
customer is currently subject to a variable rate and that other 2720
fixed rate contracts are available. 2721
(D) Not later than one hundred fifty days after the 2722
effective date of this section, the commission shall adopt rules 2723
in order to implement divisions (A) to (C) of this section. The 2724
rules, at a minimum, shall include the following requirements 2725
regarding the notices required under divisions (A) to (C) of 2726
this section: 2727
(1) To use clear and unambiguous language in order to 2728
enable the customer to make an informed decision; 2729
(2) To design the notices in a way to ensure that they 2730
cannot be confused with marketing materials. 2731
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 2732
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 2733
in a rule adopted under section 4928.102 of the Revised Code is 2734
not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 2735
Sec. 4928.103. (A) As used in this section, "customer 2736
account information" means a unique electric distribution 2737
utility number or other customer identification number used by 2738
the utility to identify a customer and the customer's account 2739
record. 2740
(B) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules to 2741
ensure that an electric distribution utility processes a 2742
customer's change in competitive retail electric supplier by 2743
using customer account information. A customer who consents to a 2744
change of supplier shall not be required to provide customer 2745

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 95
As Passed by the Senate
account information to the supplier if the customer provides a 2746
valid form of government-issued identification issued to the 2747
customer or a sufficient alternative form of identification that 2748
allows the supplier to establish the customer's identity 2749
accurately. 2750
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 2751
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 2752
in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 2753
121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 2754
Sec. 4928.105. (A) Upon receiving a certified request fro m 2755
a competitive retail electric service supplier under a service 2756
agreement that explicitly authorizes an expedited return to an 2757
electric distribution utility's standard service offer, 2758
voluntarily entered into by a mercantile customer, a utility 2759
shall complete the request within three business days. 2760
(B) The electric distribution utility shall not be held 2761
liable for any disputes arising from the expedited return to the 2762
utility's standard service offer, provided the utility acts in 2763
accordance with the public utilities commission's rules. 2764
(C) The commission shall establish rules governing the 2765
process for an expedited return to the utility's standard 2766
service offer pursuant to this section, including the content of 2767
the certified request and any notice to the affected customer, 2768
and permitting electric distribution utilities to recover the 2769
administrative costs of processing requests under this section 2770
through reasonable fees assessed to competitive retail electric 2771
service suppliers. 2772
Sec. 4928.107. (A) As used in this section, "small 2773
commercial customer" has the same meaning as in section 4928.101 2774

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 96
As Passed by the Senate
of the Revised Code. 2775
(B) An electric distribution utility may create a 2776
voluntary demand response program to lower demand at peak times 2777
for residential customers and small commercial customers as 2778
described by this section. 2779
(C)(1) Each demand response program under this section 2780
shall be evaluated by the public utilities commission to 2781
determine if the program is cost-effective for customers. 2782
(2) No electric distribution utility shall offer a demand 2783
reduction program under this section unless the program is 2784
approved by the commission. 2785
(D) An electric distribution utility may enter into an 2786
agreement with a residential customer or small commercial 2787
customer for the customer to participate in the utility's demand 2788
response program. 2789
(E) For customers that participate in the program, the 2790
utility may take actions to reduce the customer's load at peak 2791
times, such as reducing the temperature on the customer's air 2792
conditioner. 2793
(F) A customer that participates in the program may 2794
override the utility's action to reduce the customer's load. 2795
(G) A customer that agrees to participate in the utility's 2796
demand response program shall be paid by the utility an annual 2797
fee of forty dollars, or other amount determined by the 2798
commission under division (H) of this section, if the customer 2799
does not override the utility's action to reduce the customer's 2800
load more than fifty per cent of the requested time. 2801
(H) The commission may raise or lower the fee amount under 2802

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 97
As Passed by the Senate
division (G) of this section at the time of the utility's rate 2803
case or true up based on the current demand in the utility's 2804
certified territory. 2805
Sec. 4928.14. The (A) Except as provided in division (C) 2806
of this section, the failure of a supplier to provide retail 2807
electric generation service to customers within the certified 2808
territory of an electric distribution utility shall result in 2809
the supplier's customers, after reasonable notice, defaulting to 2810
the utility's standard service offer under sections 4928.141, 2811
and 4928.142, and 4928.143 of the Revised Code until the 2812
customer chooses an alternative supplier. A 2813
(B) A supplier is deemed under this section to have failed 2814
to provide such retail electric generation service if the 2815
commission finds, after reasonable notice and opportunity for 2816
hearing, that any of the following conditions are met: 2817
(A) (1) The supplier has defaulted on its contracts with 2818
customers, is in receivership, or has filed for bankruptcy. 2819
(B) (2) The supplier is no longer capable of providing the 2820
service. 2821
(C) (3) The supplier is unable to provide delivery to 2822
transmission or distribution facilities for such period of time 2823
as may be reasonably specified by commission rule adopted under 2824
division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code. 2825
(D) (4) The supplier's certification has been suspended, 2826
conditionally rescinded, or rescinded under division (D) of 2827
section 4928.08 of the Revised Code. 2828
(C) If an electric distribution utility has an electric 2829
security plan that was approved under section 4928.143 of the 2830
Revised Code as that section existed prior to the amendments to 2831

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 98
As Passed by the Senate
this section by this act, the failure of a supplier to provide 2832
retail electric generation service to customers within the 2833
certified territory of that utility shall result in the 2834
supplier's customers, after reasonable notice, defaulting to the 2835
utility's standard service offer under that electric security 2836
plan until the customer chooses an alternative supplier or until 2837
the utility's standard service offer is authorized under section 2838
4928.142 of the Revised Code. 2839
Sec. 4928.141. (A) Beginning January 1, 2009, an (A)(1) An 2840
electric distribution utility shall provide consumers, on a 2841
comparable and nondiscriminatory basis within its certified 2842
territory, a standard service offer of all competitive retail 2843
electric services necessary to maintain essential electric 2844
service to consumers, including a firm supply of electric 2845
generation service. To that end, the electric distribution 2846
utility shall apply to the public utilities commission to 2847
establish the standard service offer in accordance with section 2848
4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code and, at its discretion, 2849
may apply simultaneously under both sections, except that the 2850
utility's first standard service offer application at minimum 2851
shall include a filing under section 4928.143 of the Revised 2852
Code. Only Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this 2853
section, a standard service offer authorized in accordance with 2854
section 4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code, shall serve as 2855
the utility's standard service offer for the purpose of 2856
compliance with this section;, and that standard service offer 2857
shall serve as the utility's default standard service offer for 2858
the purpose of section 4928.14 of the Revised Code. 2859
Notwithstanding the foregoing provision, the rate 2860
(2) An electric distribution utility's electric security 2861
plan of an electric distribution utility that was approved under 2862

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 99
As Passed by the Senate
section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as that section existed 2863
prior to the amendments to this section by this act shall 2864
continue for the purpose of the utility's compliance with this 2865
division (A)(1) of this section until a standard service offer 2866
is first authorized to be effective under section 4928.142 or 2867
4928.143 of the Revised Code, and, as applicable, pursuant to 2868
division (D) of section 4928.143 of the Revised Code, any rate . 2869
Each security plan that extends approved before the effective 2870
date of the amendments to this section by this act shall extend 2871
beyond December 31, 2008, shall continue to be in effect for the 2872
subject electric distribution utility for the duration of the 2873
plan's termthrough the final standard service offer auction 2874
delivery period approved by the public utilities commission 2875
under the plan as of the effective date of the amendments to 2876
this section by this act and thereafter shall terminate. 2877
(3) A standard service offer under section 4928.142 or 2878
4928.143 of the Revised Code shall exclude any previously 2879
authorized allowances for transition costs, with such exclusion 2880
being effective on and after the date that the allowance is 2881
scheduled to end under the utility's rate electric security 2882
plan. 2883
(B) The commission shall set the time for hearing of a 2884
filing under section 4928.142 or 4928.143 of the Revised Code, 2885
send written notice of the hearing to the electric distribution 2886
utility, and publish notice in a newspaper of general 2887
circulation in each county in the utility's certified territory. 2888
The commission shall adopt rules regarding filings under those 2889
sections the section. 2890
Sec. 4928.142. (A) For the purpose of complying with 2891
section 4928.141 of the Revised Code and subject to division (D) 2892

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 100
As Passed by the Senate
of this section and, as applicable, subject to the rate plan 2893
requirement requirements of division (A) of section 4928.141 of 2894
the Revised Code, an electric distribution utility may shall 2895
establish a standard service offer price for retail electric 2896
generation service that is delivered to the utility under a 2897
market-rate offer. 2898
(1) The market-rate offer shall be determined through a 2899
competitive bidding process that provides for all of the 2900
following: 2901
(a) Open, fair, and transparent competitive solicitation; 2902
(b) Clear product definition; 2903
(c) Standardized bid evaluation criteria; 2904
(d) Oversight by an independent third party that shall 2905
design the solicitation, administer the bidding, and ensure that 2906
the criteria specified in division divisions (A)(1)(a) to (c) of 2907
this section are met; 2908
(e) Evaluation of the submitted bids prior to the 2909
selection of the least-cost bid winner or winners. 2910
No generation supplier shall be prohibited from 2911
participating in the bidding process. 2912
(2) The public utilities commission shall modify rules, or 2913
adopt new rules as necessary, concerning the conduct of the 2914
competitive bidding process and the qualifications of bidders, 2915
which rules shall foster supplier participation in the bidding 2916
process and shall be consistent with the requirements of 2917
division (A)(1) of this section. 2918
(B) Prior to initiating a competitive bidding process for 2919
a market-rate offer under division (A) of this section, the 2920

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 101
As Passed by the Senate
electric distribution utility shall file an application with the 2921
commission. An electric distribution utility may file its 2922
application with the commission prior to the effective date of 2923
the commission rules required under division (A)(2) of this 2924
section, and, as the commission determines necessary, the 2925
utility shall immediately conform its filing to the rules upon 2926
their taking effect. 2927
An application under this division shall detail the 2928
electric distribution utility's proposed compliance with the 2929
requirements of division (A)(1) of this section and with 2930
commission rules under division (A)(2) of this section and 2931
demonstrate that all of the following requirements are met: 2932
(1) The electric distribution utility or its transmission 2933
service affiliate belongs to at least one regional transmission 2934
organization that has been approved by the federal energy 2935
regulatory commission; or there otherwise is comparable and 2936
nondiscriminatory access to the electric transmission grid. 2937
(2) Any such regional transmission organization has a 2938
market-monitor function and the ability to take actions to 2939
identify and mitigate market power or the electric distribution 2940
utility's market conduct; or a similar market monitoring 2941
function exists with commensurate ability to identify and 2942
monitor market conditions and mitigate conduct associated with 2943
the exercise of market power. 2944
(3) A published source of information is available 2945
publicly or through subscription that identifies pricing 2946
information for traded electricity on- and off-peak energy 2947
products that are contracts for delivery beginning at least two 2948
years from the date of the publication and is updated on a 2949
regular basis. 2950

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 102
As Passed by the Senate
The commission shall initiate a proceeding and, within 2951
ninety days after the application's filing date, shall determine 2952
by order whether the electric distribution utility and its 2953
market-rate offer meet all of the foregoing requirements. If the 2954
finding is positive, the electric distribution utility may shall 2955
initiate its competitive bidding process. If the finding is 2956
negative as to one or more requirements, the commission in the 2957
order shall direct the electric distribution utility regarding 2958
how any deficiency may shall be timely remedied in a timely 2959
manner to the commission's satisfaction; otherwise, the electric 2960
distribution utility shall withdraw the application. However, if 2961
such remedy is made and the subsequent finding is positive and 2962
also if the electric distribution utility made a simultaneous 2963
filing under this section and section 4928.143 of the Revised 2964
Code, the utility shall not initiate its competitive bid until 2965
at least one hundred fifty days after the filing date of those 2966
applications. 2967
(C) Upon the completion of the competitive bidding process 2968
authorized by divisions (A) and (B) of this section, including 2969
for the purpose of division (D) of this section, the commission 2970
shall select the least-cost bid winner or winners of that 2971
process, and such selected bid or bids, as prescribed as retail 2972
rates by the commission, shall be the electric distribution 2973
utility's standard service offer unless the commission, by order 2974
issued before the third calendar day following the conclusion of 2975
the competitive bidding process for the market rate offer, 2976
determines that one or more of the following criteria were not 2977
met: 2978
(1) Each portion of the bidding process was 2979
oversubscribed, such that the amount of supply bid upon was 2980
greater than the amount of the load bid out. 2981

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 103
As Passed by the Senate
(2) There were four or more bidders. 2982
(3) At least twenty-five per cent of the load is bid upon 2983
by one or more persons other than the electric distribution 2984
utility. 2985
All costs incurred by the electric distribution utility as 2986
a result of or related to the competitive bidding process or to 2987
procuring generation service to provide the standard service 2988
offer, including the costs of energy and capacity and the costs 2989
of all other products and services procured as a result of the 2990
competitive bidding process, shall be timely recovered through 2991
the standard service offer price, and, for that purpose, the 2992
commission shall approve a reconciliation mechanism, other 2993
recovery mechanism, or a combination of such mechanisms for the 2994
utility. 2995
(D) The first application filed under this section by an 2996
electric distribution utility that, as of July 31, 2008, 2997
directly owns, in whole or in part, operating electric 2998
generating facilities that had been used and useful in this 2999
state shall require that a portion of that the utility's 3000
standard service offer load for the first five years of the 3001
market rate offer be competitively bid under division (A) of 3002
this section as follows: ten per cent of the load in year one, 3003
not more than twenty per cent in year two, thirty per cent in 3004
year three, forty per cent in year four, and fifty per cent in 3005
year five. Consistent with those percentages, the commission 3006
shall determine the actual percentages for each year of years 3007
one through five. The standard service offer price for retail 3008
electric generation service under this first application shall 3009
be a proportionate blend of the bid price and the generation 3010
service price for the remaining standard service offer load, 3011

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 104
As Passed by the Senate
which latter price shall be equal to the electric distribution 3012
utility's most recent standard service offer price, adjusted 3013
upward or downward as the commission determines reasonable, 3014
relative to the jurisdictional portion of any known and 3015
measurable changes from the level of any one or more of the 3016
following costs as reflected in that most recent standard 3017
service offer price: 3018
(1) The electric distribution utility's prudently incurred 3019
cost of fuel used to produce electricity; 3020
(2) Its prudently incurred purchased power costs; 3021
(3) Its prudently incurred costs of satisfying the supply 3022
and demand portfolio requirements of this state, including, but 3023
not limited to, renewable energy resource and energy efficiency 3024
requirements; 3025
(4) Its costs prudently incurred to comply with 3026
environmental laws and regulations, with consideration of the 3027
derating of any facility associated with those costs. 3028
In making any adjustment to the most recent standard 3029
service offer price on the basis of costs described in division 3030
(D) of this section, the commission shall include the benefits 3031
that may become available to the electric distribution utility 3032
as a result of or in connection with the costs included in the 3033
adjustment, including, but not limited to, the utility's receipt 3034
of emissions credits or its receipt of tax benefits or of other 3035
benefits, and, accordingly, the commission may impose such 3036
conditions on the adjustment to ensure that any such benefits 3037
are properly aligned with the associated cost responsibility. 3038
The commission shall also determine how such adjustments will 3039
affect the electric distribution utility's return on common 3040

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 105
As Passed by the Senate
equity that may be achieved by those adjustments. The commission 3041
shall not apply its consideration of the return on common equity 3042
to reduce any adjustments authorized under this division unless 3043
the adjustments will cause the electric distribution utility to 3044
earn a return on common equity that is significantly in excess 3045
of the return on common equity that is earned by publicly traded 3046
companies, including utilities, that face comparable business 3047
and financial risk, with such adjustments for capital structure 3048
as may be appropriate. The burden of proof for demonstrating 3049
that significantly excessive earnings will not occur shall be on 3050
the electric distribution utility. 3051
Additionally, the commission may adjust the electric 3052
distribution utility's most recent standard service offer price 3053
by such just and reasonable amount that the commission 3054
determines necessary to address any emergency that threatens the 3055
utility's financial integrity or to ensure that the resulting 3056
revenue available to the utility for providing the standard 3057
service offer is not so inadequate as to result, directly or 3058
indirectly, in a taking of property without compensation 3059
pursuant to Section 19 of Article I, Ohio Constitution. The 3060
electric distribution utility has the burden of demonstrating 3061
that any adjustment to its most recent standard service offer 3062
price is proper in accordance with this division. 3063
(E) Beginning in the second year of a blended price under 3064
division (D) of this section and notwithstanding any other 3065
requirement of this section, the commission may alter 3066
prospectively the proportions specified in that division to 3067
mitigate any effect of an abrupt or significant change in the 3068
electric distribution utility's standard service offer price 3069
that would otherwise result in general or with respect to any 3070
rate group or rate schedule but for such alteration. Any such 3071

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 106
As Passed by the Senate
alteration shall be made not more often than annually, and the 3072
commission shall not, by altering those proportions and in any 3073
event, including because of the length of time, as authorized 3074
under division (C) of this section, taken to approve the market 3075
rate offer, cause the duration of the blending period to exceed 3076
ten years as counted from the effective date of the approved 3077
market rate offer. Additionally, any such alteration shall be 3078
limited to an alteration affecting the prospective proportions 3079
used during the blending period and shall not affect any 3080
blending proportion previously approved and applied by the 3081
commission under this division. 3082
(F) An electric distribution utility that has received 3083
commission approval of its first application under division (C) 3084
of this section shall not, nor ever shall be authorized or 3085
required by the commission to, file an application under section 3086
4928.143 of the Revised Code. 3087
Sec. 4928.144. The public utilities commission by order 3088
may authorize any just and reasonable phase-in of any electric 3089
distribution utility rate or price established under sections 3090
4928.141 to 4928.143 and 4928.142 of the Revised Code, and 3091
inclusive of carrying charges, as the commission considers 3092
necessary to ensure rate or price stability for consumers. If 3093
the commission's order includes such a phase-in, the order also 3094
shall provide for the creation of regulatory assets pursuant to 3095
generally accepted accounting principles, by authorizing the 3096
deferral of incurred costs equal to the amount not collected, 3097
plus carrying charges on that amount. Further, the order shall 3098
authorize the collection of those deferrals through a 3099
nonbypassable surcharge on any such rate or price so established 3100
for the electric distribution utility by the commission. 3101

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 107
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 4928.149. No electric distribution utility may use 3102
any electric energy storage system to participate in the 3103
wholesale market, if the utility purchased or acquired that 3104
system for distribution service. 3105
Sec. 4928.1410. If an electric distribution utility has a n 3106
existing electric security plan under which the commission had 3107
authorized the creation or continuation of riders, then, to the 3108
extent those riders will cease to exist after termination of the 3109
electric security plan, the electric distribution utility is 3110
authorized to create necessary regulatory assets or liabilities, 3111
along with carrying costs at the utility's weighted average cost 3112
of debt, for the resolution of any outstanding under-collection 3113
or over-collection of funds under such riders. The resolution of 3114
such regulatory assets or liabilities shall be addressed in the 3115
first distribution rate case under section 4909.18 of the 3116
Revised Code that occurs after the plan's expiration. 3117
Sec. 4928.17. (A) Except as otherwise provided in sections 3118
4928.141 or 4928.142 or 4928.143 or 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the 3119
Revised Code and beginning on the starting date of competitive 3120
retail electric service, no electric utility shall engage in 3121
this state, either directly or through an affiliate, in the 3122
businesses of supplying a noncompetitive retail electric service 3123
and supplying a competitive retail electric service, or in the 3124
businesses of supplying a noncompetitive retail electric service 3125
and supplying a product or service other than retail electric 3126
service, unless the utility implements and operates under a 3127
corporate separation plan that is approved by the public 3128
utilities commission under this section, is consistent with the 3129
policy specified in section 4928.02 of the Revised Code, and 3130
achieves all of the following: 3131

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 108
As Passed by the Senate
(1) The plan provides, at minimum, for the provision of 3132
the competitive retail electric service or the nonelectric 3133
product or service through a fully separated affiliate of the 3134
utility, and the plan includes separate accounting requirements, 3135
the code of conduct as ordered by the commission pursuant to a 3136
rule it shall adopt under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the 3137
Revised Code, and such other measures as are necessary to 3138
effectuate the policy specified in section 4928.02 of the 3139
Revised Code. 3140
(2) The plan satisfies the public interest in preventing 3141
unfair competitive advantage and preventing the abuse of market 3142
power. 3143
(3) The plan is sufficient to ensure that the utility will 3144
not extend any undue preference or advantage to any affiliate, 3145
division, or part of its own business engaged in the business of 3146
supplying the competitive retail electric service or nonelectric 3147
product or service, including, but not limited to, utility 3148
resources such as trucks, tools, office equipment, office space, 3149
supplies, customer and marketing information, advertising, 3150
billing and mailing systems, personnel, and training, without 3151
compensation based upon fully loaded embedded costs charged to 3152
the affiliate; and to ensure that any such affiliate, division, 3153
or part will not receive undue preference or advantage from any 3154
affiliate, division, or part of the business engaged in business 3155
of supplying the noncompetitive retail electric service. No such 3156
utility, affiliate, division, or part shall extend such undue 3157
preference. Notwithstanding any other division of this section, 3158
a utility's obligation under division (A)(3) of this section 3159
shall be effective January 1, 2000. 3160
(B) The commission may approve, modify and approve, or 3161

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 109
As Passed by the Senate
disapprove a corporate separation plan filed with the commission 3162
under division (A) of this section. As part of the code of 3163
conduct required under division (A)(1) of this section, the 3164
commission shall adopt rules pursuant to division (A) of section 3165
4928.06 of the Revised Code regarding corporate separation and 3166
procedures for plan filing and approval. The rules shall include 3167
limitations on affiliate practices solely for the purpose of 3168
maintaining a separation of the affiliate's business from the 3169
business of the utility to prevent unfair competitive advantage 3170
abuse of market power by virtue of that relationship. The rules 3171
also shall include an opportunity for any person having a real 3172
and substantial interest in the corporate separation plan to 3173
file specific objections to the plan and propose specific 3174
responses to issues raised in the objections, which objections 3175
and responses the commission shall address in its final order. 3176
Prior to commission approval of the plan, the commission shall 3177
afford a hearing upon those aspects of the plan that the 3178
commission determines reasonably require a hearing. The 3179
commission may reject and require refiling of a substantially 3180
inadequate plan under this section. 3181
(C) The commission shall issue an order approving or 3182
modifying and approving a corporate separation plan under this 3183
section, to be effective on the date specified in the order, 3184
only upon findings that the plan reasonably complies with the 3185
requirements of division (A) of this section and will provide 3186
for ongoing compliance with the policy specified in section 3187
4928.02 of the Revised Code. However, for good cause shown, the 3188
commission may issue an order approving or modifying and 3189
approving a corporate separation plan under this section that 3190
does not comply with division (A)(1) of this section but 3191
complies with such functional separation requirements as the 3192

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 110
As Passed by the Senate
commission authorizes to apply for an interim period prescribed 3193
in the order, upon a finding that such alternative plan will 3194
provide for ongoing compliance with the policy specified in 3195
section 4928.02 of the Revised Code. 3196
(D) Any party may seek an amendment to a corporate 3197
separation plan approved under this section, and the commission, 3198
pursuant to a request from any party or on its own initiative, 3199
may order as it considers necessary the filing of an amended 3200
corporate separation plan to reflect changed circumstances. 3201
(E) No electric distribution utility shall sell or 3202
transfer any generating asset it wholly or partly owns at any 3203
time without obtaining prior commission approval. 3204
Sec. 4928.20. (A) The legislative authority of a municipal 3205
corporation may adopt an ordinance, or the board of township 3206
trustees of a township or the board of county commissioners of a 3207
county may adopt a resolution, under which, on or after the 3208
starting date of competitive retail electric service, it may 3209
aggregate in accordance with this section the retail electrical 3210
loads located, respectively, within the municipal corporation, 3211
township, or unincorporated area of the county and, for that 3212
purpose, may enter into service agreements to facilitate for 3213
those loads the sale and purchase of electricity. The 3214
legislative authority or board also may exercise such authority 3215
jointly with any other such legislative authority or board. For 3216
customers that are not mercantile customers, an ordinance or 3217
resolution under this division shall specify whether the 3218
aggregation will occur only with the prior, affirmative consent 3219
of each person owning, occupying, controlling, or using an 3220
electric load center proposed to be aggregated or will occur 3221
automatically for all such persons pursuant to the opt-out 3222

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 111
As Passed by the Senate
requirements of division (D) of this section. The aggregation of 3223
mercantile customers shall occur only with the prior, 3224
affirmative consent of each such person owning, occupying, 3225
controlling, or using an electric load center proposed to be 3226
aggregated. Nothing in this division, however, authorizes the 3227
aggregation of the retail electric loads of an electric load 3228
center, as defined in section 4933.81 of the Revised Code, that 3229
is located in the certified territory of a nonprofit electric 3230
supplier under sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code 3231
or an electric load center served by transmission or 3232
distribution facilities of a municipal electric utility. 3233
(B) If an ordinance or resolution adopted under division 3234
(A) of this section specifies that aggregation of customers that 3235
are not mercantile customers will occur automatically as 3236
described in that division, the ordinance or resolution shall 3237
direct the board of elections to submit the question of the 3238
authority to aggregate to the electors of the respective 3239
municipal corporation, township, or unincorporated area of a 3240
county at a special election on the day of the next primary or 3241
general election in the municipal corporation, township, or 3242
county. The legislative authority or board shall certify a copy 3243
of the ordinance or resolution to the board of elections not 3244
less than ninety days before the day of the special election. No 3245
ordinance or resolution adopted under division (A) of this 3246
section that provides for an election under this division shall 3247
take effect unless approved by a majority of the electors voting 3248
upon the ordinance or resolution at the election held pursuant 3249
to this division. 3250
(C) Upon the applicable requisite authority under 3251
divisions (A) and (B) of this section, the legislative authority 3252
or board shall develop a plan of operation and governance for 3253

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 112
As Passed by the Senate
the aggregation program so authorized. Before adopting a plan 3254
under this division, the legislative authority or board shall 3255
hold at least two public hearings on the plan. Before the first 3256
hearing, the legislative authority or board shall publish notice 3257
of the hearings once a week for two consecutive weeks in a 3258
newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction or as 3259
provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The notice shall 3260
summarize the plan and state the date, time, and location of 3261
each hearing. 3262
(D) No legislative authority or board, pursuant to an 3263
ordinance or resolution under divisions (A) and (B) of this 3264
section that provides for automatic aggregation of customers 3265
that are not mercantile customers as described in division (A) 3266
of this section, shall aggregate the electrical load of any 3267
electric load center located within its jurisdiction unless it 3268
in advance clearly discloses to the person owning, occupying, 3269
controlling, or using the load center that the person will be 3270
enrolled automatically in the aggregation program and will 3271
remain so enrolled unless the person affirmatively elects by a 3272
stated procedure not to be so enrolled. The disclosure shall 3273
state prominently the rates, charges, and other terms and 3274
conditions of enrollment. The stated procedure shall allow any 3275
person enrolled in the aggregation program the opportunity to 3276
opt out of the program every three years, without paying a 3277
switching fee. Any such person that opts out before the 3278
commencement of the aggregation program pursuant to the stated 3279
procedure shall default to the standard service offer provided 3280
under section 4928.14 or division (D) of section 4928.35 of the 3281
Revised Code until the person chooses an alternative supplier. 3282
(E)(1) With respect to a governmental aggregation for a 3283
municipal corporation that is authorized pursuant to divisions 3284

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 113
As Passed by the Senate
(A) to (D) of this section, resolutions may be proposed by 3285
initiative or referendum petitions in accordance with sections 3286
731.28 to 731.41 of the Revised Code. 3287
(2) With respect to a governmental aggregation for a 3288
township or the unincorporated area of a county, which 3289
aggregation is authorized pursuant to divisions (A) to (D) of 3290
this section, resolutions may be proposed by initiative or 3291
referendum petitions in accordance with sections 731.28 to 3292
731.40 of the Revised Code, except that: 3293
(a) The petitions shall be filed, respectively, with the 3294
township fiscal officer or the board of county commissioners, 3295
who shall perform those duties imposed under those sections upon 3296
the city auditor or village clerk. 3297
(b) The petitions shall contain the signatures of not less 3298
than ten per cent of the total number of electors in, 3299
respectively, the township or the unincorporated area of the 3300
county who voted for the office of governor at the preceding 3301
general election for that office in that area. 3302
(F) A governmental aggregator under division (A) of this 3303
section is not a public utility engaging in the wholesale 3304
purchase and resale of electricity, and provision of the 3305
aggregated service is not a wholesale utility transaction. A 3306
governmental aggregator shall be subject to supervision and 3307
regulation by the public utilities commission only to the extent 3308
of any competitive retail electric service it provides and 3309
commission authority under this chapter. 3310
(G) This section does not apply in the case of a municipal 3311
corporation that supplies such aggregated service to electric 3312
load centers to which its municipal electric utility also 3313

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 114
As Passed by the Senate
supplies a noncompetitive retail electric service through 3314
transmission or distribution facilities the utility singly or 3315
jointly owns or operates. 3316
(H) A governmental aggregator shall not include in its 3317
aggregation the accounts of any of the following: 3318
(1) A customer that has opted out of the aggregation; 3319
(2) A customer in contract with a certified electric 3320
services company; 3321
(3) A customer that has a special contract with an 3322
electric distribution utility; 3323
(4) A customer that is not located within the governmental 3324
aggregator's governmental boundaries; 3325
(5) Subject to division (C) of section 4928.21 of the 3326
Revised Code, a customer who appears on the "do not aggregate" 3327
list maintained under that section. 3328
(I) Customers that are part of a governmental aggregation 3329
under this section shall be responsible only for such portion of 3330
a surcharge under section 4928.144 of the Revised Code that is 3331
proportionate to the benefits, as determined by the commission, 3332
that electric load centers within the jurisdiction of the 3333
governmental aggregation as a group receive. The proportionate 3334
surcharge so established shall apply to each customer of the 3335
governmental aggregation while the customer is part of that 3336
aggregation. If a customer ceases being such a customer, the 3337
otherwise applicable surcharge shall apply. Nothing in this 3338
section shall result in less than full recovery by an electric 3339
distribution utility of any surcharge authorized under section 3340
4928.144 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section shall 3341
result in less than the full and timely imposition, charging, 3342

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 115
As Passed by the Senate
collection, and adjustment by an electric distribution utility, 3343
its assignee, or any collection agent, of the phase-in-recovery 3344
charges authorized pursuant to a final financing order issued 3345
pursuant to sections 4928.23 to 4928.2318 of the Revised Code. 3346
(J) On behalf of the customers that are part of a 3347
governmental aggregation under this section and by filing 3348
written notice with the public utilities commission, the 3349
legislative authority that formed or is forming that 3350
governmental aggregation may elect not to receive standby 3351
service within the meaning of division (B)(2)(d) of section 3352
4928.143 of the Revised Code from an electric distribution 3353
utility in whose certified territory the governmental 3354
aggregation is located and that operates under an approved 3355
electric security plan under that section. Upon the filing of 3356
that notice, the electric distribution utility shall not charge 3357
any such customer to whom competitive retail electric generation 3358
service is provided by another supplier under the governmental 3359
aggregation for the standby service. Any such consumer that 3360
returns to the utility for competitive retail electric service 3361
shall pay the market price of power incurred by the utility to 3362
serve that consumer plus any amount attributable to the 3363
utility's cost of compliance with the renewable energy resource 3364
provisions of section 4928.64 of the Revised Code to serve the 3365
consumer. Such market price shall include, but not be limited 3366
to, capacity and energy charges; all charges associated with the 3367
provision of that power supply through the regional transmission 3368
organization, including, but not limited to, transmission, 3369
ancillary services, congestion, and settlement and 3370
administrative charges; and all other costs incurred by the 3371
utility that are associated with the procurement, provision, and 3372
administration of that power supply, as such costs may be 3373

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 116
As Passed by the Senate
approved by the commission. The period of time during which the 3374
market price and renewable energy resource amount shall be so 3375
assessed on the consumer shall be from the time the consumer so 3376
returns to the electric distribution utility until the 3377
expiration of the electric security plan. However, if that 3378
period of time is expected to be more than two years, the 3379
commission may reduce the time period to a period of not less 3380
than two years. 3381
(K) The commission shall adopt rules and issue orders in 3382
proceedings under sections 4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised 3383
Code to encourage and promote large-scale governmental 3384
aggregation in this state. For that purpose, the commission 3385
shall conduct an immediate review of any rules it has adopted 3386
for the purpose of this section that are in effect on the 3387
effective date of the amendment of this section by S.B. 221 of 3388
the 127th general assembly, July 31, 2008. Further, within the 3389
context of an electric security plan under section 4928.143 of 3390
the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to its repeal by 3391
this act, or a market rate offer under section 4928.142 of the 3392
Revised Code, as amended by this act, the commission shall 3393
consider the effect on large-scale governmental aggregation of 3394
any nonbypassable generation charges, however collected, under 3395
that plan, or that would be established under that planoffer, 3396
except any nonbypassable generation charges that relate to any 3397
cost incurred by the electric distribution utility, the deferral 3398
of which has been authorized by the commission prior to the 3399
effective date of the amendment of this section by S.B. 221 of 3400
the 127th general assembly, July 31, 2008. 3401
Sec. 4928.23. As used in sections 4928.23 to 4928.2318 of 3402
the Revised Code: 3403

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 117
As Passed by the Senate
(A) "Ancillary agreement" means any bond insurance policy, 3404
letter of credit, reserve account, surety bond, swap 3405
arrangement, hedging arrangement, liquidity or credit support 3406
arrangement, or other similar agreement or arrangement entered 3407
into in connection with the issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds 3408
that is designed to promote the credit quality and marketability 3409
of the bonds or to mitigate the risk of an increase in interest 3410
rates. 3411
(B) "Assignee" means any person or entity to which an 3412
interest in phase-in-recovery property is sold, assigned, 3413
transferred, or conveyed, other than as security, and any 3414
successor to or subsequent assignee of such a person or entity. 3415
(C) "Bond" includes debentures, notes, certificates of 3416
participation, certificates of beneficial interest, certificates 3417
of ownership or other evidences of indebtedness or ownership 3418
that are issued by an electric distribution utility or an 3419
assignee under a final financing order, the proceeds of which 3420
are used directly or indirectly to recover, finance, or 3421
refinance phase-in costs and financing costs, and that are 3422
secured by or payable from revenues from phase-in-recovery 3423
charges. 3424
(D) "Bondholder" means any holder or owner of a phase-in- 3425
recovery bond. 3426
(E) "Financing costs" means any of the following: 3427
(1) Principal, interest, and redemption premiums that are 3428
payable on phase-in-recovery bonds; 3429
(2) Any payment required under an ancillary agreement; 3430
(3) Any amount required to fund or replenish a reserve 3431
account or another account established under any indenture, 3432

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 118
As Passed by the Senate
ancillary agreement, or other financing document relating to 3433
phase-in-recovery bonds; 3434
(4) Any costs of retiring or refunding any existing debt 3435
and equity securities of an electric distribution utility in 3436
connection with either the issuance of, or the use of proceeds 3437
from, phase-in-recovery bonds; 3438
(5) Any costs incurred by an electric distribution utility 3439
to obtain modifications of or amendments to any indenture, 3440
financing agreement, security agreement, or similar agreement or 3441
instrument relating to any existing secured or unsecured 3442
obligation of the electric distribution utility in connection 3443
with the issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds; 3444
(6) Any costs incurred by an electric distribution utility 3445
to obtain any consent, release, waiver, or approval from any 3446
holder of an obligation described in division (E)(5) of this 3447
section that are necessary to be incurred for the electric 3448
distribution utility to issue or cause the issuance of phase-in- 3449
recovery bonds; 3450
(7) Any taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on 3451
phase-in-recovery revenues; 3452
(8) Any costs related to issuing or servicing phase-in- 3453
recovery bonds or related to obtaining a financing order, 3454
including servicing fees and expenses, trustee fees and 3455
expenses, legal, accounting, or other professional fees and 3456
expenses, administrative fees, placement fees, underwriting 3457
fees, capitalized interest and equity, and rating-agency fees; 3458
(9) Any other similar costs that the public utilities 3459
commission finds appropriate. 3460
(F) "Financing order" means an order issued by the public 3461

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 119
As Passed by the Senate
utilities commission under section 4928.232 of the Revised Code 3462
that authorizes an electric distribution utility or an assignee 3463
to issue phase-in-recovery bonds and recover phase-in-recovery 3464
charges. 3465
(G) "Final financing order" means a financing order that 3466
has become final and has taken effect as provided in section 3467
4928.233 of the Revised Code. 3468
(H) "Financing party" means either of the following: 3469
(1) Any trustee, collateral agent, or other person acting 3470
for the benefit of any bondholder; 3471
(2) Any party to an ancillary agreement, the rights and 3472
obligations of which relate to or depend upon the existence of 3473
phase-in-recovery property, the enforcement and priority of a 3474
security interest in phase-in-recovery property, the timely 3475
collection and payment of phase-in-recovery revenues, or a 3476
combination of these factors. 3477
(I) "Financing statement" has the same meaning as in 3478
section 1309.102 of the Revised Code. 3479
(J) "Phase-in costs" means costs, inclusive of carrying 3480
charges incurred before, on, or after the effective date of this 3481
section March 22, 2012, authorized by the commission before, on, 3482
or after the effective date of this section March 22, 2012, to 3483
be securitized or deferred as regulatory assets in proceedings 3484
under section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, sections 4928.141 to 3485
4928.143, 4928.142, or 4928.144 of the Revised Code, or section 3486
4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 31, 3487
2008, or section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as it existed 3488
prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section by 3489
this act pursuant to a final order for which appeals have been 3490

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 120
As Passed by the Senate
exhausted. "Phase-in costs" excludes the following: 3491
(1) With respect to any electric generating facility that, 3492
on and after the effective date of this section March 22, 2012, 3493
is owned, in whole or in part, by an electric distribution 3494
utility applying for a financing order under section 4928.231 of 3495
the Revised Code, costs that are authorized under division (B) 3496
(2)(b) or (c) of section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as that 3497
section existed prior to the effective date of the amendments to 3498
this section by this act; 3499
(2) Costs incurred after the effective date of this 3500
section March 22, 2012, related to the ongoing operation of an 3501
electric generating facility, but not environmental clean-up or 3502
remediation costs incurred by an electric distribution utility 3503
because of its ownership or operation of an electric generating 3504
facility prior to the effective date of this section March 22, 3505
2012, which such clean-up or remediation costs are imposed or 3506
incurred pursuant to federal or state law, rules, or regulations 3507
and for which the commission approves or approved recovery in 3508
accordance with section 4909.18 of the Revised Code, sections 3509
4928.141 to 4928.143, 4928.142, or 4928.144 of the Revised Code, 3510
or section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to 3511
July 31, 2008, or section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as it 3512
existed prior to the effective date of the amendments to this 3513
section by this act. 3514
(K) "Phase-in-recovery property" means the property, 3515
rights, and interests of an electric distribution utility or an 3516
assignee under a final financing order, including the right to 3517
impose, charge, and collect the phase-in-recovery charges that 3518
shall be used to pay and secure the payment of phase-in-recovery 3519
bonds and financing costs, and including the right to obtain 3520

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 121
As Passed by the Senate
adjustments to those charges, and any revenues, receipts, 3521
collections, rights to payment, payments, moneys, claims, or 3522
other proceeds arising from the rights and interests created 3523
under the final financing order. 3524
(L) "Phase-in-recovery revenues" means all revenues, 3525
receipts, collections, payments, moneys, claims, or other 3526
proceeds arising from phase-in-recovery property. 3527
(M) "Successor" means, with respect to any entity, another 3528
entity that succeeds by operation of law to the rights and 3529
obligations of the first legal entity pursuant to any 3530
bankruptcy, reorganization, restructuring, or other insolvency 3531
proceeding, any merger, acquisition, or consolidation, or any 3532
sale or transfer of assets, regardless of whether any of these 3533
occur as a result of a restructuring of the electric power 3534
industry or otherwise. 3535
Sec. 4928.231. (A) An electric distribution utility may 3536
apply to the public utilities commission for a financing order 3537
that authorizes the following: 3538
(1) The issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds, in one or 3539
more series, to recover uncollected phase-in costs; 3540
(2) The imposition, charging, and collection of phase-in- 3541
recovery charges, in accordance with the adjustment mechanism 3542
approved by the commission under section 4928.232 of the Revised 3543
Code, and consistent with the commission's authority regarding 3544
governmental aggregation as provided in division (I) of section 3545
4928.20 of the Revised Code, to recover both of the following: 3546
(a) Uncollected phase-in costs; 3547
(b) Financing costs. 3548

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 122
As Passed by the Senate
(3) The creation of phase-in-recovery property under the 3549
financing order. 3550
(B) The application shall include all of the following: 3551
(1) A description of the uncollected phase-in costs that 3552
the electric distribution utility seeks to recover through the 3553
issuance of phase-in-recovery bonds; 3554
(2) An estimate of the date each series of phase-in- 3555
recovery bonds are expected to be issued; 3556
(3) The expected term during which the phase-in costs 3557
associated with the issuance of each series of phase-in-recovery 3558
bonds are expected to be recovered; 3559
(4) An estimate of the financing costs, as described in 3560
section 4928.23 of the Revised Code, associated with the 3561
issuance of each series of phase-in-recovery bonds; 3562
(5) An estimate of the amount of phase-in-recovery charges 3563
necessary to recover the phase-in costs and financing costs set 3564
forth in the application and the calculation for that estimate, 3565
which calculation shall take into account the estimated date or 3566
dates of issuance and the estimated principal amount of each 3567
series of phase-in-recovery bonds; 3568
(6) For phase-in-recovery charges not subject to 3569
allocation according to an existing order, a proposed 3570
methodology for allocating phase-in-recovery charges among 3571
customer classes, including a proposed methodology for 3572
allocating such charges to governmental aggregation customers 3573
based upon the proportionate benefit determination made under 3574
division (I) of section 4928.20 of the Revised Code; 3575
(7) A description of a proposed adjustment mechanism for 3576

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 123
As Passed by the Senate
use as described in division (A)(2) of this section; 3577
(8) A description and valuation of how the issuance of the 3578
phase-in-recovery bonds, including financing costs, will both 3579
result in cost savings to customers and mitigate rate impacts to 3580
customers when compared to the use of other financing mechanisms 3581
or cost-recovery methods available to the electric distribution 3582
utility; 3583
(9) Any other information required by the commission. 3584
(C) The electric distribution utility may restate or 3585
incorporate by reference in the application any information 3586
required under division (B)(9) of this section that the electric 3587
distribution utility filed with the commission under section 3588
4909.18 or sections 4928.141 to 4928.144 of the Revised Code or 3589
, section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to 3590
July 31, 2008, or section 4928.143 of the Revised Code as it 3591
existed prior to the amendments to this section by this act. 3592
Sec. 4928.232. (A) Proceedings before the public utilities 3593
commission on an application submitted by an electric 3594
distribution utility under section 4928.231 of the Revised Code 3595
shall be governed by Chapter 4903. of the Revised Code, but only 3596
to the extent that chapter is not inconsistent with this section 3597
or section 4928.233 of the Revised Code. Any party that 3598
participated in the proceeding in which phase-in costs were 3599
approved under section 4909.18 or sections 4928.141 to 4928.144 3600
of the Revised Code or , section 4928.14 of the Revised Code as 3601
it existed prior to July 31, 2008, or section 4928.143 of the 3602
Revised Code as it existed prior to the amendments to this 3603
section by this act shall have standing to participate in 3604
proceedings under sections 4928.23 to 4928.2318 of the Revised 3605
Code. 3606

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 124
As Passed by the Senate
(B) When reviewing an application for a financing order 3607
pursuant to sections 4928.23 to 4928.2318 of the Revised Code, 3608
the commission may hold such hearings, make such inquiries or 3609
investigations, and examine such witnesses, books, papers, 3610
documents, and contracts as the commission considers proper to 3611
carry out these sections. Within thirty days after the filing of 3612
an application under section 4928.231 of the Revised Code, the 3613
commission shall publish a schedule of the proceeding. 3614
(C)(1) Not later than one hundred thirty-five days after 3615
the date the application is filed, the commission shall issue 3616
either a financing order, granting the application in whole or 3617
with modifications, or an order suspending or rejecting the 3618
application. 3619
(2) If the commission suspends an application for a 3620
financing order, the commission shall notify the electric 3621
distribution utility of the suspension and may direct the 3622
electric distribution utility to provide additional information 3623
as the commission considers necessary to evaluate the 3624
application. Not later than ninety days after the suspension, 3625
the commission shall issue either a financing order, granting 3626
the application in whole or with modifications, or an order 3627
rejecting the application. 3628
(D)(1) The commission shall not issue a financing order 3629
under division (C) of this section unless the commission 3630
determines that the financing order is consistent with section 3631
4928.02 of the Revised Code. 3632
(2) Except as provided in division (D)(1) of this section, 3633
the commission shall issue a financing order under division (C) 3634
of this section if, at the time the financing order is issued, 3635
the commission finds that the issuance of the phase-in-recovery 3636

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 125
As Passed by the Senate
bonds and the phase-in-recovery charges authorized by the order 3637
results in, consistent with market conditions, both measurably 3638
enhancing cost savings to customers and mitigating rate impacts 3639
to customers as compared with traditional financing mechanisms 3640
or traditional cost-recovery methods available to the electric 3641
distribution utility or, if the commission previously approved a 3642
recovery method, as compared with that recovery method. 3643
(E) The commission shall include all of the following in a 3644
financing order issued under division (C) of this section: 3645
(1) A determination of the maximum amount and a 3646
description of the phase-in costs that may be recovered through 3647
phase-in-recovery bonds issued under the financing order; 3648
(2) A description of phase-in-recovery property, the 3649
creation of which is authorized by the financing order; 3650
(3) A description of the financing costs that may be 3651
recovered through phase-in-recovery charges and the period over 3652
which those costs may be recovered; 3653
(4) For phase-in-recovery charges not subject to 3654
allocation according to an existing order, a description of the 3655
methodology and calculation for allocating phase-in-recovery 3656
charges among customer classes, including the allocation of such 3657
charges, if any, to governmental aggregation customers based 3658
upon the proportionate benefit determination made under division 3659
(I) of section 4928.20 of the Revised Code; 3660
(5) A description of the adjustment mechanism for use in 3661
the imposition, charging, and collection of the phase-in- 3662
recovery charges; 3663
(6) The maximum term of the phase-in-recovery bonds; 3664

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 126
As Passed by the Senate
(7) Any other provision the commission considers 3665
appropriate to ensure the full and timely imposition, charging, 3666
collection, and adjustment, pursuant to an approved adjustment 3667
mechanism, of the phase-in-recovery charges described in 3668
divisions (E)(3) to (5) of this section. 3669
(F) The commission may, in a financing order, afford the 3670
electric distribution utility flexibility in establishing the 3671
terms and conditions for the phase-in-recovery bonds to 3672
accommodate changes in market conditions, including repayment 3673
schedules, interest rates, financing costs, collateral 3674
requirements, required debt service and other reserves, and the 3675
ability of the electric distribution utility, at its option, to 3676
effect a series of issuances of phase-in-recovery bonds and 3677
correlated assignments, sales, pledges, or other transfers of 3678
phase-in-recovery property. Any changes made under this section 3679
to terms and conditions for the phase-in-recovery bonds shall be 3680
in conformance with the financing order. 3681
(G) A financing order may provide that the creation of 3682
phase-in-recovery property shall be simultaneous with the sale 3683
of that property to an assignee as provided in the application 3684
and the pledge of the property to secure phase-in-recovery 3685
bonds. 3686
(H) The commission shall, in a financing order, require 3687
that after the final terms of each issuance of phase-in-recovery 3688
bonds have been established, and prior to the issuance of those 3689
bonds, the electric distribution utility shall determine the 3690
resulting phase-in-recovery charges in accordance with the 3691
adjustment mechanism described in the financing order. These 3692
phase-in-recovery charges shall be final and effective upon the 3693
issuance of the phase-in-recovery bonds, without further 3694

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 127
As Passed by the Senate
commission action. 3695
Sec. 4928.34. (A) The public utilities commission shall 3696
not approve or prescribe a transition plan under division (A) or 3697
(B) of section 4928.33 of the Revised Code unless the commission 3698
first makes all of the following determinations: 3699
(1) The unbundled components for the electric transmission 3700
component of retail electric service, as specified in the 3701
utility's rate unbundling plan required by division (A)(1) of 3702
section 4928.31 of the Revised Code, equal the tariff rates 3703
determined by the federal energy regulatory commission that are 3704
in effect on the date of the approval of the transition plan 3705
under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code, as each 3706
such rate is determined applicable to each particular customer 3707
class and rate schedule by the commission. The unbundled 3708
transmission component shall include a sliding scale of charges 3709
under division (B) of section 4905.31 of the Revised Code to 3710
ensure that refunds determined or approved by the federal energy 3711
regulatory commission are flowed through to retail electric 3712
customers. 3713
(2) The unbundled components for retail electric 3714
distribution service in the rate unbundling plan equal the 3715
difference between the costs attributable to the utility's 3716
transmission and distribution rates and charges under its 3717
schedule of rates and charges in effect on the effective date of 3718
this section, based upon the record in the most recent rate 3719
proceeding of the utility for which the utility's schedule was 3720
established, and the tariff rates for electric transmission 3721
service determined by the federal energy regulatory commission 3722
as described in division (A)(1) of this section. 3723
(3) All other unbundled components required by the 3724

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 128
As Passed by the Senate
commission in the rate unbundling plan equal the costs 3725
attributable to the particular service as reflected in the 3726
utility's schedule of rates and charges in effect on the 3727
effective date of this section. 3728
(4) The unbundled components for retail electric 3729
generation service in the rate unbundling plan equal the 3730
residual amount remaining after the determination of the 3731
transmission, distribution, and other unbundled components, and 3732
after any adjustments necessary to reflect the effects of the 3733
amendment of section 5727.111 of the Revised Code by Sub. S.B. 3734
No. 3 of the 123rd general assembly. 3735
(5) All unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan 3736
have been adjusted to reflect any base rate reductions on file 3737
with the commission and as scheduled to be in effect by December 3738
31, 2005, under rate settlements in effect on the effective date 3739
of this section. However, all earnings obligations, 3740
restrictions, or caps imposed on an electric utility in a 3741
commission order prior to the effective date of this section are 3742
void. 3743
(6) Subject to division (A)(5) of this section, the total 3744
of all unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan are 3745
capped and shall equal during the market development period, 3746
except as specifically provided in this chapter, the total of 3747
all rates and charges in effect under the applicable bundled 3748
schedule of the electric utility pursuant to section 4905.30 of 3749
the Revised Code in effect on the day before the effective date 3750
of this section, including the transition charge determined 3751
under section 4928.40 of the Revised Code, adjusted for any 3752
changes in the taxation of electric utilities and retail 3753
electric service under Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd General 3754

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 129
As Passed by the Senate
Assembly, the universal service rider authorized by section 3755
4928.51 of the Revised Code, and the temporary rider authorized 3756
by section 4928.61 of the Revised Code. For the purpose of this 3757
division, the rate cap applicable to a customer receiving 3758
electric service pursuant to an arrangement approved by the 3759
commission under section 4905.31 of the Revised Code is, for the 3760
term of the arrangement, the total of all rates and charges in 3761
effect under the arrangement. For any rate schedule filed 3762
pursuant to section 4905.30 of the Revised Code or any 3763
arrangement subject to approval pursuant to section 4905.31 of 3764
the Revised Code, the initial tax-related adjustment to the rate 3765
cap required by this division shall be equal to the rate of 3766
taxation specified in section 5727.81 of the Revised Code and 3767
applicable to the schedule or arrangement. To the extent such 3768
total annual amount of the tax-related adjustment is greater 3769
than or less than the comparable amount of the total annual tax 3770
reduction experienced by the electric utility as a result of the 3771
provisions of Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd general assembly, 3772
such difference shall be addressed by the commission through 3773
accounting procedures, refunds, or an annual surcharge or credit 3774
to customers, or through other appropriate means, to avoid 3775
placing the financial responsibility for the difference upon the 3776
electric utility or its shareholders. Any adjustments in the 3777
rate of taxation specified in section 5727.81 of the Revised 3778
Code section shall not occur without a corresponding adjustment 3779
to the rate cap for each such rate schedule or arrangement. The 3780
department of taxation shall advise the commission and self- 3781
assessors under section 5727.81 of the Revised Code prior to the 3782
effective date of any change in the rate of taxation specified 3783
under that section, and the commission shall modify the rate cap 3784
to reflect that adjustment so that the rate cap adjustment is 3785
effective as of the effective date of the change in the rate of 3786

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 130
As Passed by the Senate
taxation. This division shall be applied, to the extent 3787
possible, to eliminate any increase in the price of electricity 3788
for customers that otherwise may occur as a result of 3789
establishing the taxes contemplated in section 5727.81 of the 3790
Revised Code. 3791
(7) The rate unbundling plan complies with any rules 3792
adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 3793
of the Revised Code. 3794
(8) The corporate separation plan required by division (A) 3795
(2) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code complies with section 3796
4928.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by the 3797
commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised 3798
Code. 3799
(9) Any plan or plans the commission requires to address 3800
operational support systems and any other technical 3801
implementation issues pertaining to competitive retail electric 3802
service comply with any rules adopted by the commission under 3803
division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code. 3804
(10) The employee assistance plan required by division (A) 3805
(4) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code sufficiently provides 3806
severance, retraining, early retirement, retention, 3807
outplacement, and other assistance for the utility's employees 3808
whose employment is affected by electric industry restructuring 3809
under this chapter. 3810
(11) The consumer education plan required under division 3811
(A)(5) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code complies with 3812
former section 4928.42 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted 3813
by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the 3814
Revised Code. 3815

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 131
As Passed by the Senate
(12) The transition revenues for which an electric utility 3816
is authorized a revenue opportunity under sections 4928.31 to 3817
4928.40 of the Revised Code are the allowable transition costs 3818
of the utility as such costs are determined by the commission 3819
pursuant to section 4928.39 of the Revised Code, and the 3820
transition charges for the customer classes and rate schedules 3821
of the utility are the charges determined pursuant to section 3822
4928.40 of the Revised Code. 3823
(13) Any independent transmission plan included in the 3824
transition plan filed under section 4928.31 of the Revised Code 3825
reasonably complies with section 4928.12 of the Revised Code and 3826
any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of 3827
section 4928.06 of the Revised Code, unless the commission, for 3828
good cause shown, authorizes the utility to defer compliance 3829
until an order is issued under division (G) of section 4928.35 3830
of the Revised Code. 3831
(14) The utility is in compliance with sections 4928.01 to 3832
4928.11 of the Revised Code and any rules or orders of the 3833
commission adopted or issued under those sections. 3834
(15) All unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan 3835
have been adjusted to reflect the elimination of the tax on 3836
gross receipts imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code. 3837
In addition, a transition plan approved by the commission 3838
under section 4928.33 of the Revised Code but not containing an 3839
approved independent transmission plan shall contain the express 3840
conditions that the utility will comply with an order issued 3841
under division (G) of section 4928.35 of the Revised Code. 3842
(B) Subject to division (E) of section 4928.17 of the 3843
Revised Code, if If the commission finds that any part of the 3844

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 132
As Passed by the Senate
transition plan would constitute an abandonment under sections 3845
4905.20 and 4905.21 of the Revised Code, the commission shall 3846
not approve that part of the transition plan unless it makes the 3847
finding required for approval of an abandonment application 3848
under section 4905.21 of the Revised Code. Sections 4905.20 and 3849
4905.21 of the Revised Code otherwise shall not apply to a 3850
transition plan under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised 3851
Code. 3852
Sec. 4928.542. The winning bid or bids selected through 3853
the competitive procurement process established under section 3854
4928.54 of the Revised Code shall meet all of the following 3855
requirements: 3856
(A) Be designed to provide reliable competitive retail 3857
electric service to percentage of income payment plan program 3858
customers; 3859
(B) Reduce the cost of the percentage of income payment 3860
plan program relative to the otherwise applicable standard 3861
service offer established under sections 4928.141, and 4928.142, 3862
and 4928.143 of the Revised Code; 3863
(C) Result in the best value for persons paying the 3864
universal service rider under section 4928.52 of the Revised 3865
Code. 3866
Sec. 4928.64. (A)(1) As used in this section, "qualifying 3867
renewable energy resource" means a renewable energy resource, as 3868
defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code that: 3869
(a) Has a placed-in-service date on or after January 1, 3870
1998; 3871
(b) Is any run-of-the-river hydroelectric facility that 3872
has an in-service date on or after January 1, 1980; 3873

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 133
As Passed by the Senate
(c) Is a small hydroelectric facility; 3874
(d) Is created on or after January 1, 1998, by the 3875
modification or retrofit of any facility placed in service prior 3876
to January 1, 1998; or 3877
(e) Is a mercantile customer-sited renewable energy 3878
resource, whether new or existing, that the mercantile customer 3879
commits for integration into the electric distribution utility's 3880
demand-response, energy efficiency, or peak demand reduction 3881
programs as provided under division (A)(2)(c) of section 4928.66 3882
of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, any of the 3883
following: 3884
(i) A resource that has the effect of improving the 3885
relationship between real and reactive power; 3886
(ii) A resource that makes efficient use of waste heat or 3887
other thermal capabilities owned or controlled by a mercantile 3888
customer; 3889
(iii) Storage technology that allows a mercantile customer 3890
more flexibility to modify its demand or load and usage 3891
characteristics; 3892
(iv) Electric generation equipment owned or controlled by 3893
a mercantile customer that uses a renewable energy resource. 3894
(2) For the purpose of this section and as it considers 3895
appropriate, the public utilities commission may classify any 3896
new technology as such a qualifying renewable energy resource. 3897
(B)(1) By the end of 2026, an electric distribution 3898
utility shall have provided from qualifying renewable energy 3899
resources, including, at its discretion, qualifying renewable 3900
energy resources obtained pursuant to an electricity supply 3901

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 134
As Passed by the Senate
contract, a portion of the electricity supply required for its 3902
standard service offer under section sections 4928.141 and 3903
4928.142 of the Revised Code, and an electric services company 3904
shall have provided a portion of its electricity supply for 3905
retail consumers in this state from qualifying renewable energy 3906
resources, including, at its discretion, qualifying renewable 3907
energy resources obtained pursuant to an electricity supply 3908
contract. That portion shall equal eight and one-half per cent 3909
of the total number of kilowatt hours of electricity sold by the 3910
subject utility or company to any and all retail electric 3911
consumers whose electric load centers are served by that utility 3912
and are located within the utility's certified territory or, in 3913
the case of an electric services company, are served by the 3914
company and are located within this state. However, nothing in 3915
this section precludes a utility or company from providing a 3916
greater percentage. 3917
(2) Subject to section 4928.642 of the Revised Code, the 3918
The portion required under division (B)(1) of this section shall 3919
be generated from renewable energy resources in accordance with 3920
the following benchmarks: 3921
3922
1 2 3
A By end of year Renewable energy resources Solar energy resources
B 2009 0.25% 0.004%
C 2010 0.50% 0.010%
D 2011 1% 0.030%
E 2012 1.5% 0.060%

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 135
As Passed by the Senate
F 2013 2% 0.090%
G 2014 2.5% 0.12%
H 2015 2.5% 0.12%
I 2016 2.5% 0.12%
J 2017 3.5% 0.15%
K 2018 4.5% 0.18%
L 2019 5.5% 0.22%
M 2020 5.5% 0%
N 2021 6% 0%
O 2022 6.5% 0%
P 2023 7% 0%
Q 2024 7.5% 0%
R 2025 8% 0%
S 2026 8.5% 0%
(3) The qualifying renewable energy resources implemented 3923
by the utility or company shall be met either: 3924
(a) Through facilities located in this state; or 3925
(b) With resources that can be shown to be deliverable 3926
into this state. 3927
(C)(1) The commission annually shall review an electric 3928

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 136
As Passed by the Senate
distribution utility's or electric services company's compliance 3929
with the most recent applicable benchmark under division (B)(2) 3930
of this section and, in the course of that review, shall 3931
identify any undercompliance or noncompliance of the utility or 3932
company that it determines is weather-related, related to 3933
equipment or resource shortages for qualifying renewable energy 3934
resources as applicable, or is otherwise outside the utility's 3935
or company's control. 3936
(2) Subject to the cost cap provisions of division (C)(3) 3937
of this section, if the commission determines, after notice and 3938
opportunity for hearing, and based upon its findings in that 3939
review regarding avoidable undercompliance or noncompliance, but 3940
subject to division (C)(4) of this section, that the utility or 3941
company has failed to comply with any such benchmark, the 3942
commission shall impose a renewable energy compliance payment on 3943
the utility or company. 3944
(a) The compliance payment pertaining to the solar energy 3945
resource benchmarks under division (B)(2) of this section shall 3946
be an amount per megawatt hour of undercompliance or 3947
noncompliance in the period under review, as follows: 3948
(i) Three hundred dollars for 2014, 2015, and 2016; 3949
(ii) Two hundred fifty dollars for 2017 and 2018; 3950
(iii) Two hundred dollars for 2019. 3951
(b) The compliance payment pertaining to the renewable 3952
energy resource benchmarks under division (B)(2) of this section 3953
shall equal the number of additional renewable energy credits 3954
that the electric distribution utility or electric services 3955
company would have needed to comply with the applicable 3956
benchmark in the period under review times an amount that shall 3957

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 137
As Passed by the Senate
begin at forty-five dollars and shall be adjusted annually by 3958
the commission to reflect any change in the consumer price index 3959
as defined in section 101.27 of the Revised Code, but shall not 3960
be less than forty-five dollars. As used in this division, 3961
"consumer price index" means the consumer price index prepared 3962
by the United States bureau of labor statistics (U.S. city 3963
average for urban wage earners and clerical workers: all items, 3964
1982-1984=100), or, if that index is no longer published, a 3965
generally available comparable index. 3966
(c) The compliance payment shall not be passed through by 3967
the electric distribution utility or electric services company 3968
to consumers. The compliance payment shall be remitted to the 3969
commission, for deposit to the credit of the advanced energy 3970
fund created under section 4928.61 of the Revised Code. Payment 3971
of the compliance payment shall be subject to such collection 3972
and enforcement procedures as apply to the collection of a 3973
forfeiture under sections 4905.55 to 4905.60 and 4905.64 of the 3974
Revised Code. 3975
(3) An electric distribution utility or an electric 3976
services company need not comply with a benchmark under division 3977
(B)(2) of this section to the extent that its reasonably 3978
expected cost of that compliance exceeds its reasonably expected 3979
cost of otherwise producing or acquiring the requisite 3980
electricity by three per cent or more. The cost of compliance 3981
shall be calculated as though any exemption from taxes and 3982
assessments had not been granted under section 5727.75 of the 3983
Revised Code. 3984
(4)(a) An electric distribution utility or electric 3985
services company may request the commission to make a force 3986
majeure determination pursuant to this division regarding all or 3987

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 138
As Passed by the Senate
part of the utility's or company's compliance with any minimum 3988
benchmark under division (B)(2) of this section during the 3989
period of review occurring pursuant to division (C)(2) of this 3990
section. The commission may require the electric distribution 3991
utility or electric services company to make solicitations for 3992
renewable energy resource credits as part of its default service 3993
before the utility's or company's request of force majeure under 3994
this division can be made. 3995
(b) Within ninety days after the filing of a request by an 3996
electric distribution utility or electric services company under 3997
division (C)(4)(a) of this section, the commission shall 3998
determine if qualifying renewable energy resources are 3999
reasonably available in the marketplace in sufficient quantities 4000
for the utility or company to comply with the subject minimum 4001
benchmark during the review period. In making this 4002
determination, the commission shall consider whether the 4003
electric distribution utility or electric services company has 4004
made a good faith effort to acquire sufficient qualifying 4005
renewable energy or, as applicable, solar energy resources to so 4006
comply, including, but not limited to, by banking or seeking 4007
renewable energy resource credits or by seeking the resources 4008
through long-term contracts. Additionally, the commission shall 4009
consider the availability of qualifying renewable energy or 4010
solar energy resources in this state and other jurisdictions in 4011
the PJM interconnection regional transmission organization, 4012
L.L.C., or its successor and the midcontinent independent system 4013
operator or its successor. 4014
(c) If, pursuant to division (C)(4)(b) of this section, 4015
the commission determines that qualifying renewable energy or 4016
solar energy resources are not reasonably available to permit 4017
the electric distribution utility or electric services company 4018

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 139
As Passed by the Senate
to comply, during the period of review, with the subject minimum 4019
benchmark prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section, the 4020
commission shall modify that compliance obligation of the 4021
utility or company as it determines appropriate to accommodate 4022
the finding. Commission modification shall not automatically 4023
reduce the obligation for the electric distribution utility's or 4024
electric services company's compliance in subsequent years. If 4025
it modifies the electric distribution utility or electric 4026
services company obligation under division (C)(4)(c) of this 4027
section, the commission may require the utility or company, if 4028
sufficient renewable energy resource credits exist in the 4029
marketplace, to acquire additional renewable energy resource 4030
credits in subsequent years equivalent to the utility's or 4031
company's modified obligation under division (C)(4)(c) of this 4032
section. 4033
(5) The commission shall establish a process to provide 4034
for at least an annual review of the renewable energy resource 4035
market in this state and in the service territories of the 4036
regional transmission organizations that manage transmission 4037
systems located in this state. The commission shall use the 4038
results of this study to identify any needed changes to the 4039
amount of the renewable energy compliance payment specified 4040
under divisions (C)(2)(a) and (b) of this section. Specifically, 4041
the commission may increase the amount to ensure that payment of 4042
compliance payments is not used to achieve compliance with this 4043
section in lieu of actually acquiring or realizing energy 4044
derived from qualifying renewable energy resources. However, if 4045
the commission finds that the amount of the compliance payment 4046
should be otherwise changed, the commission shall present this 4047
finding to the general assembly for legislative enactment. 4048
(D) The commission annually shall submit to the general 4049

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 140
As Passed by the Senate
assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code a 4050
report describing all of the following: 4051
(1) The compliance of electric distribution utilities and 4052
electric services companies with division (B) of this section; 4053
(2) The average annual cost of renewable energy credits 4054
purchased by utilities and companies for the year covered in the 4055
report; 4056
(3) Any strategy for utility and company compliance or for 4057
encouraging the use of qualifying renewable energy resources in 4058
supplying this state's electricity needs in a manner that 4059
considers available technology, costs, job creation, and 4060
economic impacts. 4061
The commission shall begin providing the information 4062
described in division (D)(2) of this section in each report 4063
submitted after September 10, 2012. The commission shall allow 4064
and consider public comments on the report prior to its 4065
submission to the general assembly. Nothing in the report shall 4066
be binding on any person, including any utility or company for 4067
the purpose of its compliance with any benchmark under division 4068
(B) of this section, or the enforcement of that provision under 4069
division (C) of this section. 4070
(E) All costs incurred by an electric distribution utility 4071
in complying with the requirements of this section shall be 4072
bypassable by any consumer that has exercised choice of supplier 4073
under section 4928.03 of the Revised Code. 4074
Sec. 4928.645. (A) An electric distribution utility or 4075
electric services company may use, for the purpose of complying 4076
with the requirements under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 4077
4928.64 of the Revised Code, renewable energy credits any time 4078

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 141
As Passed by the Senate
in the five calendar years following the date of their purchase 4079
or acquisition from any entity, including, but not limited to, 4080
the following: 4081
(1) A mercantile customer; 4082
(2) An owner or operator of a hydroelectric generating 4083
facility that is located at a dam on a river, or on any water 4084
discharged to a river, that is within or bordering this state or 4085
within or bordering an adjoining state, or that produces power 4086
that can be shown to be deliverable into this state; 4087
(3) A seller of compressed natural gas that has been 4088
produced from biologically derived methane gas, provided that 4089
the seller may only provide renewable energy credits for metered 4090
amounts of gas. 4091
(B)(1) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules 4092
specifying that one unit of credit shall equal one megawatt hour 4093
of electricity derived from renewable energy resources, except 4094
that, for a generating facility of seventy-five megawatts or 4095
greater that is situated within this state and has committed by 4096
December 31, 2009, to modify or retrofit its generating unit or 4097
units to enable the facility to generate principally from 4098
biomass energy by June 30, 2013, each megawatt hour of 4099
electricity generated principally from that biomass energy shall 4100
equal, in units of credit, the product obtained by multiplying 4101
the actual percentage of biomass feedstock heat input used to 4102
generate such megawatt hour by the quotient obtained by dividing 4103
the then existing unit dollar amount used to determine a 4104
renewable energy compliance payment as provided under division 4105
(C)(2)(b) of section 4928.64 of the Revised Code by the then 4106
existing market value of one renewable energy credit, but such 4107
megawatt hour shall not equal less than one unit of credit. 4108

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 142
As Passed by the Senate
Renewable energy resources do not have to be converted to 4109
electricity in order to be eligible to receive renewable energy 4110
credits. The rules shall specify that, for purposes of 4111
converting the quantity of energy derived from biologically 4112
derived methane gas to an electricity equivalent, one megawatt 4113
hour equals 3,412,142 British thermal units. 4114
(2) The rules also shall provide for this state a system 4115
of registering renewable energy credits by specifying which of 4116
any generally available registries shall be used for that 4117
purpose and not by creating a registry. That selected system of 4118
registering renewable energy credits shall allow a hydroelectric 4119
generating facility to be eligible for obtaining renewable 4120
energy credits and shall allow customer-sited projects or 4121
actions the broadest opportunities to be eligible for obtaining 4122
renewable energy credits. 4123
(C) Beginning January 1, 2020, a qualifying solar resource 4124
as defined in section 3706.40 of the Revised Code is not 4125
eligible to obtain a renewable energy credit under this section 4126
for any megawatt hour for which the resource has been issued a 4127
solar energy credit under section 3706.45 of the Revised Code. 4128
(D) Except for compressed natural gas that has been 4129
produced from biologically derived methane gas, energy generated 4130
by using natural gas as a resource is not eligible to obtain a 4131
renewable energy credit under this section. 4132
Sec. 4928.73. (A) As used in this section : 4133
(1) "Mercantile customer member" means a mercantile 4134
customer connected to a mercantile customer self-power system. 4135
(2) "Mercantile customer self-power system" means one or 4136
more electric generation facilities, electric storage 4137

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 143
As Passed by the Senate
facilities, or both, along with any associated facilities, that 4138
meet all of the following: 4139
(a) Produce electricity primarily for the consumption of a 4140
mercantile customer member or a group of mercantile customer 4141
members; 4142
(b) Connect directly to the mercantile customer member's 4143
side of the electric meter; 4144
(c) Deliver electricity to the mercantile customer 4145
member's side of the electric meter without the use of an 4146
electric distribution utility's or an electric cooperative's 4147
distribution system or transmission system; 4148
(d) Is located on either of the following: 4149
(i) A property owned or controlled by a mercantile 4150
customer member or the entity that owns or operates the 4151
mercantile customer self-power system, provided that the 4152
property is not located more than one mile from the customer or 4153
group of customers that consume the electricity produced by the 4154
facilities; 4155
(ii) Land adjacent to a mercantile customer member if the 4156
facilities connect directly with the customer. 4157
(B) The mercantile customer self-power system may be owned 4158
or operated by a mercantile customer member, group of mercantile 4159
customer members, or an entity that is not a mercantile customer 4160
member. 4161
(C) A mercantile customer self-power system may provide 4162
electric generation service to one or more mercantile customers. 4163
(D) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules to 4164
implement this section that are applicable to electric 4165

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 144
As Passed by the Senate
distribution utilities. 4166
(E) Nothing in this section prohibits an electric 4167
distribution utility or an electric cooperative from charging a 4168
mercantile customer for distribution or transmission service 4169
used by a mercantile customer. 4170
Sec. 4929.20. (A)(A)(1) No governmental aggregator as 4171
defined in division (K)(1) of section 4929.01 of the Revised 4172
Code or no retail natural gas supplier shall provide a 4173
competitive retail natural gas service on or after thirteen 4174
months following the effective date of this section June 26, 4175
2001, to a consumer in this state without first being certified 4176
by the public utilities commission regarding its managerial, 4177
technical, and financial capability to provide that service and 4178
providing reasonable financial assurances sufficient to protect 4179
customers and natural gas companies from default. In addition, a 4180
retail natural gas supplier may be required to provide a 4181
performance bond sufficient to protect customers and natural gas 4182
companies from default. Certification shall be granted pursuant 4183
to procedures and standards the commission shall prescribe in 4184
accordance with rules adopted under section 4929.10 of the 4185
Revised Code. However, certification or certification renewal 4186
shall be deemed approved thirty days after the filing of an 4187
application with the commission unless the commission suspends 4188
that approval for good cause shown. In the case of such a 4189
suspension, the commission shall act to approve or deny 4190
certification or certification renewal to the applicant not 4191
later than ninety days after the date of the suspension. 4192
(2) The commission shall establish rules to require a 4193
competitive retail natural gas supplier to maintain financial 4194
assurances sufficient to protect customers and natural gas 4195

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 145
As Passed by the Senate
companies from default. Such rules also shall specifically allow 4196
a natural gas company to set reasonable standards for its 4197
security and the security of its customers through financial 4198
requirements set in its tariffs. 4199
(3) As used in division (A)(2) of this section, "retail 4200
natural gas supplier" has the same meaning as in section 4929.01 4201
of the Revised Code, but excludes a broker or aggregator. 4202
(B) Capability standards adopted in rules pursuant to 4203
division (A) of this section shall be sufficient to ensure 4204
compliance with section 4929.22 of the Revised Code and with the 4205
minimum service requirements established under section 4929.23 4206
of the Revised Code. The standards shall allow flexibility for 4207
voluntary aggregation, to encourage market creativity in 4208
responding to consumer needs and demands. The rules shall 4209
include procedures for biennially renewing certification. 4210
(C)(1) The commission may suspend, rescind, or 4211
conditionally rescind the certification of any retail natural 4212
gas supplier or governmental aggregator issued under this 4213
section if the commission determines, after reasonable notice 4214
and opportunity for hearing, that the retail natural gas 4215
supplier or governmental aggregator has failed to comply with 4216
any applicable certification standards prescribed in rules 4217
adopted pursuant to this section or section 4929.22 of the 4218
Revised Code. 4219
(2) An affected natural gas company may file an 4220
application with the commission for approval of authority to 4221
recover in accordance with division (C)(2) of this section 4222
incremental costs reasonably and prudently incurred by the 4223
company in connection with the commission's continuation, 4224
suspension, rescission, or conditional rescission of a 4225

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 146
As Passed by the Senate
particular retail natural gas supplier's certification under 4226
division (C)(1) of this section. Upon the filing of such an 4227
application, the commission shall conduct an audit of such 4228
incremental costs as are specified in the application. Cost 4229
recovery shall be through a rider on the base rates of customers 4230
of the company for which there is a choice of supplier of 4231
commodity sales service as a result of revised schedules 4232
approved under division (C) of section 4929.29 of the Revised 4233
Code, a rule or order adopted or issued by the commission under 4234
Chapter 4905. of the Revised Code, or an exemption granted by 4235
the commission under sections 4929.04 to 4929.08 of the Revised 4236
Code. The rider shall take effect ninety days after the date of 4237
the application's filing unless the commission, based on the 4238
audit results and for good cause shown, sets the matter for 4239
hearing. After the hearing, the commission shall approve the 4240
application, and authorize such cost recovery rider effective on 4241
the date specified in the order, only for such incremental costs 4242
as the commission determines were reasonably and prudently 4243
incurred by the company in connection with the continuation, 4244
suspension, rescission, or conditional rescission of a retail 4245
natural gas supplier's certification under division (C)(1) of 4246
this section. Any proceeding under division (C)(2) of this 4247
section shall be governed by Chapter 4903. of the Revised Code. 4248
(D) No natural gas company, on and after thirteen months 4249
following the effective date of this section June 26, 2001, 4250
shall knowingly distribute natural gas, to a retail consumer in 4251
this state, for any governmental aggregator, as defined in 4252
division (K)(1) of section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, or 4253
retail natural gas supplier, that has not been certified by the 4254
commission pursuant to this section. 4255
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 4256

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 147
As Passed by the Senate
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 4257
in a rule adopted under section 4929.20 of the Revised Code is 4258
not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 4259
Sec. 4929.221. (A) If a competitive retail natural gas 4260
service supplier offers a residential customer or non-mercantile 4261
commercial customer a contract for a fixed introductory rate 4262
that converts to a variable rate upon the expiration of the 4263
fixed rate, the supplier shall send two notices to each 4264
residential customer and non-mercantile commercial customer that 4265
enters into such a contract. Each notice shall provide all of 4266
the following information to the customer: 4267
(1) The fixed rate that is expiring under the contract; 4268
(2) The expiration date of the contract's fixed rate; 4269
(3) The rate to be charged upon the contract's conversion 4270
to a variable rate; 4271
(4) The public utilities commission web site that, as a 4272
comparison tool, lists rates offered by competitive retail 4273
natural gas service suppliers; 4274
(5) A statement explaining that appearing on each 4275
customer's bill is a price-to-compare notice that lists the 4276
natural gas company's default rate for natural gas charged to 4277
customers who decide not to shop for a competitive supplier. 4278
(B) The notices shall be sent by standard United States 4279
mail as follows: 4280
(1) The supplier shall send the first notice not earlier 4281
than ninety days and not later than sixty days prior to the 4282
expiration of the fixed rate. 4283
(2) The supplier shall send the second notice not earlier 4284

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 148
As Passed by the Senate
than forty-five days and not later than thirty days prior to the 4285
expiration of the fixed rate. 4286
(C) A competitive retail natural gas service supplier 4287
shall provide an annual notice, by standard United States mail, 4288
to each residential customer and non-mercantile commercial 4289
customer that has entered into a contract with the supplier that 4290
has converted to a variable rate upon the expiration of the 4291
contract's fixed introductory rate. The notice shall inform the 4292
customer that the customer is currently subject to a variable 4293
rate and that other fixed rate contracts are available. 4294
(D) Not later than one hundred fifty days after the 4295
effective date of this section, the commission shall adopt rules 4296
in order to implement divisions (A) to (C) of this section. The 4297
rules, at a minimum, shall include the following requirements 4298
regarding the notices required under divisions (A) to (C) of 4299
this section: 4300
(1) To use clear and unambiguous language in order to 4301
enable the customer to make an informed decision; 4302
(2) To design the notices in a way to ensure that they 4303
cannot be confused with marketing materials. 4304
(E) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 4305
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 4306
in a rule adopted under section 4929.221 of the Revised Code is 4307
not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 4308
Sec. 4929.222. (A) As used in this section, "customer 4309
account information" means a unique natural gas company number 4310
or other customer identification number used by the company to 4311
identify a customer and the customer's account record. 4312
(B) The public utilities commission shall adopt rules to 4313

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 149
As Passed by the Senate
ensure that a natural gas company processes a customer's change 4314
in competitive retail natural gas supplier by using customer 4315
account information. A customer who consents to a change of 4316
supplier shall not be required to provide customer account 4317
information to the supplier if the customer provides a valid 4318
form of government-issued identification issued to the customer 4319
or a sufficient alternative form of identification that allows 4320
the supplier to establish the customer's identity accurately. 4321
(C) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 4322
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 4323
in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 4324
121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 4325
Sec. 4933.81. As used in sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 of 4326
the Revised Code: 4327
(A) "Electric supplier" means any electric light company 4328
as defined in section 4905.03 of the Revised Code, including 4329
electric light companies organized as nonprofit corporations, 4330
but not including municipal corporations or other units of local 4331
government that provide electric service. 4332
(B) "Adequate facilities" means distribution lines or 4333
facilities having sufficient capacity to meet the maximum 4334
estimated electric service requirements of its existing 4335
customers and of any new customer occurring during the year 4336
following the commencement of permanent electric service, and to 4337
assure all such customers of reasonable continuity and quality 4338
of service. Distribution facilities and lines of an electric 4339
supplier shall be considered "adequate facilities" if such 4340
supplier offers to undertake to make its distribution facilities 4341
and lines meet such service requirements and, in the 4342
determination of the public utilities commission, can do so 4343

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 150
As Passed by the Senate
within a reasonable time. 4344
(C) "Distribution line" means any electric line that is 4345
being or has been used primarily to provide electric service 4346
directly to electric load centers by the owner of such line. 4347
(D) "Existing distribution line" means any distribution 4348
line of an electric supplier which was in existence on January 4349
1, 1977, or under construction on that date. 4350
(E) "Electric load center" means all the electric- 4351
consuming facilities of any type or character owned, occupied, 4352
controlled, or used by a person at a single location, which 4353
facilities have been, are, or will be connected to and served at 4354
a metered point of delivery and to which electric service has 4355
been, is, or will be rendered. 4356
(F) "Electric service" means retail electric service 4357
furnished to an electric load center for ultimate consumption, 4358
but excludes furnishing electric power or energy at wholesale 4359
for resale. In the case of a for-profit electric supplier and 4360
beginning on the starting date of competitive retail electric 4361
service as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, 4362
"electric service" also excludes a competitive retail electric 4363
service. , and, starting after the effective date of amendments 4364
to this section by this act, excludes: 4365
(1) Retail electric service provided to a mercantile 4366
customer member by its own mercantile customer self-power system 4367
as those terms are defined in section 4928.73 of the Revised 4368
Code; 4369
(2) Retail electric service provided to an electric load 4370
center to the extent the center is acting as a self-generator as 4371
defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code. 4372

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 151
As Passed by the Senate
In the case of a not-for-profit electric supplier and 4373
beginning on that competitive retail electric service starting 4374
date, "electric service" also excludes any service component of 4375
competitive retail electric service that is specified in an 4376
irrevocable filing the electric supplier makes with the public 4377
utilities commission for informational purposes only to 4378
eliminate permanently its certified territory under sections 4379
4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code as to that service 4380
component and further excludes any new electric load centers 4381
going into service after the effective date of amendments to 4382
this section by this act that use retail electric service 4383
described in division (F)(1) or (2) of this section. The filing 4384
shall specify the date on which such territory is so eliminated. 4385
Notwithstanding division (B) of section 4928.01 of the Revised 4386
Code, such a service component may include retail ancillary, 4387
metering, or billing and collection service irrespective of 4388
whether that service component has or has not been declared 4389
competitive under section 4928.04 of the Revised Code. Upon 4390
receipt of the filing by the commission, the not-for-profit 4391
electric supplier's certified territory shall be eliminated 4392
permanently as to the service component specified in the filing 4393
as of the date specified in the filing. As used in this 4394
division, "competitive retail electric service" and "retail 4395
electric service" have the same meanings as in section 4928.01 4396
of the Revised Code. 4397
(G) "Certified territory" means a geographical area the 4398
boundaries of which have been established pursuant to sections 4399
4933.81 to 4933.90 of the Revised Code within which an electric 4400
supplier is authorized and required to provide electric service. 4401
(H) "Other unit of local government" means any 4402
governmental unit or body that may come into existence after 4403

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 152
As Passed by the Senate
July 12, 1978, with powers and authority similar to those of a 4404
municipal corporation, or that is created to replace or exercise 4405
the relevant powers of any one or more municipal corporations. 4406
Sec. 5711.01. As used in this chapter: 4407
(A)(1) "Taxable property" includes all the kinds of 4408
property mentioned in division (B) of section 5709.01 and 4409
section 5709.02 of the Revised Code, and also the amount or 4410
value as of the date of conversion of all taxable property 4411
converted into bonds or other securities not taxed on or after 4412
the first day of November in the year preceding the date of 4413
listing, and of all other taxable property converted into 4414
deposits after the date as of which deposits are required to be 4415
listed in such year, except in the usual course of the 4416
taxpayer's business, to the extent the taxpayer may hold or 4417
control such bonds, securities, or deposits on such day, without 4418
deduction for indebtedness created in the purchase of such bonds 4419
or securities from the taxpayer's credits. "Taxable property" 4420
does not include such investments and deposits as are taxable at 4421
the source as provided in sections 5725.01 to 5725.26 of the 4422
Revised Code, surrender values under policies of insurance, or 4423
any tangible personal property acquired from a public utility or 4424
interexchange telecommunications company as defined in section 4425
5727.01 of the Revised Code and leased back to the public 4426
utility or interexchange telecommunications company pursuant to 4427
a sale and leaseback transaction as defined in division (I) of 4428
section 5727.01 of the Revised Code. For tax year 2007 and 4429
thereafter, "taxable property" of a telephone, telegraph, or 4430
interexchange telecommunications company, as defined in section 4431
5727.01 of the Revised Code, includes property subject to such a 4432
sale and leaseback transaction. 4433

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 153
As Passed by the Senate
(2) For tax year 2007 and thereafter, taxable property 4434
leased to a telephone, telegraph, or interexchange 4435
telecommunications company, as defined in section 5727.01 of the 4436
Revised Code, other than pursuant to a sale and leaseback 4437
transaction, shall be listed and assessed by the owner of the 4438
property as follows: 4439
(a) If the property leased to such a company is not 4440
governed by division (C) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code 4441
in tax years 2007 and 2008, it shall be listed and assessed at 4442
the percentage of true value in money required under division 4443
(G) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code. 4444
(b) All property leased to such a company in tax years 4445
2009 and 2010 shall be listed and assessed at the percentage of 4446
true value in money required under division (H) of section 4447
5711.22 of the Revised Code. 4448
(3) For tax years 2009 and 2010, the lessor of property 4449
subject to division (A)(2) of this section shall have the true 4450
value of the property the lessor leases to a telephone, 4451
telegraph, or interexchange telecommunications company 4452
determined under divisions (A)(5)(A)(6) and (E) of section 4453
5727.06 of the Revised Code. 4454
(B) "Taxpayer" means any owner of taxable property, 4455
including property exempt under division (C) of section 5709.01 4456
of the Revised Code, and includes every person residing in, or 4457
incorporated or organized by or under the laws of this state, or 4458
doing business in this state, or owning or having a beneficial 4459
interest in taxable personal property in this state and every 4460
fiduciary required by sections 5711.01 to 5711.36 of the Revised 4461
Code, to make a return for or on behalf of another. For tax year 4462
2007 and thereafter, "taxpayer" includes telephone companies, 4463

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 154
As Passed by the Senate
telegraph companies, and interexchange telecommunications 4464
company as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code. The 4465
tax commissioner may by rule define and designate the taxpayer, 4466
as to any taxable property which would not otherwise be required 4467
by this section to be returned; and any such rule shall be 4468
considered supplementary to the enumeration of kinds of 4469
taxpayers following: 4470
(1) Individuals of full age and sound mind residing in 4471
this state; 4472
(2) Partnerships, corporations, associations, and joint- 4473
stock companies, under whatever laws organized or existing, 4474
doing business or having taxable property in this state; and 4475
corporations incorporated by or organized under the laws of this 4476
state, wherever their actual business is conducted; 4477
(3) Fiduciaries appointed by any court in this state or 4478
having title, possession, or custody of taxable personal 4479
property in this state or engaged in business in this state; 4480
(4) Unincorporated mutual funds. 4481
"Taxpayer" excludes all individuals, partnerships, 4482
corporations, associations, and joint-stock companies, their 4483
executors, administrators, and receivers who are defined in 4484
Title LVII of the Revised Code as financial institutions, 4485
dealers in intangibles, domestic insurance companies, or public 4486
utilities, except to the extent they may be required by sections 4487
5711.01 to 5711.36 of the Revised Code, to make returns as 4488
fiduciaries, or by section 5725.26 of the Revised Code, to make 4489
returns of property leased, or held for the purpose of leasing, 4490
to others if the owner or lessor of the property acquired it for 4491
the sole purpose of leasing it to others or to the extent that 4492

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 155
As Passed by the Senate
property is taxable under section 5725.25 of the Revised Code. 4493
(C) "Return" means the taxpayer's annual report of taxable 4494
property. 4495
(D) "List" means the designation, in a return, of the 4496
description of taxable property, the valuation or amount 4497
thereof, the name of the owner, and the taxing district where 4498
assessable. 4499
(E) "Taxing district" means, in the case of property 4500
assessable on the classified tax list and duplicate, a municipal 4501
corporation or the territory in a county outside the limits of 4502
all municipal corporations therein; in the case of property 4503
assessable on the general tax list and duplicate, a municipal 4504
corporation or township, or part thereof, in which the aggregate 4505
rate of taxation is uniform. 4506
(F) "Assessor" includes the tax commissioner and the 4507
county auditor as deputy of the commissioner. 4508
(G) "Fiduciary" includes executors, administrators, 4509
parents, guardians, receivers, assignees, official custodians, 4510
factors, bailees, lessees, agents, attorneys, and employees, but 4511
does not include trustees unless the sense so requires. 4512
(H) "General tax list and duplicate" means the books or 4513
records containing the assessments of property subject to local 4514
tax levies. 4515
(I) "Classified tax list and duplicate" means the books or 4516
records containing the assessments of property not subject to 4517
local tax levies. 4518
(J) "Investment company" means any corporation, the shares 4519
of which are regularly offered for sale to the public, engaged 4520

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 156
As Passed by the Senate
solely in the business of investing and reinvesting funds in 4521
real property or investments, or holding or selling real 4522
property or investments for the purpose of realizing income or 4523
profit which is distributed to its shareholders. Investment 4524
company does not include any dealer in intangibles, as defined 4525
in section 5725.01 of the Revised Code. 4526
(K) "Unincorporated mutual fund" means any partnership, 4527
each partner of which is a corporation, engaged solely in the 4528
business of investing and reinvesting funds in investments, or 4529
holding or selling investments for the purpose of realizing 4530
income or profit which is distributed to its partners and which 4531
is subject to Chapter 1707. of the Revised Code. An 4532
unincorporated mutual fund does not include any dealer in 4533
intangibles as defined in section 5725.01 of the Revised Code. 4534
Sec. 5727.01. As used in this chapter: 4535
(A) "Public utility" means each person referred to as a 4536
telephone company, telegraph company, electric company, natural 4537
gas company, pipe-line company, water-works company, water 4538
transportation company, heating company, rural electric company, 4539
railroad company, combined company, or energy company. 4540
(B) "Gross receipts" means the entire receipts for 4541
business done by any person from operations as a public utility, 4542
or incidental thereto, or in connection therewith, including any 4543
receipts received under Chapter 4928. of the Revised Code. The 4544
gross receipts for business done by an incorporated company 4545
engaged in operation as a public utility includes the entire 4546
receipts for business done by such company under the exercise of 4547
its corporate powers, whether from the operation as a public 4548
utility or from any other business. 4549

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 157
As Passed by the Senate
(C) "Rural electric company" means any nonprofit 4550
corporation, organization, association, or cooperative engaged 4551
in the business of supplying electricity to its members or 4552
persons owning an interest therein in an area the major portion 4553
of which is rural. "Rural electric company" excludes an energy 4554
company. 4555
(D) Any person: 4556
(1) Is a telegraph company when engaged in the business of 4557
transmitting telegraphic messages to, from, through, or in this 4558
state; 4559
(2) Is a telephone company when primarily engaged in the 4560
business of providing local exchange telephone service, 4561
excluding cellular radio service, in this state; 4562
(3) Is an electric company when engaged in the business of 4563
generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity within 4564
this state for use by others, but excludes a rural electric 4565
company or an energy company; 4566
(4) Is a natural gas company when engaged in the business 4567
of supplying or distributing natural gas for lighting, power, or 4568
heating purposes to consumers within this state, excluding a 4569
person that is a governmental aggregator or retail natural gas 4570
supplier as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code; 4571
(5) Is a pipe-line company when engaged in the business of 4572
transporting natural gas, oil, or coal or its derivatives 4573
through pipes or tubing, either wholly or partially within this 4574
state; 4575
(6) Is a water-works company when engaged in the business 4576
of supplying water through pipes or tubing, or in a similar 4577
manner, to consumers within this state; 4578

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 158
As Passed by the Senate
(7) Is a water transportation company when engaged in the 4579
transportation of passengers or property, by boat or other 4580
watercraft, over any waterway, whether natural or artificial, 4581
from one point within this state to another point within this 4582
state, or between points within this state and points without 4583
this state; 4584
(8) Is a heating company when engaged in the business of 4585
supplying water, steam, or air through pipes or tubing to 4586
consumers within this state for heating purposes; 4587
(9) Is a railroad company when engaged in the business of 4588
owning or operating a railroad either wholly or partially within 4589
this state on rights-of-way acquired and held exclusively by 4590
such company, or otherwise, and includes a passenger, street, 4591
suburban, or interurban railroad company; 4592
(10) Is an energy company when engaged in the business of 4593
generating, transmitting, storing and releasing, or distributing 4594
electricity within this state for use by others solely from an 4595
energy facility with an aggregate nameplate capacity in excess 4596
of two hundred fifty kilowatts. 4597
As used in division (D)(2) of this section, "local 4598
exchange telephone service" means making available or furnishing 4599
access and a dial tone to all persons within a local calling 4600
area for use in originating and receiving voice grade 4601
communications over a switched network operated by the provider 4602
of the service within the area and for gaining access to other 4603
telecommunication services. 4604
(E) "Taxable property" means the property required by 4605
section 5727.06 of the Revised Code to be assessed by the tax 4606
commissioner, but does not include either of the following: 4607

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 159
As Passed by the Senate
(1) An item of tangible personal property that for the 4608
period subsequent to the effective date of an air, water, or 4609
noise pollution control certificate and continuing so long as 4610
the certificate is in force, has been certified as part of the 4611
pollution control facility with respect to which the certificate 4612
has been issued; 4613
(2) An item of tangible personal property that during the 4614
construction of a plant or facility and until the item is first 4615
capable of operation, whether actually used in operation or not, 4616
is incorporated in or being held exclusively for incorporation 4617
in that plant or facility. 4618
Notwithstanding section 5701.03 of the Revised Code, for 4619
tax year 2006 and thereafter, "taxable property" includes 4620
patterns, jigs, dies, and drawings of an electric company or a 4621
combined company for use in the activity of an electric company. 4622
(F) "Taxing district" means a municipal corporation or 4623
township, or part thereof, in which the aggregate rate of 4624
taxation is uniform. 4625
(G) "Telecommunications service" has the same meaning as 4626
in division (AA) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. 4627
(H) "Interexchange telecommunications company" means a 4628
person that is engaged in the business of transmitting 4629
telephonic messages to, from, through, or in this state, but 4630
that is not a telephone company. 4631
(I) "Sale and leaseback transaction" means a transaction 4632
in which a public utility or interexchange telecommunications 4633
company sells any tangible personal property to a person other 4634
than a public utility or interexchange telecommunications 4635
company and leases that property back from the buyer. 4636

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 160
As Passed by the Senate
(J) "Production equipment" means all taxable steam, 4637
nuclear, hydraulic, renewable resource, clean coal technology, 4638
and other production plant equipment used to generate or store 4639
and release electricity. For tax years prior to 2001, 4640
"production equipment" includes taxable station equipment that 4641
is located at a production plant. 4642
(K) "Tax year" means the year for which property or gross 4643
receipts are subject to assessment under this chapter. This 4644
division does not limit the tax commissioner's ability to assess 4645
and value property or gross receipts outside the tax year. 4646
(L) "Combined company" means any person engaged in the 4647
activity of an electric company or rural electric company that 4648
is also engaged in the activity of a heating company or a 4649
natural gas company, or any combination thereof. 4650
(M) "Public utility property lessor" means any person, 4651
other than a public utility or an interexchange 4652
telecommunications company, that leases personal property, other 4653
than in a sale and leaseback transaction, to a public utility, 4654
other than a railroad, water transportation, telephone, or 4655
telegraph company if the property would be taxable property if 4656
owned by the public utility. A public utility property lessor is 4657
subject to this chapter only for the purposes of reporting and 4658
paying tax on taxable property it leases to a public utility 4659
other than a telephone or telegraph company. A public utility 4660
property lessor that leases property to a public utility other 4661
than a telephone or telegraph company is not a public utility, 4662
but it shall report its property and be assessed in the same 4663
manner as the utility to which it leases the property. 4664
(N) "Energy resource" means any of the following: 4665

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 161
As Passed by the Senate
(1) "Renewable energy resource" as defined in section 4666
4928.01 of the Revised Code; 4667
(2) "Clean coal technology" as described in division (A) 4668
(34)(c) of section 4928.01 of the Revised Code; 4669
(3) "Advanced nuclear technology" as described in division 4670
(A)(34)(d) of section 4928.01 of the Revised Code; 4671
(4) "Cogeneration technology" as described in division (A) 4672
(34)(b) of section 4928.01 of the Revised Code; 4673
(5) Energy storage system. 4674
(O) "Energy conversion equipment" means tangible personal 4675
property connected to a wind turbine tower, connected to and 4676
behind solar radiation collector areas and designed to convert 4677
the radiant energy of the sun into electricity or heat, or 4678
connected to any other property used to generate or store and 4679
release electricity from an energy resource, through which 4680
electricity is transferred to controls, transformers, or power 4681
electronics and to the transmission interconnection point. 4682
"Energy conversion equipment" includes, but is not limited 4683
to, inverters, batteries, switch gears, wiring, collection 4684
lines, substations, ancillary tangible personal property, or any 4685
lines and associated tangible personal property located between 4686
substations and the transmission interconnection point. 4687
(P) "Energy facility" means one or more interconnected 4688
wind turbines, solar panels, energy storage systems, or other 4689
tangible personal property used to generate or store and release 4690
electricity from an energy resource owned by the same person, 4691
including: 4692
(1) All interconnection equipment, devices, and related 4693

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 162
As Passed by the Senate
apparatus connected to such tangible personal property; 4694
(2) All cables, equipment, devices, and related apparatus 4695
that connect the generators to an electricity grid or to a 4696
building or facility that directly consumes the electricity 4697
produced, that facilitate the transmission of electrical energy 4698
from the generators to the grid, building, or facility, and, 4699
where applicable, that transform voltage before ultimate 4700
delivery of electricity to the grid, building, or facility. 4701
"Energy facility" includes buildings, structures, 4702
improvements, or fixtures exclusively used to house, support, or 4703
stabilize tangible personal property constituting the facility 4704
or that are otherwise necessary for the operation of that 4705
property; and so much of the land on which such tangible 4706
personal property is situated as is required for operation of 4707
the facility and is not devoted to some other use, not to 4708
exceed, in the case of wind turbines, one-half acre for each 4709
wind turbine, and regardless of whether the land is owned by the 4710
owner or lessee of the tangible personal property or by another 4711
person. 4712
(Q) "Nameplate capacity" means the original interconnected 4713
maximum rated alternating current output of a generator or other 4714
electric production equipment under specific conditions 4715
designated by the manufacturer, expressed in the number of 4716
kilowatts or megawatts. 4717
(R) "Qualifying production equipment" means production 4718
equipment and energy conversion equipment that is first used in 4719
business in this state beginning in calendar year 2026 and 4720
thereafter. 4721
(S) "Energy storage system" means tangible personal 4722

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 163
As Passed by the Senate
property that is capable of storing and releasing energy. 4723
Sec. 5727.031. (A) A person that is engaged in some other 4724
primary business to which the supplying of electricity to others 4725
is incidental shall file a report under section 5727.08 of the 4726
Revised Code as an electric company but shall only report 4727
therein as taxable property the amounts required in divisions 4728
(B) and (C) of this section. All time limits and other 4729
procedural requirements of this chapter for the reporting and 4730
assessment of property of electric companies apply to persons 4731
required to file a report under this section. For the purposes 4732
of this section, "the supplying of electricity to others" shall 4733
not include donating all of the electricity a person generates 4734
to a political subdivision of the state. 4735
(B) A person subject to this section shall report the true 4736
value of the boilers, machinery, equipment, and any personal 4737
property used to supply electricity to others, which shall be 4738
the sum of the following: 4739
(1) The true value of the property that is taxable 4740
production equipment, as such true value it would be determined 4741
for an electric company under section 5727.11 of the Revised 4742
Code, multiplied by the per cent of the electricity generated in 4743
the preceding calendar year that was not used by the person who 4744
generated it; plus 4745
(2) The true value of the property that is not production 4746
equipment, as it such true value would be determined for an 4747
electric company under section 5727.11 of the Revised Code, 4748
multiplied by the per cent of the electricity generated in the 4749
preceding calendar year that was not used by the person who 4750
generated it. 4751

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 164
As Passed by the Senate
(C) The property reported under division (B) of this 4752
section shall be listed and assessed at an amount equal to the 4753
sum of the products determined under divisions (C)(1) and (2) of 4754
this section. 4755
(1) Multiply the portion of the true value determined 4756
under division (B)(1) of this section by the assessment rate in 4757
section 5727.111 of the Revised Code that is applicable to the 4758
taxable production equipment of an electric company; 4759
(2) Multiply the portion of the true value determined 4760
under division (B)(2) of this section by the assessment rate in 4761
section 5727.111 of the Revised Code that is applicable to the 4762
taxable property of an electric company that is not production 4763
equipment. 4764
Sec. 5727.06. (A) Except as otherwise provided by law, the 4765
following constitutes the taxable property of a public utility, 4766
interexchange telecommunications company, or public utility 4767
property lessor that shall be assessed by the tax commissioner: 4768
(1) For tax years before tax year 2006: 4769
(a) In the case of a railroad company, all real property 4770
and tangible personal property owned or operated by the railroad 4771
company in this state on the thirty-first day of December of the 4772
preceding year; 4773
(b) In the case of a water transportation company, all 4774
tangible personal property, except watercraft, owned or operated 4775
by the water transportation company in this state on the thirty- 4776
first day of December of the preceding year and all watercraft 4777
owned or operated by the water transportation company in this 4778
state during the preceding calendar year; 4779
(c) In the case of all other public utilities and 4780

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 165
As Passed by the Senate
interexchange telecommunications companies, all tangible 4781
personal property that on the thirty-first day of December of 4782
the preceding year was both located in this state and: 4783
(i) Owned by the public utility or interexchange 4784
telecommunications company; or 4785
(ii) Leased by the public utility or interexchange 4786
telecommunications company under a sale and leaseback 4787
transaction. 4788
(2) For tax years 2006, 2007, and 2008: 4789
(a) In the case of a railroad company, all real property 4790
used in railroad operations and tangible personal property owned 4791
or operated by the railroad company in this state on the thirty- 4792
first day of December of the preceding year; 4793
(b) In the case of a water transportation company, all 4794
tangible personal property, except watercraft, owned or operated 4795
by the water transportation company in this state on the thirty- 4796
first day of December of the preceding year and all watercraft 4797
owned or operated by the water transportation company in this 4798
state during the preceding calendar year; 4799
(c) In the case of all other public utilities except 4800
telephone and telegraph companies, all tangible personal 4801
property that on the thirty-first day of December of the 4802
preceding year was both located in this state and either owned 4803
by the public utility or leased by the public utility under a 4804
sale and leaseback transaction. 4805
(3) For tax year years 2009 and each tax year thereafterto 4806
2026: 4807
(a) In the case of a railroad company, all real property 4808

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 166
As Passed by the Senate
used in railroad operations and tangible personal property owned 4809
or operated by the railroad company in this state on the thirty- 4810
first day of December of the preceding year; 4811
(b) In the case of a water transportation company, all 4812
tangible personal property, except watercraft, owned or operated 4813
by the water transportation company in this state on the thirty- 4814
first day of December of the preceding year and all watercraft 4815
owned or operated by the water transportation company in this 4816
state during the preceding calendar year; 4817
(c) In the case of all other public utilities except 4818
telephone and telegraph companies, all tangible personal 4819
property that on the thirty-first day of December of the 4820
preceding year was both located in this state and either owned 4821
by the public utility or leased by the public utility under a 4822
sale and leaseback transaction, and that is not exempted from 4823
taxation under section 5727.75 of the Revised Code; 4824
(d) In the case of a public utility property lessor, all 4825
personal property that on the thirty-first day of December of 4826
the preceding year was both located in this state and leased, in 4827
other than a sale and leaseback transaction, to a public utility 4828
other than a railroad, telephone, telegraph, or water 4829
transportation company. The assessment rate used under section 4830
5727.111 of the Revised Code shall be based on the assessment 4831
rate that would apply if the public utility owned the property, 4832
and that is not exempted from taxation under section 5727.75 of 4833
the Revised Code. 4834
(4) For tax year 2027 and each tax year thereafter: 4835
(a) In the case of a railroad company, all real property 4836
used in railroad operations and tangible personal property owned 4837

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 167
As Passed by the Senate
or operated by the railroad company in this state on the thirty- 4838
first day of December of the preceding year; 4839
(b) In the case of a water transportation company, all 4840
tangible personal property, except watercraft, owned or operated 4841
by the water transportation company in this state on the thirty- 4842
first day of December of the preceding year and all watercraft 4843
owned or operated by the water transportation company in this 4844
state during the preceding calendar year; 4845
(c) In the case of all other public utilities except 4846
telephone and telegraph companies, all tangible personal 4847
property except qualifying production equipment that on the 4848
thirty-first day of December of the preceding year was both 4849
located in this state and either owned by the public utility or 4850
leased by the public utility under a sale and leaseback 4851
transaction, and that is not exempted from taxation under 4852
section 5727.75 of the Revised Code; 4853
(d) In the case of a public utility property lessor, all 4854
personal property except qualifying production equipment that on 4855
the thirty-first day of December of the preceding year was both 4856
located in this state and leased, in other than a sale and 4857
leaseback transaction, to a public utility other than a 4858
railroad, telephone, telegraph, or water transportation company. 4859
The assessment rate used under section 5727.111 of the Revised 4860
Code shall be based on the assessment rate that would apply if 4861
the public utility owned the property, and that is not exempted 4862
from taxation under section 5727.75 of the Revised Code. 4863
(5) For tax years 2005 and 2006, in the case of telephone, 4864
telegraph, or interexchange telecommunications companies, all 4865
tangible personal property that on the thirty-first day of 4866
December of the preceding year was both located in this state 4867

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 168
As Passed by the Senate
and either owned by the telephone, telegraph, or interexchange 4868
telecommunications company or leased by the telephone, 4869
telegraph, or interexchange telecommunications company under a 4870
sale and leaseback transaction. 4871
(5)(a)(6)(a) For tax year 2007 and thereafter, in the case 4872
of telephone, telegraph, or interexchange telecommunications 4873
companies, all tangible personal property shall be listed and 4874
assessed for taxation under Chapter 5711. of the Revised Code, 4875
but the tangible personal property shall be valued in accordance 4876
with this chapter using the composite annual allowances and 4877
other valuation procedures prescribed under section 5727.11 of 4878
the Revised Code by the tax commissioner for such property for 4879
tax year 2006, notwithstanding any section of Chapter 5711. of 4880
the Revised Code to the contrary. 4881
(b) A telephone, telegraph, or interexchange 4882
telecommunications company subject to division (A)(5)(a)(A)(6) 4883
(a) of this section shall file a combined return with the tax 4884
commissioner in accordance with section 5711.13 of the Revised 4885
Code even if the company has tangible personal property in only 4886
one county. Such a company also is subject to the issuance of a 4887
preliminary assessment certificate by the tax commissioner under 4888
section 5711.25 of the Revised Code. Such a company is not 4889
required to file a county supplemental return under section 4890
5711.131 of the Revised Code. 4891
(6)(7) In the case of an energy company, for : 4892
(a) For tax year years 2011 and each tax year thereafterto 4893
2026, all tangible personal property that on the thirty-first 4894
day of December of the preceding year was both located in this 4895
state and either owned by the company or leased by the company 4896
under a sale and leaseback transaction, and that is not exempted 4897

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 169
As Passed by the Senate
from taxation under section 5727.75 of the Revised Code. 4898
(b) For tax year 2027 and each tax year thereafter, all 4899
tangible personal property except qualifying production 4900
equipment that on the thirty-first day of December of the 4901
preceding year was both located in this state and either owned 4902
by the company or leased by the company under a sale and 4903
leaseback transaction, and that is not exempted from taxation 4904
under section 5727.75 of the Revised Code. 4905
(B) This division applies to tax years before tax year 4906
2007. 4907
In the case of an interexchange telecommunications 4908
company, all taxable property shall be subject to the provisions 4909
of this chapter and shall be valued by the commissioner in 4910
accordance with division (A) of section 5727.11 of the Revised 4911
Code. A person described by this division shall file the report 4912
required by section 5727.08 of the Revised Code. Persons 4913
described in this division shall not be considered taxpayers, as 4914
defined in division (B) of section 5711.01 of the Revised Code, 4915
and shall not be required to file a return and list their 4916
taxable property under any provision of Chapter 5711. of the 4917
Revised Code. 4918
(C) The lien of the state for taxes levied each year on 4919
the real and personal property of public utilities and 4920
interexchange telecommunications companies and on the personal 4921
property of public utility property lessors shall attach thereto 4922
on the thirty-first day of December of the preceding year. 4923
(D) Property that is required by division (A)(3)(b) of 4924
this section to be assessed by the tax commissioner under this 4925
chapter shall not be listed by the owner of the property under 4926

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 170
As Passed by the Senate
Chapter 5711. of the Revised Code. 4927
(E) The ten-thousand-dollar exemption provided for in 4928
division (C)(3) of section 5709.01 of the Revised Code does not 4929
apply to any personal property that is valued under this 4930
chapter. 4931
(F) The tax commissioner may adopt rules governing the 4932
listing of the taxable property of public utilities and 4933
interexchange telecommunications companies and the determination 4934
of true value. 4935
Sec. 5727.11. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this 4936
section, the true value of all taxable property, except property 4937
of a railroad company, required by section 5727.06 of the 4938
Revised Code to be assessed by the tax commissioner shall be 4939
determined by a method of valuation using cost as capitalized on 4940
the public utility's books and records less composite annual 4941
allowances as prescribed by the commissioner. If the 4942
commissioner finds that application of this method will not 4943
result in the determination of true value of the public 4944
utility's taxable property, the commissioner may use another 4945
method of valuation. 4946
(B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this 4947
section, the true value of current gas stored underground is the 4948
cost of that gas shown on the books and records of the public 4949
utility on the thirty-first day of December of the preceding 4950
year. 4951
(2) For tax year 2001 and thereafter, the true value of 4952
current gas stored underground is the quotient obtained by 4953
dividing (a) the average value of the current gas stored 4954
underground, which shall be determined by adding the value of 4955

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 171
As Passed by the Senate
the gas on hand at the end of each calendar month in the 4956
calendar year preceding the tax year, or, if applicable, the 4957
last day of business of each month for a partial month, divided 4958
by (b) the total number of months the natural gas company was in 4959
business during the calendar year prior to the beginning of the 4960
tax year. With the approval of the tax commissioner, a natural 4961
gas company may use a date other than the end of a calendar 4962
month to value its current gas stored underground. 4963
(C) The true value of noncurrent gas stored underground is 4964
thirty-five per cent of the cost of that gas shown on the books 4965
and records of the public utility on the thirty-first day of 4966
December of the preceding year. 4967
(D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this 4968
section, the true value of the taxable production equipment of 4969
an electric company and the true value of all taxable property 4970
of a rural electric company is the equipment's or property's 4971
cost as capitalized on the company's books and records less 4972
fifty per cent of that cost as an allowance for depreciation and 4973
obsolescence. 4974
(2) The true value of the taxable production equipment or 4975
energy conversion equipment of an electric company, rural 4976
electric company, or energy company purchased, transferred, or 4977
placed into service after October 5, 1999, is the purchase price 4978
of the equipment as capitalized on the company's books and 4979
records less composite annual allowances as prescribed by the 4980
tax commissioner. 4981
(E) The true value of taxable property, except property of 4982
a railroad company, required by section 5727.06 of the Revised 4983
Code to be assessed by the tax commissioner shall not include 4984
the allowance for funds used during construction or interest 4985

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 172
As Passed by the Senate
during construction that has been capitalized on the public 4986
utility's books and records as part of the total cost of the 4987
taxable property. This division shall not apply to the taxable 4988
property of an electric company or a rural electric company, 4989
excluding transmission and distribution property, first placed 4990
into service after December 31, 2000, or to the taxable property 4991
a person purchases, which includes transfers, if that property 4992
was used in business by the seller prior to the purchase. 4993
(F) The true value of watercraft owned or operated by a 4994
water transportation company shall be determined by multiplying 4995
the true value of the watercraft as determined under division 4996
(A) of this section by a fraction, the numerator of which is the 4997
number of revenue-earning miles traveled by the watercraft in 4998
the waters of this state and the denominator of which is the 4999
number of revenue-earning miles traveled by the watercraft in 5000
all waters. 5001
(G) The cost of property subject to a sale and leaseback 5002
transaction is the cost of the property as capitalized on the 5003
books and records of the public utility owning the property 5004
immediately prior to the sale and leaseback transaction. 5005
(H) The cost as capitalized on the books and records of a 5006
public utility includes amounts capitalized that represent 5007
regulatory assets, if such amounts previously were included on 5008
the company's books and records as capitalized costs of taxable 5009
personal property. 5010
(I) Any change in the composite annual allowances as 5011
prescribed by the commissioner on a prospective basis shall not 5012
be admissible in any judicial or administrative action or 5013
proceeding as evidence of value with regard to prior years' 5014
taxes. Information about the business, property, or transactions 5015

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 173
As Passed by the Senate
of any taxpayer obtained by the commissioner for the purpose of 5016
adopting or modifying the composite annual allowances shall not 5017
be subject to discovery or disclosure. 5018
Sec. 5727.111. The taxable property of each public 5019
utility, except a railroad company, and of each interexchange 5020
telecommunications company shall be assessed at the following 5021
percentages of true value: 5022
(A) In the case of a rural electric company, fifty per 5023
cent in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution 5024
property first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 5025
2027 and its energy conversion equipment, and twenty-five per 5026
cent for all its other taxable property; 5027
(B) In the case of a telephone or telegraph company, 5028
twenty-five per cent for taxable property first subject to 5029
taxation in this state for tax year 1995 or thereafter for tax 5030
years before tax year 2007, and pursuant to division (H) of 5031
section 5711.22 of the Revised Code for tax year 2007 and 5032
thereafter, and the following for all other taxable property: 5033
(1) For tax years prior to 2005, eighty-eight per cent; 5034
(2) For tax year 2005, sixty-seven per cent; 5035
(3) For tax year 2006, forty-six per cent; 5036
(4) For tax year 2007 and thereafter, pursuant to division 5037
(H) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code. 5038
(C) Twenty-five per cent in the case of (1) a natural gas 5039
company or (2) a water-works company for taxable property first 5040
subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2017 and 5041
thereafter; 5042
(D) Eighty-eight per cent in the case of taxable property 5043

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 174
As Passed by the Senate
of a pipe-line company first subject to taxation in this state 5044
before tax year 2027, a water-works company for taxable property 5045
first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2017, or 5046
a heating company; 5047
(E)(1) For tax year 2005, eighty-eight per cent in the 5048
case of the taxable transmission and distribution property of an 5049
electric company, and twenty-five per cent for all its other 5050
taxable property; 5051
(2) For tax year years 2006 and each tax year thereafterto 5052
2026, in the case of an electric company, eighty-five per cent 5053
in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution 5054
property and its energy conversion equipment, and twenty-four 5055
per cent for all its other taxable property. 5056
(3) For tax year 2027 and each tax year thereafter, in the 5057
case of an electric company, eighty-five per cent of its taxable 5058
transmission and distribution property first subject to taxation 5059
in this state before tax year 2027 and its energy conversion 5060
equipment, twenty-five per cent in the case of its other taxable 5061
transmission and distribution property, and twenty-four per cent 5062
for all its other taxable property. 5063
(F)(1) Twenty-five per cent in the case of an 5064
interexchange telecommunications company for tax years before 5065
tax year 2007; 5066
(2) Pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the 5067
Revised Code for tax year 2007 and thereafter. 5068
(G) Twenty-five per cent in the case of a water 5069
transportation company; 5070
(H)(H)(1) For tax year years 2011 and each tax year 5071
thereafter to 2026, in the case of an energy company, twenty- 5072

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 175
As Passed by the Senate
four per cent in the case of its taxable production equipment, 5073
and eighty-five per cent for all its other taxable property. 5074
(2) For tax year 2027 and each tax year thereafter, in the 5075
case of an energy company, twenty-four per cent in the case of 5076
its taxable production equipment, twenty-five per cent for its 5077
taxable transmission and distribution property first subject to 5078
taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter, and 5079
eighty-five per cent for all its other taxable property. 5080
(I) Twenty-five per cent in the case of taxable property 5081
of a pipe-line company first subject to taxation in this state 5082
for tax year 2027 and thereafter. 5083
Sec. 5727.75. (A) For purposes of this section: 5084
(1) "Qualified energy project" means an energy project 5085
certified by the director of development pursuant to this 5086
section. 5087
(2) "Energy project" means a project to provide electric 5088
power through the construction, installation, and use of an 5089
energy facility. 5090
(3) "Alternative energy zone" means a county declared as 5091
such by the board of county commissioners under division (E)(1) 5092
(b) or (c) of this section. 5093
(4) "Full-time equivalent employee" means the total number 5094
of employee-hours for which compensation was paid to individuals 5095
employed at a qualified energy project for services performed at 5096
the project during the calendar year divided by two thousand 5097
eighty hours. For the purpose of this calculation, "performed at 5098
the project" includes only hours worked at the qualified energy 5099
project and devoted to site preparation or protection, 5100
construction and installation, and the unloading and 5101

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 176
As Passed by the Senate
distribution of materials at the project site, but does not 5102
include hours worked by superintendents, owners, manufacturers' 5103
representatives, persons employed in a bona fide executive, 5104
management, supervisory, or administrative capacity, or persons 5105
whose sole employment on the project is transporting materials 5106
or persons to the project site. 5107
(5) "Solar energy project" means an energy project 5108
composed of an energy facility using solar panels to generate 5109
electricity. 5110
(6) "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning 5111
as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. 5112
(7) "Applicable year" means the later of the following: 5113
(a) The tax year in which the secretary of the treasury of 5114
the United States, or the secretary's delegate, determines, in 5115
accordance with section 45Y of the Internal Revenue Code, that 5116
the annual greenhouse gas emissions from the production of 5117
electricity in the United States are equal to or less than 5118
twenty-five per cent of the annual greenhouse gas emissions from 5119
the production of electricity in the United States for calendar 5120
year 2022; 5121
(b) Tax year 2029. 5122
(8) "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue 5123
Code as of the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023. 5124
(B)(1) Tangible personal property of a qualified energy 5125
project using renewable energy resources is exempt from taxation 5126
for tax years 2011 through the applicable year if all of the 5127
following conditions are satisfied: 5128
(a) On or before the last day of the tax year preceding 5129

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 177
As Passed by the Senate
the applicable year, the owner or a lessee pursuant to a sale 5130
and leaseback transaction of the project submits an application 5131
to the power siting board for a certificate under section 5132
4906.20 of the Revised Code, or if that section does not apply, 5133
submits an application for any approval, consent, permit, or 5134
certificate or satisfies any condition required by a public 5135
agency or political subdivision of this state for the 5136
construction or initial operation of an energy project. 5137
(b) Construction or installation of the energy facility 5138
begins on or after January 1, 2009, and before the first day of 5139
the applicable year. For the purposes of this division, 5140
construction begins on the earlier of the date of application 5141
for a certificate or other approval or permit described in 5142
division (B)(1)(a) of this section, or the date the contract for 5143
the construction or installation of the energy facility is 5144
entered into. 5145
(c) For a qualified energy project with a nameplate 5146
capacity of twenty megawatts or greater, a board of county 5147
commissioners of a county in which property of the project is 5148
located has adopted a resolution under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) 5149
of this section to approve the application submitted under 5150
division (E) of this section to exempt the property located in 5151
that county from taxation. A board's adoption of a resolution 5152
rejecting an application or its failure to adopt a resolution 5153
approving the application does not affect the tax-exempt status 5154
of the qualified energy project's property that is located in 5155
another county. 5156
(2) If tangible personal property of a qualified energy 5157
project using renewable energy resources was exempt from 5158
taxation under this section beginning in any of tax years 2011 5159

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 178
As Passed by the Senate
through the applicable year, and the certification under 5160
division (E)(2) of this section has not been revoked, the 5161
tangible personal property of the qualified energy project is 5162
exempt from taxation for the tax year following the applicable 5163
year and all ensuing tax years if the property was placed into 5164
service before the first day of the tax year following the 5165
applicable year, as certified in the construction progress 5166
report required under division (F)(2) of this section. Tangible 5167
personal property that has not been placed into service before 5168
that date is taxable property subject to taxation. An energy 5169
project for which certification has been revoked is ineligible 5170
for further exemption under this section. Revocation does not 5171
affect the tax-exempt status of the project's tangible personal 5172
property for the tax year in which revocation occurs or any 5173
prior tax year. 5174
(C) Tangible personal property of a qualified energy 5175
project using clean coal technology, advanced nuclear 5176
technology, or cogeneration technology is exempt from taxation 5177
for the first tax year that the property would be listed for 5178
taxation and all subsequent years if all of the following 5179
circumstances are met: 5180
(1) The property was placed into service before January 1, 5181
2021. Tangible personal property that has not been placed into 5182
service before that date is taxable property subject to 5183
taxation. 5184
(2) For such a qualified energy project with a nameplate 5185
capacity of twenty megawatts or greater, a board of county 5186
commissioners of a county in which property of the qualified 5187
energy project is located has adopted a resolution under 5188
division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of this section to approve the 5189

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 179
As Passed by the Senate
application submitted under division (E) of this section to 5190
exempt the property located in that county from taxation. A 5191
board's adoption of a resolution rejecting the application or 5192
its failure to adopt a resolution approving the application does 5193
not affect the tax-exempt status of the qualified energy 5194
project's property that is located in another county. 5195
(3) The certification for the qualified energy project 5196
issued under division (E)(2) of this section has not been 5197
revoked. An energy project for which certification has been 5198
revoked is ineligible for exemption under this section. 5199
Revocation does not affect the tax-exempt status of the 5200
project's tangible personal property for the tax year in which 5201
revocation occurs or any prior tax year. 5202
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this section, real 5203
property of a qualified energy project is exempt from taxation 5204
for any tax year for which the tangible personal property of the 5205
qualified energy project is exempted under this section. 5206
(E)(1)(a) A person may apply to the director of 5207
development for certification of an energy project as a 5208
qualified energy project on or before the following dates: 5209
(i) The last day of the tax year preceding the applicable 5210
year, for an energy project using renewable energy resources; 5211
(ii) December 31, 2017, for an energy project using clean 5212
coal technology, advanced nuclear technology, or cogeneration 5213
technology. 5214
(b) The director shall forward a copy of each application 5215
for certification of an energy project with a nameplate capacity 5216
of twenty megawatts or greater to the board of county 5217
commissioners of each county in which the project is located and 5218

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 180
As Passed by the Senate
to each taxing unit with territory located in each of the 5219
affected counties. Any board that receives from the director a 5220
copy of an application submitted under this division shall adopt 5221
a resolution approving or rejecting the application unless it 5222
has adopted a resolution under division (E)(1)(c) of this 5223
section. A resolution adopted under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of 5224
this section may require an annual service payment to be made in 5225
addition to the service payment required under division (G) of 5226
this section. The sum of the service payment required in the 5227
resolution and the service payment required under division (G) 5228
of this section shall not exceed nine thousand dollars per 5229
megawatt of nameplate capacity located in the county. The 5230
resolution shall specify the time and manner in which the 5231
payments required by the resolution shall be paid to the county 5232
treasurer. The county treasurer shall deposit the payment to the 5233
credit of the county's general fund to be used for any purpose 5234
for which money credited to that fund may be used. 5235
The board shall send copies of the resolution to the owner 5236
of the facility and the director by certified mail or, if the 5237
board has record of an internet identifier of record associated 5238
with the owner or director, by ordinary mail and by that 5239
internet identifier of record. The board shall send such notice 5240
within thirty days after receipt of the application, or a longer 5241
period of time if authorized by the director. 5242
(c) A board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution 5243
declaring the county to be an alternative energy zone and 5244
declaring all applications submitted to the director of 5245
development under this division after the adoption of the 5246
resolution, and prior to its repeal, to be approved by the 5247
board. 5248

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 181
As Passed by the Senate
All tangible personal property and real property of an 5249
energy project with a nameplate capacity of twenty megawatts or 5250
greater is taxable if it is located in a county in which the 5251
board of county commissioners adopted a resolution rejecting the 5252
application submitted under this division or failed to adopt a 5253
resolution approving the application under division (E)(1)(b) or 5254
(c) of this section. 5255
(2) The director shall certify an energy project if all of 5256
the following circumstances exist: 5257
(a) The application was timely submitted. 5258
(b) For an energy project with a nameplate capacity of 5259
twenty megawatts or greater, a board of county commissioners of 5260
at least one county in which the project is located has adopted 5261
a resolution approving the application under division (E)(1)(b) 5262
or (c) of this section. 5263
(c) No portion of the project's facility was used to 5264
supply electricity before December 31, 2009. 5265
(d) For construction or installation of a qualified energy 5266
project described in division (B)(1)(b) of this section, that 5267
the project is subject to wage requirements described in section 5268
45(b)(7)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code and apprenticeship 5269
requirements described in section 45(b)(8)(A)(i) of the Internal 5270
Revenue Code, provided both of the following apply: 5271
(i) The person applies for such certificate after the 5272
effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023. 5273
(ii) A board of commissioners of at least one county in 5274
which the project is located is required to adopt a resolution 5275
approving the application under division (E)(1)(b) or (c) of 5276
this section. 5277

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 182
As Passed by the Senate
(3) The director shall deny a certification application if 5278
the director determines the person has failed to comply with any 5279
requirement under this section. The director may revoke a 5280
certification if the director determines the person, or 5281
subsequent owner or lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback 5282
transaction of the qualified energy project, has failed to 5283
comply with any requirement under this section. Upon 5284
certification or revocation, the director shall notify the 5285
person, owner, or lessee, the tax commissioner, and the county 5286
auditor of a county in which the project is located of the 5287
certification or revocation. Notice shall be provided in a 5288
manner convenient to the director. 5289
(F) The owner or a lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback 5290
transaction of a qualified energy project shall do each of the 5291
following: 5292
(1) Comply with all applicable regulations; 5293
(2) File with the director of development a certified 5294
construction progress report before the first day of March of 5295
each year during the energy facility's construction or 5296
installation indicating the percentage of the project completed, 5297
and the project's nameplate capacity, as of the preceding 5298
thirty-first day of December. Unless otherwise instructed by the 5299
director of development, the owner or lessee of an energy 5300
project shall file a report with the director on or before the 5301
first day of March each year after completion of the energy 5302
facility's construction or installation indicating the project's 5303
nameplate capacity as of the preceding thirty-first day of 5304
December. Not later than sixty days after June 17, 2010, the 5305
owner or lessee of an energy project, the construction of which 5306
was completed before June 17, 2010, shall file a certificate 5307

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 183
As Passed by the Senate
indicating the project's nameplate capacity. 5308
(3) File with the director of development, in a manner 5309
prescribed by the director, a report of the total number of 5310
full-time equivalent employees, and the total number of full- 5311
time equivalent employees domiciled in Ohio, who are employed in 5312
the construction or installation of the energy facility; 5313
(4) For energy projects with a nameplate capacity of 5314
twenty megawatts or greater, repair all roads, bridges, and 5315
culverts affected by construction as reasonably required to 5316
restore them to their preconstruction condition, as determined 5317
by the county engineer in consultation with the local 5318
jurisdiction responsible for the roads, bridges, and culverts. 5319
In the event that the county engineer deems any road, bridge, or 5320
culvert to be inadequate to support the construction or 5321
decommissioning of the energy facility, the road, bridge, or 5322
culvert shall be rebuilt or reinforced to the specifications 5323
established by the county engineer prior to the construction or 5324
decommissioning of the facility. The owner or lessee of the 5325
facility shall post a bond in an amount established by the 5326
county engineer and to be held by the board of county 5327
commissioners to ensure funding for repairs of roads, bridges, 5328
and culverts affected during the construction. The bond shall be 5329
released by the board not later than one year after the date the 5330
repairs are completed. The energy facility owner or lessee 5331
pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction shall post a bond, 5332
as may be required by the Ohio power siting board in the 5333
certificate authorizing commencement of construction issued 5334
pursuant to section 4906.10 of the Revised Code, to ensure 5335
funding for repairs to roads, bridges, and culverts resulting 5336
from decommissioning of the facility. The energy facility owner 5337
or lessee and the county engineer may enter into an agreement 5338

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 184
As Passed by the Senate
regarding specific transportation plans, reinforcements, 5339
modifications, use and repair of roads, financial security to be 5340
provided, and any other relevant issue. 5341
(5) Provide or facilitate training for fire and emergency 5342
responders for response to emergency situations related to the 5343
energy project and, for energy projects with a nameplate 5344
capacity of twenty megawatts or greater, at the person's 5345
expense, equip the fire and emergency responders with proper 5346
equipment as reasonably required to enable them to respond to 5347
such emergency situations; 5348
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, for 5349
projects for which certification as a qualified energy project 5350
was applied for, under division (E) of this section, before the 5351
effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, maintain a 5352
ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time equivalent employees employed 5353
in the construction or installation of the energy project to 5354
total full-time equivalent employees employed in the 5355
construction or installation of the energy project of not less 5356
than eighty per cent in the case of a solar energy project, and 5357
not less than fifty per cent in the case of any other energy 5358
project. A person applying for such a qualified energy project 5359
may certify to the director of development that the project will 5360
be voluntarily subject to the wage requirements described in 5361
section 45(b)(7)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code and 5362
apprenticeship requirements described in section 45(b)(8)(A)(i) 5363
of the Internal Revenue Code as authorized in division (F)(6)(b) 5364
of this section. Upon receipt of that certification, the project 5365
shall comply with division (F)(6)(b) of this section rather than 5366
division (F)(6)(a) of this section. 5367
(b) For projects for which certification as a qualified 5368

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 185
As Passed by the Senate
energy project was applied for, under division (E) of this 5369
section, on or after the effective date of this amendment 5370
October 3, 2023, maintain a ratio of Ohio-domiciled full-time 5371
equivalent employees employed in the construction or 5372
installation of the energy project to total full-time equivalent 5373
employees employed in the construction or installation of the 5374
energy project of not less than seventy per cent in the case of 5375
a solar energy project, and not less than fifty per cent in the 5376
case of any other energy project. 5377
(c) For purposes of divisions (F)(6)(a) and (b) of this 5378
section, in the case of an energy project for which 5379
certification from the power siting board is required under 5380
section 4906.20 of the Revised Code, the number of full-time 5381
equivalent employees employed in the construction or 5382
installation of the energy project equals the number actually 5383
employed or the number projected to be employed in the 5384
certificate application, if such projection is required under 5385
regulations adopted pursuant to section 4906.03 of the Revised 5386
Code, whichever is greater. For all other energy projects, the 5387
number of full-time equivalent employees employed in the 5388
construction or installation of the energy project equals the 5389
number actually employed or the number projected to be employed 5390
by the director of development, whichever is greater. To 5391
estimate the number of employees to be employed in the 5392
construction or installation of an energy project, the director 5393
shall use a generally accepted job-estimating model in use for 5394
renewable energy projects, including but not limited to the job 5395
and economic development impact model. The director may adjust 5396
an estimate produced by a model to account for variables not 5397
accounted for by the model. 5398
(7) For energy projects with a nameplate capacity in 5399

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 186
As Passed by the Senate
excess of twenty megawatts, establish a relationship with any of 5400
the following to educate and train individuals for careers in 5401
the wind or solar energy industry: 5402
(a) A member of the university system of Ohio as defined 5403
in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; 5404
(b) A person offering an apprenticeship program registered 5405
with the employment and training administration within the 5406
United States department of labor or with the apprenticeship 5407
council created by section 4139.02 of the Revised Code; 5408
(c) A career-technical center, joint vocational school 5409
district, comprehensive career-technical center, or compact 5410
career-technical center; 5411
(d) A training center operated by a labor organization, or 5412
with a training center operated by a for-profit or nonprofit 5413
organization. 5414
The relationship may include endowments, cooperative 5415
programs, internships, apprenticeships, research and development 5416
projects, and curriculum development. 5417
(8) Offer to sell power or renewable energy credits from 5418
the energy project to electric distribution utilities or 5419
electric service companies subject to renewable energy resource 5420
requirements under section 4928.64 of the Revised Code that have 5421
issued requests for proposal for such power or renewable energy 5422
credits. If no electric distribution utility or electric service 5423
company issues a request for proposal on or before December 31, 5424
2010, or accepts an offer for power or renewable energy credits 5425
within forty-five days after the offer is submitted, power or 5426
renewable energy credits from the energy project may be sold to 5427
other persons. Division (F)(8) of this section does not apply 5428

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 187
As Passed by the Senate
if: 5429
(a) The owner or lessee is a rural electric company or a 5430
municipal power agency as defined in section 3734.058 of the 5431
Revised Code. 5432
(b) The owner or lessee is a person that, before 5433
completion of the energy project, contracted for the sale of 5434
power or renewable energy credits with a rural electric company 5435
or a municipal power agency. 5436
(c) The owner or lessee contracts for the sale of power or 5437
renewable energy credits from the energy project before June 17, 5438
2010. 5439
(9) Make annual service payments as required by division 5440
(G) of this section and as may be required in a resolution 5441
adopted by a board of county commissioners under division (E) of 5442
this section. 5443
(G) The owner or a lessee pursuant to a sale and leaseback 5444
transaction of a qualified energy project shall make annual 5445
service payments in lieu of taxes to the county treasurer on or 5446
before the final dates for payments of taxes on public utility 5447
personal property on the real and public utility personal 5448
property tax list for each tax year for which property of the 5449
energy project is exempt from taxation under this section. The 5450
county treasurer shall allocate the payment on the basis of the 5451
project's physical location. Upon receipt of a payment, or if 5452
timely payment has not been received, the county treasurer shall 5453
certify such receipt or non-receipt to the director of 5454
development and tax commissioner in a form determined by the 5455
director and commissioner, respectively. Each payment shall be 5456
in the following amount: 5457

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 188
As Passed by the Senate
(1) In the case of a solar energy project, seven thousand 5458
dollars per megawatt of nameplate capacity located in the county 5459
as of the thirty-first-day of December of the preceding tax 5460
year; 5461
(2) In the case of any other energy project using 5462
renewable energy resources, the following: 5463
(a) If the project maintains during the construction or 5464
installation of the energy facility a ratio of Ohio-domiciled 5465
full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent 5466
employees of not less than seventy-five per cent, six thousand 5467
dollars per megawatt of nameplate capacity located in the county 5468
as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding tax 5469
year; 5470
(b) If the project maintains during the construction or 5471
installation of the energy facility a ratio of Ohio-domiciled 5472
full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent 5473
employees of less than seventy-five per cent but not less than 5474
sixty per cent, seven thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate 5475
capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of 5476
December of the preceding tax year; 5477
(c) If the project maintains during the construction or 5478
installation of the energy facility a ratio of Ohio-domiciled 5479
full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent 5480
employees of less than sixty per cent but not less than fifty 5481
per cent, eight thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate 5482
capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of 5483
December of the preceding tax year. 5484
(3) In the case of an energy project using clean coal 5485
technology, advanced nuclear technology, or cogeneration 5486

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 189
As Passed by the Senate
technology, the following: 5487
(a) If the project maintains during the construction or 5488
installation of the energy facility a ratio of Ohio-domiciled 5489
full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent 5490
employees of not less than seventy-five per cent, six thousand 5491
dollars per megawatt of nameplate capacity located in the county 5492
as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding tax 5493
year; 5494
(b) If the project maintains during the construction or 5495
installation of the energy facility a ratio of Ohio-domiciled 5496
full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent 5497
employees of less than seventy-five per cent but not less than 5498
sixty per cent, seven thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate 5499
capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of 5500
December of the preceding tax year; 5501
(c) If the project maintains during the construction or 5502
installation of the energy facility a ratio of Ohio-domiciled 5503
full-time equivalent employees to total full-time equivalent 5504
employees of less than sixty per cent but not less than fifty 5505
per cent, eight thousand dollars per megawatt of nameplate 5506
capacity located in the county as of the thirty-first day of 5507
December of the preceding tax year. 5508
(H) The director of development in consultation with the 5509
tax commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of 5510
the Revised Code to implement and enforce this section. 5511
(I) This section and any payments in lieu of taxes made as 5512
required under this section continue to apply and be required 5513
notwithstanding the enactment of S.B. 2 of the 136th general 5514
assembly. 5515

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 190
As Passed by the Senate
Sec. 5727.76. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying 5516
property" means tangible personal property that is dedicated to 5517
transporting or transmitting electricity or natural gas and that 5518
is placed into service in a priority investment area designated 5519
under section 122.161 of the Revised Code during a time when 5520
that designation is in effect. 5521
(B) Qualifying property shall be exempt from taxation for 5522
the tax year following the year in which the property is placed 5523
into service and for the ensuing four tax years. 5524
Section 2. That existing sections 303.213, 519.213, 5525
713.081, 3313.372, 3313.373, 4905.03, 4906.01, 4906.03, 4906.06, 5526
4906.07, 4906.10, 4909.04, 4909.05, 4909.052, 4909.06, 4909.07, 5527
4909.08, 4909.15, 4909.156, 4909.173, 4909.174, 4909.18, 5528
4909.19, 4909.191, 4909.42, 4928.01, 4928.05, 4928.08, 4928.14, 5529
4928.141, 4928.142, 4928.144, 4928.17, 4928.20, 4928.23, 5530
4928.231, 4928.232, 4928.34, 4928.542, 4928.64, 4928.645, 5531
4929.20, 4933.81, 5711.01, 5727.01, 5727.031, 5727.06, 5727.11, 5532
5727.111, and 5727.75 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 5533
Section 3. That sections 3706.40, 3706.41, 3706.43, 5534
3706.431, 3706.45, 3706.46, 3706.49, 3706.491, 3706.55, 5535
3706.551, 3706.59, 3706.63, 3706.65, 4928.143, 4928.148, and 5536
4928.642 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 5537
Section 4. (A) Beginning on the effective date of this 5538
section, no electric distribution utility shall collect from its 5539
retail customers in this state any charge that was authorized 5540
under section 4928.148 of the Revised Code prior to the repeal 5541
of that section by this act for retail recovery of prudently 5542
incurred costs related to a legacy generation resource. 5543
Beginning on the effective date of this section, the electric 5544
distribution utility shall not apply for, and the public 5545

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 191
As Passed by the Senate
utilities commission shall not authorize, any rider or cost 5546
recovery mechanism for a legacy generation resource. 5547
The public utilities commission shall continue any 5548
investigation commenced pursuant to section 4928.148 of the 5549
Revised Code prior to the repeal of that section by this act for 5550
purposes of determining the prudence and reasonableness of the 5551
actions of electric distribution utilities with ownership 5552
interests in the legacy generation resource, including their 5553
decisions related to offering the contractual commitment into 5554
the wholesale markets, and excluding from recovery those costs 5555
that the commission determines imprudent and unreasonable. 5556
(B) Beginning on the effective date of this section, no 5557
electric distribution utility shall collect from its retail 5558
customers in the state any charge that was authorized under 5559
section 3706.46 of the Revised Code to meet the revenue 5560
requirement for disbursements from the Solar Generation Fund to 5561
owners or operators of qualifying solar resources that was 5562
required under section 3706.55 of the Revised Code before the 5563
repeal of these sections by this act. 5564
Beginning on the effective date of this section, the Ohio 5565
Air Quality Development Authority is prohibited from directing 5566
the Treasurer of State to remit, and the Treasurer of State is 5567
prohibited from remitting, any money from the Solar Generation 5568
Fund to owners or operators of qualifying solar resources, which 5569
remittance was permitted under section 3706.55 of the Revised 5570
Code prior to the repeal of that section by this act. 5571
Section 5. Section 4909.193 as enacted by this act and the 5572
amendments to sections 4909.19 and 4909.42 of the Revised Code 5573
by this act apply to applications filed under section 4909.18 of 5574
the Revised Code on or after the effective date of this section. 5575

Am. Sub. S. B. No. 2 Page 192
As Passed by the Senate
Section 6. On the effective date of this section, or as 5576
soon as possible thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall 5577
transfer the cash balance of amounts remaining in the solar 5578
generation fund to the school energy performance contracting 5579
loan fund created in section 3313.378 of the Revised Code. 5580
Section 7. Section 4928.01 of the Revised Code is 5581
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 5582
by both H.B. 308 and H.B. 315 of the 135th General Assembly. The 5583
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 5584
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 5585
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 5586
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 5587
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 5588
presented in this act. 5589